Two parties have to agree to conduct a war – even if the circumstances of the war were unplanned, two parties have to agree to conduct a war – even if the circumstances of the war were unplanned, two parties have to agree to conduct a war – even if the circumstances of the war were unplanned, two parties have to agree to conduct a war – even if the circumstances of the war were unplanned, two parties have to agree to conduct a war – even if the circumstances of the war were unplanned, two parties have to agree to conduct a war – even if the circumstances of the war were unplanned, two parties have to agree to conduct a war – even if the circumstances of the war were unplanned, two parties have to agree to conduct a war – even if the circumstances of the war were unplanned, two parties have to agree to conduct 
Refugee resettlement is key to U.S. armed forces and other U.S. entities. Resettlement is key to the effectiveness of military, diplomatic, and intelligence operations abroad and the safety of U.S. troops. Resettlement is key to the effectiveness of military, diplomatic, and intelligence operations abroad and the safety of U.S. troops. 18 Tens of thousands of Iraqi and Afghan nationals have put their lives on the line to support intelligence gathering, operations planning, and other essential services, especially translation. These individuals and their families are often targeted by terrorist groups as a direct result of their cooperation with American troops and diplomats in support of our missions in Iraq and Afghanistan. These individuals and their families are often targeted by terrorist groups as a direct result of their cooperation with Americans. Resettlement is instrumental in ensuring their safety—a testament to the U.S. military’s commitment to leave no one behind
Desensitization is a condition of indifference manifested through unwillingness to engage in compassionate action either as a self-protective mechanism or as a refusal to be concerned for the sufferer-other through some measure of emotional identification
A systematic analysis of class, specifically as a product of economic relations and economic order, and its relation to race has not yet emerged, even though critical race scholars have argued for years that the class system in the U.S. mutually constructs race, gender, and other forms of oppression. A systematic analysis of class, particularly as a product of economic relations and economic ordering, as well as its relation to race, has not yet emerged, even though critical race scholars have argued for years that the class system in the U.S. mutually constructs race, gender, and other forms of oppression. A systematic analysis of class, particularly as a product of economic relations and economic ordering, as well as its relation to race, has not yet emerged, even though critical race scholars have argued for years that the class system in the U.S. mutually constructs race, gender, and other forms of oppression. 
Al-Qaida in the Islamic Maghreb, born of a former insurgent group in Algeria, remains motivated largely out of a desire to attack former colonial power France. It currently holds four French hostages, and French officials have called the group the biggest terror threat to France and its interests. Al-Qaida in the Islamic Maghreb, born of a former insurgent group in Algeria, remains motivated largely out of a desire to attack former colonial power France. It currently holds four French hostages, and French officials have called the group the biggest terror threat to France and its interests. Al-Qaida in the Islamic Maghreb, born of a former insurgent group in Algeria, remains motivated largely out of a desire to attack former colonial power France. It currently holds four French hostages, and French officials have called the group the biggest terror threat to France
Loosening Russia’s influence on the global energy market is key to dismantling Russia’s influence in the region – the U.S. is already a net exporter of refined petroleum products, doubling its exports to Europe from 2007 to 2012. The U.S. is now a net exporter of refined petroleum products, doubling its exports to Europe from 2007 to 2012. The U.S. is now a net exporter of refined petroleum products, doubling its exports to Europe from 2007 to 2012. The U.S. is now a net exporter of refined petroleum products, doubling its exports to Europe from 2007 to 2012. The U.S. is now a net exporter of refined petroleum products, doubling its exports to Europe from 2007 to 2012. The U.S. is now a net exporter of refined petroleum products, doubling its exports to Europe from 2007 to 2012. The U
(--) Obama’s skepticism about surveillance programs is healthy for democracy – he’ll meet with Chinese President Xi Jinping in Rancho Mirage, Calif., this weekend for an informal summit. (--) Obama’s skepticism about surveillance programs is healthy for democracy – he’ll meet with Chinese President Xi Jinping in Rancho Mirage, Calif., this weekend for an informal summit. (--) Obama’s skepticism about surveillance programs is healthy for democracy – he’ll meet with Chinese President Xi Jinping in Rancho Mirage, Calif., this weekend for an informal summit. (--) Obama’s skepticism about surveillance programs is healthy for democracy – he’ll meet with Chinese President Xi Jinping in Rancho Mirage, Calif., this weekend for an informal summit.
The Corps and Reclamation have a history of understating the costs and overstating the benefits. 
Trump vetoed a resolution that would have terminated US military aid to Saudi Arabia and its allies in the Yemen war – he defied the War Powers Resolution’s reaffirmation of the Founder’s grant to Congress over the ultimate question of war and peace – he vetoed a resolution that would have terminated US military aid to Saudi Arabia and its allies in the Yemen war – he vetoed a resolution that would have terminated US military aid to Saudi Arabia and its allies in the Yemen war – he vetoed a resolution that would have terminated US military aid to Saudi Arabia and its allies in the Yemen war – he vetoed a resolution that would have terminated US military aid to Saudi Arabia and its allies in the Yemen war – he vetoed a resolution
The anti-war movement needs to be more conscious of domestic racism and sexism – it’s a new element of war that the anti-war movement needs to be more conscious of – it’s a new element of war that the anti-war movement needs to be more conscious of – it’s a new element of war that the anti-war movement needs to be more conscious of – it’s a new element of war that the anti-war movement needs to be more conscious of – it’s a new element of war that the anti-war movement needs to be more conscious of – it’s a new element of war that the anti-war movement needs to be more conscious of – it’s a new element of war that the anti-war movement needs to be more conscious of – it’s a new element of war that the anti-war movement needs to be
The change to view socionatural processes and dynamics as complex and uncertain—as symptomatic of open systems of overlapping hierarchies—has its roots in systems theory (von Bertallanfy 1968), systems ecology (Allen and Starr 1982), and evolutionary economics (Nelson and Winter 1982), and that natural resource management strategies must somehow reflect these properties in the pursuit of sustainability (see, e.g., Hodgson 1993, Giampietro 1994, Clark et al. 1995, Funtowicz and O’Connor 1998). It is now widely accepted that complexity, variation, and uncertainty are inherent properties of linked social and natural processes, and that natural resource management strategies must somehow reflect these properties in the pursuit of sustainability (see, e.g., Hodgson 1993, Giampietro 1994, Clark et al. 1995, Funtowicz and O’Connor 1998).
A free market solution to the environment creates the most value for society, allows for open and continuous entrepreneurial innovation, and economically empowers those who are most environmentally vulnerable.
The fugitive was able to see what goes unseen by virtue of its normality and banality. The underground generated forms of knowledge that could see and name this process by theorizing it through a non-normative engagement with time. The fugitive was able to see what goes unseen by virtue of its normality and banality. Ayers describes a connection between space and knowledge that is echoed by many others who were underground. Living as a fugitive meant “resisting hysteria,” deciding which ghosts were figments of an imagination on the run and which would bring “machine guns breaking out of the darkness.” Living as a fugitive meant “resisting hysteria,” deciding which ghosts were figments of an imagination on the run and which would bring “machine guns breaking out
The House is stymied by money and time – Republicans are in agreement that the president’s $3.7 billion ask is too high, but how much they want to cut is another sticking point. For some GOP lawmakers, no topline number will be fiscally prudent enough; others might quibble that too conservative a sum won’t fund all of the necessarily priorities outlined by the working group.
Terrorists have advanced scientific and engineering departments, and actively seek out skilled scientists for recruitment. ISIL has appealed for scientists to trek to the caliphate to work on drone and AI technology. The individual technologies behind swarming killer robots – including unmanned aerial vehicles, facial recognition, and machine-to-machine communication – already exist, and have been adapted by terrorist organizations for other means. The technological challenge of scaling it up to swarms and things like that doesn’t need any inventive step. It’s just a question of time and scale and I think that’s an absolute certainty that we should worry about. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
“Cassini is an investment not to be wasted,” Linda Spilker, Cassini project scientist, said in a presentation to OPAG. “Cassini is an investment not to be wasted,” Linda Spilker, Cassini project scientist, said in a presentation to OPAG. “Cassini is an investment not to be wasted,” Linda Spilker, Cassini project scientist, said in a presentation to OPAG. “Cassini is an investment not to be wasted,” Linda Spilker, Cassini project scientist, said in a presentation to OPAG. “Cassini is an investment not to be wasted,” Linda Spilker, Cassini project scientist, said in a presentation to OPAG. “Cassini is an investment not to be wasted,” Linda Spilker, Cassini project scientist, said in a presentation to
Greece is the biggest economic threat to the eurozone – the ECB won’t buy the bonds of distressed debtors 
The U.S. and allied hostility is a major driver of Iranian nuclear proliferation – sanctions, economic carrots and sticks, and threats of force aren’t necessarily a decisive inhibitor
The GOP won’t be able to solve the Asia Pivot – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they won’t be able to reach across the aisle – they
It’s easy to find links, but difficult to judge their relevance. Weak ties imply no criminal mens rea. Weak ties entail the same problem associated with imputing a person’s individual criminal intent based on generalizations about that person’s affinity group. Weak ties entail the same problem associated with imputing a person’s individual criminal intent based on generalizations about that person’s affinity group. Weak ties entail the same problem associated with imputing a person’s individual criminal intent based on generalizations about that person’s affinity group. Weak ties entail the same problem associated with imputing a person’s individual criminal intent based on generalizations about that person’s affinity group. Weak ties entail the same problem associated with imputing a person’s individual criminal intent 
Using the term neoliberalism as a name for the prevailing order of things undermines the democratic task to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually meaningful public debate and action that moves people to engage in mutually
Trump is a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a loose cannon at heart – he’s a
It’s a war between the biologists and the engineers – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview – they just have a very different worldview
Only middle-class academics can blithely assume that all the world is a text because reading and writing are key to their everyday lives and occupational security. For many people throughout the world, particularly subaltern groups, texts are often inaccessible, or threatening, charged with the regulatory powers of the state. More often than not, subordinate people experience texts and the bureaucracy of literacy as instruments of control and displacement, e.g. green cards, passports, arrest warrants, deportation orders—what de Certeau calls “intextuation”
Oil companies are not only eager to drill off America’s coasts—they are enthusiastic about creating jobs and bringing more oil to the world (and the American market), which, in turn, will help lower gas prices. Indeed, for evidence of oil companies’ appetite for economic growth, one need look no further than the Department of the Interior’s recent $1.7 billion lease sale in the central Gulf of Mexico. But while this sale was a positive development for American energy production, the Obama Administration is doing everything in its power to prevent companies that obtain offshore leases from actually drilling and producing oil—a fact evidenced by a new lawsuit recently filed in the U.S. Court of Federal Claims by an independent U.S. oil and gas company. Preparing for Growth By March 2010, ATP Oil & Gas Corporation had obtained oil leases and necessary permits to drill in the Gulf of Mexico
US-Saudi relations are key to US-Saudi engagement in the Middle East
The NSA has confirmed that it is searching Section 702 data to access American’s communications without a warrant, in what is being called the “back door search loophole.”
Bucklew v. Precythe, which read more like a barroom brawl than a judicial exchange of views. Russell Bucklew v. Precythe, which read more like a barroom brawl than a judicial exchange of views. Russell Bucklew, a Missouri death-row prisoner with a rare medical condition, filed a lawsuit in 2015 to make the state execute him by nitrogen hypoxia. Missouri’s choice of lethal injection he warned, could force him to die drowning in his own blood. The five conservative justices on the court ruled that he hadn’t met their high threshold for challenging execution methods. The Eighth Amendment, Justice Neil Gorsuch wrote for the court, “does not guarantee a prisoner a painless death—something that, of course, isn’t guaranteed to many people, including most victims of capital
Mass incarceration is disproportionately concentrated among men, African Americans, and those with low levels of formal schooling. Mass incarceration is disproportionately concentrated among men, African Americans, and those with low levels of formal schooling. Mass incarceration is disproportionately concentrated among men, African Americans, and those with low levels of formal schooling. Mass incarceration is disproportionately concentrated among men, African Americans, and those with low levels of formal schooling. Mass incarceration is disproportionately concentrated among men, African Americans, and those with low levels of formal schooling. Mass incarceration is disproportionately concentrated among men, African Americans, and those with low levels of formal schooling. Mass incarceration is disproportionately concentrated among men, African Americans, and those with low levels of formal schooling. Mass incarceration is disproportionately concentrated among men, African Americans, and those
The FISA Court just defies responsibility by shifting the blame to the bureaucracy and courts
Decolonization of the academic–practitioner nexus has already been placed with knowledge producers, whether within or outside academia, but to bring that discourse into the public realm. At that point practitioners need to carry their share of responsibility in listening to and applying the expertise that can foster more just policies. Instead, the attention policymakers give to expertise is often selective and politicized, based not on what can actually improve people’s lives but on what helps to justify the existing approaches adopted by governments. Instead, the attention policymakers give to expertise is often selective and politicized, based not on what can actually improve people’s lives but on what helps to justify the existing approaches adopted by governments. Instead, the attention policymakers give to expertise is often selective and politicized, based not on what can actually improve people’s lives but on what helps to justify the existing approaches adopted by governments. Instead, the attention policymakers give to
Iran talks revert back to 30 days if a deal is not reached and submitted by Sept. 7, the administration would gain a slight reprieve and face more fundamental questions about whether Congress will pass new sanctions on Iran, and whether a deal is achievable at all – the Iranians have recognized the window for diplomacy never closes with this president and therefore they keep pushing for more extensions, they keep making more outrageous demands – the Iranians have recognized the window for diplomacy never closes with this president and therefore they keep pushing for more extensions, they keep making more outrageous demands – the Iranians have recognized the window for diplomacy never closes with this president and therefore they keep pushing for more extensions, they keep making more outrageous demands – the Iranians have recognized the window for diplomacy never closes with this president and therefore they keep pushing for more extensions, they keep making more outrageous demands – the Iranians have recognized
Climate change causes food poverty among First Nations 
An IOOS remote sensing team should be constituted to work with various agencies and elements of the IOOS (Stakeholders, DMAC, Product and Services, and Education and Outreach committees). This team should include representatives from all regional associations or other relevant body of the IOOS (Stakeholders, DMAC, Product and Services, and Education and Outreach committees). Regional problems should be identified through regional community assessments, interviews, and questionnaires. Regional problems should be identified through regional community assessments, interviews, and questionnaires. Product focus teams should oversee the development of real-time satellite image products, including integrating data from multiple platforms and climatological data sets and data sets that will enable the next generation of ocean information services. An important process will be product review, validation, and feedback, guided by metrics. The precise type, format, and product distribution mechanisms will result from consultations between government resource managers, industry providers, and other stakeholders including
NATO is at its lowest ebb in its 69-year history
The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the open exchange of technological expertise between corporations. The logic of climate protection favors the
Shell didn’t get permits to drill in Arctic waters because of lingering sea ice and a damaged oil spill containment dome
States, university systems, school districts, and even the federal government could take up and encourage any or all of the following steps for improving remediation services, and thus rates of college completion. Rather than a single remediation placement exam, one alternative for determining a student’s college readiness is to use multiple measures, including information about a student’s high school GPA, courses taken, and/or years since high school graduation. Currently, there is wide variation in what colleges use to assess students and what thresholds they use to determine who should be in remediation. Rather than a single remediation placement exam, one alternative for determining a student’s college readiness is to use multiple measures, including information about a student’s high school GPA, courses taken, and/or years since high school graduation. Currently, there is wide variation in what colleges use to assess students and what thresholds they use to determine who should be
Western representations of China are based on neocolonialism and neocolonialism – their constructs of self and Other are not merely discursive in nature, but have political and strategic consequences. Their constructs of self and Other are not merely discursive in nature, but are always in the service of power and at the same time (reproduced by it through the political economies of fear and fantasy. Their constructs of self and Other are not merely discursive in nature, but are always in the service of power and at the same time (reproduced by it through the political economies of fear and fantasy). Their constructs of self and Other are not merely discursive in nature, but are always in the service of power and at the same time (reproduced by it through the political economies of fear and fantasy). Their constructs of self and Other are not merely discursive in nature, but are always in
Don’t look now, but cybersecurity is lurking as a major issue in the developing U.S. presidential election cycle. The stage has been set by developments in the seven years since the last election with no incumbent on the ballot. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Over a half million pieces of human-made material in orbit around our planet. Some are the size of school buses, some the size of BB gun pellets. They all had a function at some point, but now most are simply space debris littered from 100 to 22,000 miles above the Earth. Yet, all behave perfectly according to the laws of physics. Popular culture has embraced the risks of space debris in films like Gravity. Some participants have dramatized the issue by producing graphics of Earth and its satellites, which make our planet look like a fuzzy marble, almost obscured by a dense cloud of white pellets meant to conceptualize space congestion. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Iran is a conservative state in a region otherwise awash in radicalism – Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Kuwait have both lent financial and material support to Sunni extremist groups involved in the Syrian Civil war. Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Kuwait have both lent financial and material support to Sunni extremist groups involved in the Syrian Civil war. Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Kuwait have both lent financial and material support to Sunni extremist groups involved in the Syrian Civil war. Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Kuwait have both lent financial and material support to Sunni extremist groups involved in the Syrian Civil war. Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Kuwait have both lent financial and material support to Sunni extremist groups involved in the Syrian Civil war. Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Kuwait have both lent financial and material support to Sunni extremist groups involved in the Syrian Civil war. Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Kuwait have both lent financial and
The U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck in LNG export authorizations – the U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck in LNG export authorizations – the U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck in LNG export authorizations – the U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck in LNG export authorizations – the U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck in LNG export authorizations – the U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck in LNG export authorizations – the U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck in LNG export authorizations – the U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck in LNG export authorizations – the U.S. needs a national energy strategy to break the bottleneck
China’s initial inclinations seem to be pointing towards the pursuit of bilateral approaches with key oil producing states in the Middle East and Africa, and to a lesser degree in Latin America.1 Bilateral approaches, in periods where oil markets are tight, can lead to strings attached in exchange for stable supply, especially increased pressure from oil suppliers for political concessions for political concessions. At its worst, this might portend increased demands on China for weapons of mass destruction to these politically sensitive markets. China’s initial inclinations seem to be pointing towards the pursuit of bilateral approaches with key oil producing states in the Middle East and Africa, and to a lesser degree in Latin America.1 Bilateral approaches, in periods where oil markets are tight, can lead to strings attached in exchange for stable supply, especially increased pressure from oil suppliers for political concessions for political concessions for political concessions for political concessions for political concessions for political concessions for political concessions
The Johnson-Reed Act set national quotas for immigrants from outside the Western Hemisphere, in the service of an explicitly defined project of racial exclusion. Although Mexicans were not included in the quota system, new mechanisms for border policing curtailed the longstanding mobility of people across the southern US border. With the establishment of the U.S. Border Patrol in that same year, Mexicans and Mexican Americans were forced to address the new category of the “illegal alien,” as the criminalization of Mexican migration marked Mexican Americans and migrants, lawful and undocumented alike, as trespassers in the United States. This comprehensive, racially encoded, immigration policy gave the U.S. government new mechanisms for the restriction and removal of populations, as immigration agents could now track, detain, and deport aliens according to politically defined interests.
State actors do not always cooperate with their federal counterparts – they try to tar the federal executive’s choices as inconsistent with the statute that governs state and federal action alike. They rely on power granted to them by one part of the federal government to contest the decisions of another part, and, whether rightly or wrongly, they cast themselves as Congress’ faithful agents, in contrast to a wayward executive branch. Recognizing the intersection between federalism and the separation of powers does not only reorient our thinking about federalism, it also helps us to think differently about the separation of powers.
The Department of Education is a single industry regulator with the same ambivalent charge given to most single industry regulators --- it must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of the industry --- the federal government must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of the industry --- the federal government must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of the industry --- the federal government must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of the industry --- the federal government must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of the industry --- the federal government must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of the industry --- the federal government must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of the industry --- the federal government must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of the industry --- the federal government must both serve the public or consumer interest and protect the health of
The autonomy of migration is a method or a prism that allows for new perspectives, then we have to ask about what it enables us to see. Firstly, the ’autonomy of migration’-approach enables us to understand migration as social movements and thus inherently as political, social, transformative practices. Through migration, social actors escape their normalized representations; they reconfigure themselves and their conditions of existence. Following Vassilis Tsianos and Dimitris Papadopoulos, migration is thus to be conceived of as a world-making practice, an active transformation of social space. Through migration, social actors escape their normalized representations; they reconfigure themselves and their conditions of existence. Following Vassilis Tsianos and Dimitris Papadopoulos, migration is thus to be conceived of as a world-making practice, an active transformation
A zero-growth economy requires a massive increase in the material consumption and consumption of energy supplied by the global construction of a wind/solar power infrastructure, which requires a massive increase in material consumption and consumption of energy supplied by the global construction of a wind/solar power infrastructure, which requires a massive increase in material consumption and consumption of energy supplied by the global construction of a wind/solar power infrastructure, which requires a massive increase in material consumption and consumption of energy supplied by the global construction of a wind/solar power infrastructure, which requires a massive increase in material consumption and consumption of energy supplied by the global construction of a wind/solar power infrastructure, which requires a massive increase in material consumption and consumption of energy supplied by the global construction of a wind/solar power infrastructure, which requires a massive increase in material consumption and consumption of energy supplied by the global construction of a wind/solar power infrastructure
Economic growth will trap 46 million more people on less than $1.25 a day than was expected prior to the crisis. An extra 53 million will stay trapped on less than $2 a day. This is on top of the 130-155 million people pushed into poverty in 2008 because of soaring food and fuel prices.
The EPA is taking the unusual step of dismissing the Clean Air Scientific Advisory Committee (CASAC), which provides independent advice on technical aspects of air quality standards. Regan fired a particularly controversial official, Louis Anthony “Tony” Cox Jr., who has allegedly taken funding from a major oil lobbying group for his own research into a type of pollution called particulate matter, and denied the link between the pollutant and mortality. The EPA billed its decision to remove such officials as Elizabeth Sheppard, professor in the University of Washington’s Environmental and Occupational health science and biostatistics departments, along with Michelle Bell, an environmental health professor at Yale, Judith Chow, a professor of atmospheric science at the Desert Research Institute, Christina Fuller, an environmental health professor at Georgia State University, and Alexandra Ponette-González, a geography and environment professor at the University of
The NSA is a product or instrument of the social totality – it is an instrument of the state, a way for people to mobilize, and are therefore exploited for the benefit of greater social control and maintenance of the status quo. 
Plenary power preemption fills a gap in equal protection jurisprudence by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine by filling a gap in equal protection doctrine
For the first time in history, the climate caucus feels big enough to matter, or at least, it’s big enough to be worth courting.
(--) FDI in Mexico is at its lowest (relative to GDP) since 1993. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Russia may increase its nuclear threshold as it bolsters its conventional forces – opportunistic, and possibly even reckless, the Putin regime does not appear to be suicidal – Russia has integrated conventional precision weapons and nuclear weapons into a single strategic weapon set, lending credence to the view that Russia is prepared to employ, or threaten to employ, nuclear weapons during a regional conflict.
CAPITALISM IS CHANGING, obviously and drastically. From the moneyed pages of the Wall Street journal to TV commercials for airlines and photocopiers we hear every day about the new order’s globe spanning, cyber-accumulating ways. But our notion about what’s wrong with American life and how the figures responsible are to be confronted haven’t changed much in thirty years. Call it, for convenience, the “countercultural idea.” It holds that the paramount ailment of our society is conformity, a malady that has variously been described as over-organization, bureaucracy, homogeneity, hierarchy, logocentrism, the Combine, the Apollonian. We all know what it is and what it does. It transforms humanity into “organization man” into the man in the gray flannel suit. It is artifice, starched
Trump’s allegiance is as emotional as it is economic – he’s already done enough to get my vote again, without a doubt, no question. He’s punching at all the people who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for so long – the allegiance of those who let them down for
Several embargo refinements over the years like the Libertad Act have further tightened restrictions on Cuba. These restrictions have placed a heavy burden on the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), and the Customs and Border Protection (CBP) particularly in Miami. A 2007 GAO report highlights these burdens and how they impede other more important Law Enforcement activities in defense of the homeland.32
ExxonMobil and Chevron’s earnings rose substantially, up 57% from 2009 for ExxonMobil ending 2010 and up 81% for Chevron (Rapoza, 2011; Exxon Mobil Corporation, 2011). ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Violent crime causes all-cause mortality, coronary heart disease, preterm birth, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight, low birthweight,
The TPP fails on both economic and political grounds – it’s just a late lament for the dying age of free trade agreements 
There is a risk of miscalculation that triggers an inadvertent and dangerous escalation – remilitating the demilitarised zone, deploying artillery units and troops to the “front lines” and conducting exercises there, and providing military assistance for “scattering leaflets against the south’s jugular in the eyes of the North, the information South Korean fliers convey, and the way in which they counter regime propaganda directed at the North’s people are the way in which they counter regime propaganda directed at the North’s people is the way in which they counter regime propaganda directed at the North’s people is the way in which they counter regime propaganda directed at the North’s people is the way in which they counter regime propaganda directed at the North’s people is the way in which they counter regime propaganda directed at the North’s people is the way in which they counter regime propaganda
Legislative rulemaking is better than judicial rulemaking
CAFOs cause air and water pollution, worker safety, and health problems – a majority of the 1,000 national respondents interviewed said they support a ban on CAFOs by a five point margin – a majority of the 1,000 national respondents interviewed said they support a ban on CAFOs by a five point margin – a majority of the 1,000 national respondents interviewed said they support a ban on CAFOs by a five point margin – a majority of the 1,000 national respondents interviewed said they support a ban on CAFOs by a five point margin – a majority of the 1,000 national respondents interviewed said they support a ban on CAFOs by a five point margin – a majority of the 1,000 national respondents interviewed said they support a ban on CAFOs by a five point margin – a majority of the 1,000 national respondents interviewed said they support a ban on CAFOs by 
The federal government can’t force states to comply with the No Child Left Behind Act – it’s regulated and enforced by the Department of Education, which collects data on government-run schools, evaluates their performance, suggests policy changes, and measures outcomes. The federal government can’t force states to comply with the No Child Left Behind Act – it’s regulated and enforced by the Department of Education, which collects data on government-run schools, evaluates their performance, suggests policy changes, and measures outcomes. The federal government can’t force states to comply with the No Child Left Behind Act – it’s regulated and enforced by the Department of Education, which collects data on government-run schools, evaluates their performance, suggests policy changes, and measures outcomes. The federal government can’t force states to comply with the No Child Left Behind Act – it’s regulated and enforced by the Department of Education
Common Core tests set children up for failure with a one-size-fits-all approach – they create anxiety and frustration for their children and create a grueling process for them to work on social and life skills. They also don’t like their children’s performance on tests being tied to their teacher’s evaluations. “It’s a grueling process for these kids,” says Cindy Rubino, a mother of four, including John, a second-grader at Lakeland’s Benjamin Franklin Elementary School who is on the autism spectrum. Along with academic difficulties, John and other students with special needs face social challenges that can challenge their confidence and self-esteem. There was a time, for example, when Rubino learned that John was sitting by himself at lunch every day. She sought help from the school’s social worker, who promptly intervened. As her son struggles to learn life
Mexico’s drug cartels pose a threat to the integrity of the Mexican state – they bribe elite police units with $5,000 monthly payments to cooperate with the cartel and steal high-powered weapons and grenades from the military and bribe elite police units with $5,000 monthly payments to cooperate with the cartel and steal high-powered weapons and grenades from the military and bribe elite police units with $5,000 monthly payments to cooperate with the cartel and steal high-powered weapons and grenades from the military and bribe elite police units with $5,000 monthly payments to cooperate with the cartel and steal high-powered weapons and grenades from the military and bribe elite police units with $5,000 monthly payments to cooperate with the cartel and steal high-powered weapons and grenades from the military and bribe elite police units with $5,000 monthly payments to cooperate with the cartel and steal high-powered weapons and 
Cuba would have seized upon the scientific and technological technology to detect tsunamis that is already deployed in the Pacific Ocean and collectively either purchased or developed it themselves
There is only one thing that proves to be more expensive than education in life – the lack of it. But, when addressed, the results are nothing short of a miracle – ESPECIALLY in America’s inner-cities. In fact, a book I recently wrote, Miracle on Cooper Street, showed that beginning a decade ago, we took inner city kids from schools in Camden, New Jersey, where dropout rates were higher than 50 percent. Then we proceeded to graduate 100 percent of them each year. Thirteen years in a row. Moreover, 100 percent went on to college – some to schools such as Brown, Cornell and the University of Pennsylvania. For other cities looking for similar results, prepare to change and charge ahead, confident that your kids can attain the same results.
The deontological exemption provides a new justification for the existence of the coercive state, both when premised on the traditional assumptions of social contractarians, and when premised on a more realistic understanding of the modern state. The deontological exemption provides a new justification for the existence of the coercive state, both when premised on the traditional assumptions of social contractarians, and when premised on a more realistic understanding of the modern state. The deontological exemption provides a new justification for the existence of the coercive state, both when premised on the traditional assumptions of social contractarians, and when premised on a more realistic understanding of the modern state. The deontological exemption provides a new justification for the existence of the coercive state, both when premised on the traditional assumptions of social contractarians, and when premise
Foucault’s conception of spirituality is irrational – spiritual exercises can only be practiced within the group – emancipation is given in a series of singular and local processes which are never and will never be achieved once and for all. Foucault’s critical ontology of ourselves states that we are not merely theoretical observers, but are directly, unceasingly and locally involved in practical process of transformation. In order to maximize improvement, some of those exercises must be adapted and others must be created knowing that, unlike Marx and his followers, emancipation is given in a series of singular and local processes which are never and will never be achieved once and for all. In order to maximize improvement, some of those exercises must be adapted and others must be created knowing that, unlike Marx and his followers, emancipation is given in a series of singular and local processes which
Immigrant reform isn’t a panacea – it’s a massive omnibus bill that would impose the most sweeping changes to the nation’s broken border system in more than a generation – it’s necessary to strike a compromise between camps that passionately hold different priorities on immigration – a holistic plan is necessary to bring the out-of-date U.S. immigration system into the 21st century – even if it’s put into effect smoothly, advocates who envision reducing illegal immigration to a relative trickle compared with the peak flows of the late 1990s and early 2000s acknowledge that it and some related problems probably never will go away entirely – even if it’s put into effect smoothly, advocates who envision reducing illegal immigration to a relative trickle compared with the peak flows of the late 1990s and early 2000s acknowledge that it and some related problems probably never
‘Responsible innovation’ discourse and policy in Europe has been narrowed to the point where ’society’ and ’the public’ have been conflated with ’the market’, and there is a tendency to assume that successful uptake of a product or service proves that it is socially beneficial.
The Wyoming Legislature is considering cutting the state’s two-year, $3 billion government operations budget, according to a spending bill announced Thursday morning. The plan comes amid a decline in state revenue caused by the energy downturn that’s already resulted in cuts. The Legislature in March adopted a two-year budget that was lower than the previous budget cycle. Over the summer, Gov. Matt Mead and the judicial branch made over $250 million in reductions, and the legislative committee in charge of drafting the budget bill largely accepted those reductions, and the legislative committee in charge of drafting the budget bill largely accepted those reductions. The Legislature in March adopted a two-year budget that was lower than the previous budget cycle. Over the summer, Gov. Matt Mead and the judicial branch made over $250 million in reductions, and the legislative committee in charge of drafting the budget bill largely accepted those reductions, and
Mexico is in a strong position to be a winner from shifts in the global economy – labor costs are low, energy costs are low, and U.S.-made parts contain four times as many U.S.-made parts, on average, than those made in China. 
No more than the attorney vis-a-vis the client, nor the doctor vis-a-vis the patient, can the government attempt to insert itself into the consciences of those whose interests it represents – no more than the attorney vis-a-vis the client, nor the doctor vis-a-vis the patient, can the government attempt to insert itself into the consciences of those whose interests it represents – no more than the attorney vis-a-vis the client, nor the doctor vis-a-vis the patient, can the government attempt to insert itself into the consciences of those whose interests it represents – no more than the attorney vis-a-vis the client, nor the doctor vis-a-vis the patient, can the government attempt to insert itself into the consciences of those whose interests it represents – no more than the attorney vis-a-vis the client, nor the doctor vis-a-vis the patient,
Intense light absorption by dense surface cyanobacterial blooms can locally increase water temperatures (Kahru et al., 1993; Ibelings et al., 2003). Intense light absorption by dense surface cyanobacterial blooms can locally increase water temperatures (Kahru et al., 1993; Ibelings et al., 2003). Intense light absorption by dense surface cyanobacterial blooms can locally increase water temperatures (Kahru et al., 1993; Ibelings et al., 2003). Intense light absorption by dense surface cyanobacterial blooms can locally increase water temperatures (Kahru et al., 1993; Ibelings et al., 2003); thereby creating a positive feedback that perpetuates further CyanoHAB
The TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area – the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian Pacific Free Trade area and the TPP will be the foundation for an even bigger Asian
The U.S. federal system is a cooperative federal system that balances the need for federal oversight without oppressive restraints on the individual state governments. The current raging debate for democracy in South Sudan raises an interesting question: What form of constitutional governance would be most appealing to the ethno-regional multiplicities within the government? The current centralized political system is viewed as fostering a monolithic regime at the expense of democracy. The current centralized political system is viewed as fostering a monolithic regime at the expense of democracy. The current centralized political system is viewed as fostering a monolithic regime at the expense of democracy. The current centralized political system is viewed as fostering a monolithic regime at the expense of democracy. The current centralized political system is viewed as fostering a monolithic regime at the expense of democracy. The current centralized political system is
Canada is in prime position to pick up the slack in oil drilling that the U.S. may be unable to handle – EH&S is so embedded in its policies and the fabric of its business culture that Canada is in prime position to pick up the slack in oil drilling that the U.S. may be unable to handle
Federalism with more powers to States had been working well in the U.S. and Canada 50 years ago
U.S.-led efforts to challenge China’s rise have created geopolitical uncertainty in Southeast Asia – the region is struggling to escape cultural and historical constraints
Training doesn’t solve racial profiling – a code of silence prevents officers from reporting ethical lapses of any kind, including racial profiling and a code of silence prevents officers from reporting ethical lapses of any kind, including racial profiling and a code of silence prevents officers from reporting ethical lapses of any kind, including racial profiling and a code of silence prevents officers from reporting ethical lapses of any kind, including racial profiling and a code of silence prevents officers from reporting ethical lapses of any kind, including racial profiling and a code of silence prevents officers from reporting ethical lapses of any kind, including racial profiling and a code of silence prevents officers from reporting ethical lapses of any kind, including racial profiling and a code of silence
Inclusion/exclusion dichotomy is no longer useful in terms of describing security performances, but rather as part of the simulation of security and surveillance whereby there is no longer a distinction between ‘reality’ and ‘fantasy’. Simulations allow the gap between virtual control and actual control to disappear. What Bogard refers to as telematics societies (societies that perform governance processes ‘at a distance’) function by employing simulation technologies toward cutting the time of the transmission of data to zero. This, for Baudrillard, is our own era, where the circulation of sign-images dominate, but rather than being ’false’ images, now have the function of concealing the fact that reality itself is absent behind its representation. This, for Baudrillard, is our own era, where the circulation of sign-images dominate, but rather than being ’fals
Kagan is not a philosophe but a pamphleteer – he favors the term hegemony, which is benign, involving neither domination nor exploitation but willing submission—“more a condition than a purpose. Scratch the surface, however, and he favors the term hegemony, which he explains is benign, involving neither domination nor exploitation but willing submission—“more a condition than a purpose.” Scratch the surface, however, and he favors the term hegemony, which is benign, involving neither domination nor exploitation but willing submission—“more a condition than a purpose.” Scratch the surface, however, and he favors the term hegemony, which is benign, involving neither domination nor exploitation but willing submission—“more a condition than a purpose.” Scr
Uncertainty hawks would flood our concern with a horde of dangers that pass their permissive test of “non-zero probability,” but there is no escape from uncertainty hawks that flood our concern with a horde of dangers that pass their permissive test of “non-zero probability.” There is no escape from uncertainty hawks that flood our concern with a horde of dangers that pass their permissive test of “non-zero probability.” There is no escape from uncertainty hawks that flood our concern with a horde of dangers that pass their permissive test of “non-zero probability.” There is no escape from uncertainty hawks that flood our concern with a horde of dangers that pass their permissive test of “non-zero probability.” There is no escape from uncertainty
Clean energy investment in non-OECD countries outpaces the US and Europe
Immigration is key to Trump’s base – he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant, he’s anti-immigrant,
The FBI can’t point to any major terrorism cases they’ve cracked thanks to the key snooping powers in the Patriot Act, the Justice Department’s Inspector General said in a report Thursday that could complicate efforts to keep key parts of the law operating. Inspector General Michael E. Horowitz said that between 2004 and 2009, the FBI tripled its use of bulk data collection under Section 215 of the Patriot Act, which allows government agents to compel businesses to turn over records and documents, and increasingly scooped up records of Americans who had no ties to official terrorism investigations. The FBI did finally come up with procedures to try to minimize the information it was gathering on nontargets, but it took far too long, Mr. Horowitz said. The FBI did finally come up with procedures to try to minimize the information it was gathering on nontargets, but it took far too long, Mr. Horowitz said.
The CCE is a decentralized system of governance that allows political bodies closest to the people to decide questions within their own purview of government. The CCE is a decentralized system of governance that allows political bodies closest to the people to decide various questions within their own purview of government. Their own set of voluntary standards, outlined in Civitas, A Framework for Civic Education, was published to help salvage the politicized national history standards that the Senate denounced earlier that year in a historic 99-1 vote. Their own set of voluntary standards, outlined in Civitas, A Framework for Civic Education, a massive 650-page book, was published to help salvage the politicized national history standards that the Senate denounced earlier that year in a historic 99-1 vote. Their own set of voluntary standards, outlined in Civitas, A Framework for Civic Education, a massive 650-page book, was published to
Inconsistent patchwork of approaches has inevitably led to difficulties in enforcement, says Erin O’Donnell, an academic fellow at the University of Melbourne Law School in Australia.
Human agency played a significant role in the formation of rules on telephone surveillance and Fourth Amendment jurisprudence – examining a long-term economy of exchange involving technological, institutional, and cultural inputs, we can understand the limitations of ideology and the importance of human agency in institutional practices, Supreme Court decisions, and legislation. In our efforts to understand the history of telephone surveillance law and Fourth Amendment jurisprudence, Balkin’s theory of cultural software serves us well. By examining a long-term economy of exchange involving technological, institutional, and cultural inputs, we can understand the limitations of ideology and the importance of human agency. In our efforts to understand the history of telephone surveillance law and Fourth Amendment jurisprudence, Balkin’s theory of cultural software serves us well. By examining a long-term economy of exchange involving technological, institutional, and cultural inputs, we can understand the limitations
Economic collapse exacerbates ethno-populism and nationalistic chauvinistic nationalism
Despite policy commitments to gender equality and the recognition that these issues are relevant across the entire range of development thinking and action, gender issues are often neglected. Despite policy commitments to gender equality and the recognition that these issues are relevant across the entire range of development thinking and action, gender issues are often neglected. Despite policy commitments to gender equality and the recognition that these issues are relevant across the entire range of development thinking and action, gender issues are often neglected. Despite policy commitments to gender equality and the recognition that these issues are relevant across the entire range of development thinking and action, gender issues are often neglected. Despite policy commitments to gender equality and the recognition that these issues are relevant across the entire range of development thinking and action, gender issues are often neglected. Despite policy commitments to gender equality and the recognition that these issues are relevant across the entire range of development thinking and action, gender issues are often neglected. 
Trump won’t win by a landslide – he’ll need the economy to rebound, to win over key voting constituencies beyond his core base, and overwhelm voters with a sense of optimism about another term under Trump. He’ll have to convince people that what he said he would do he’s done – he needs to remind people that what he said he would do he’s done – he has to remind people that what he said he would do he’s done – he needs to remind people that what he said he would do he’s done – he needs to remind people that what he said he would do he’s done – he needs to remind people that what he said he would do he’s done – he needs to remind people that what he said he would do 
State legislatures and utility commissions play an important role in modernizing the grid. Their policies and the regulatory framework they create can promote or discourage investment in innovative technologies and energy management approaches. They can work with public utility commissions to reshape the traditional regulatory framework in a way the better aligns customer and utility goals.
Cultivate capacity to change ourselves, to become different, and more specifically of the capacity to enact a new relation to the economy. In the context of globalization, the economy is something that does things to us and dictates our contours of possibility. It is not the product of our performance and creativity. It is not the product of our performance and creativity. In the context of globalization, the economy is something that does things to us and dictates our contours of possibility. It is not the product of our performance and creativity. In the context of globalization, the economy is something that does things to us and dictates our contours of possibility. It is not the product of our performance and creativity. In the context of globalization, the economy is something that does things to us and dictates our contours of possibility. It is not the product of our performance and creativity. In the context of globalization, the economy is something that does things
(--) Congress can pass sweeping but intricate policy schemes to address current and future concerns, and legislation isn’t bound by stare decisis – Congress can pass sweeping but intricate policy schemes to address current and future concerns, and legislation isn’t bound by stare decisis – Congress can pass sweeping but intricate policy schemes to address current and future concerns, and legislation isn’t bound by stare decisis – Congress can pass sweeping but intricate policy schemes to address current and future concerns, and legislation isn’t bound by stare decisis – Congress can pass sweeping but intricate policy schemes to address current and future concerns, and legislation isn’t bound by stare decisis – Congress can pass sweeping but intricate policy schemes to address current and future concerns, and legislation isn’t bound by stare decisis – Congress can pass sweeping but intricate policy schemes to address current and future concerns, and legislation isn’t
neoliberal nativism rewrites the rules of labor relations, gender relations, environmental laws, and the role of the nation-state in both the underdeveloped and overdeveloped world – rewriting the rules of labor relations, gender relations, environmental laws, and the role of the nation-state in both the underdeveloped and overdeveloped world – rewriting the rules of labor relations, gender relations, environmental laws, and the role of the nation-state in both the underdeveloped and overdeveloped world – rewriting the rules of labor relations, gender relations, environmental laws, and the role of the nation-state in both the underdeveloped and overdeveloped world – rewriting the rules of labor relations, gender relations, environmental laws, and the role of the nation-state in both the underdeveloped and overdeveloped world – rewriting the rules of labor relations, gender relations, environmental laws, and the role of
Food prices aren’t overly taxing for middle- and upper-income families, causing a backlash against incumbent politicians and other forms of dissent and unrest.
State and local health departments are losing funding to fight STDs – sex education is key to prevent syphilis, gonorrhea, chlamydia, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea, syphilis, gonorrhea,
China’s “no first use” nuclear policy and assured retaliation strategy have remained relatively constant over the years, but recent doctrinal publications suggest that the country needs to protect its security through mutual deterrence capabilities, which will be centered on road-mobile intercontinental ballistic missiles and nuclear-powered ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launched ballistic missiles armed with submarine-launched ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launched ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launched ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launched ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launched ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launched ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launched ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launched ballistic missile submarines armed with submarine-launch
Rewards go to those with an absolute advantage at a task, ignoring the value of self-improvement and the accomplishment of making it that far, even if it was by a fraction of an inch or a hundredth of a second, even if it was by a fraction of an inch or a hundredth of a second, even if it was by a fraction of an inch or a hundredth of a second, even if it was by a fraction of an inch or a hundredth of a second, even if it was by a fraction of an inch or a hundredth of a second, even if it was by a fraction of an inch or a hundredth of a second, even if it was by a fraction of an inch or a hundredth of a second, even if it was by a fraction of an inch
Pyongyang’s cooperation with US adversaries on nuclear matters is not just a theory – it helped Syria build a carbon copy of North Korea’s Yongbyon nuclear facility, before the Israelis thankfully blew it up in 2007. There are also media reports of North Korean scientists present at Iran’s nuclear-weapons related facilities. One day, a bomb made with Pyongyang’s help could go off in an American or allied city, whether launched, or perhaps more likely, smuggled in. 
Political and intellectual debate about insecurity, violent conflict and global injustice can become hostage to a claustrophic structure of political and ethical possibility that wards off critique.
Federalism is key to preventing democratic backsliding in the US – it allows for local governments to check federal policies that may not be suitable for the federal government – federalism allows for a local government to tackle issues that may not be suitable for the federal government – federalism allows for a local government to check federal policies that may not be suitable for the federal government – federalism allows for a local government to check federal policies that may not be suitable for the federal government – federalism allows for a local government to check federal policies that may not be suitable for the federal government – federalism allows for a local government to check federal policies that may not be suitable for the federal government – federalism allows for a local government to check federal policies that may not be suitable for the federal government – federalism allows for a local government to check federal policies that may not be suitable for
State-owned OAO Rosneft led the Russian oil industry to another post-Soviet output record in June as it continued ramping up production at eastern fields key to its China ambitions, Energy Ministry data showed on Tuesday. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
“Impostor syndrome” is a common experience among PhD students, but does my whiteness make me an impostor in some academic spaces for reasons beyond my novice status. The issue goes far beyond a question of academic credibility (or lack of it) to one of institutional power structures around race and the question of who gets to (or should be able to) speak about black experience. Put in the context of debates around the question “Why isn’t my professor black?” could be a result of the very hegemonic structures that my work and politics purport to resist. I can take some comfort in arguments such as those put forward by the post-colonial feminist scholar Trinh T. Minh-ha, who asserts that “the understanding of difference is a shared responsibility, which requires a minimum willingness to reach out to the unknown” and forge networks of resistance across racial and ethnic lines,
China’s relationship with the United States is much more important to it than its relations with Latin America or any individual Latin American country, both economically and politically. 
Surveillance causes self-censorship, reluctance to write or speak about certain subjects, and reluctance to communicate with sources, or with friends abroad, for fear that they will endanger them by doing so
The LGBTQI community is uniquely vulnerable to exclusion, violence, and exploitation because of the intersecting impacts of social stigma, discrimination, and climate change. The aff’s use of the word “gender” ignores other dimensions of gender, sexual orientation, and sexual identity. The aff’s use of the word “gender” ignores other dimensions of gender, sexual orientation, and sexual identity. The aff’s use of the word “gender” ignores other dimensions of gender, sexual orientation, and sexual identity. The aff’s use of the word “gender” ignores other dimensions of gender, sexual orientation, and sexual identity. The aff’s use of the word “gender” ignores other dimensions of gender, sexual orientation, and sexual identity. The aff’s use of the word “gender” ignores other dimensions of gender, sexual orientation, and sexual identity. The aff’s
Regulation can be said to have two faces – firstly, it is about the supervision of provision on behalf of the public and secondly, it contains within it a notion of quality – in this context that being a notion of educational quality. Also, regulation concerns the provision of public sector type services (education, transport, health, and so on) even if those services are in fact delivered by the private sector.
The New York-Printz anti-commandeering rule is more plausibly defended on expressive grounds than on the grounds articulated by the Supreme Court – states secure certain values of federalism by serving as alternative political institutions to the national government; states must be vibrant in order to serve as credible alternative political institutions, and that the vibrancy of state political institutions is supported in part by public perceptions of the “autonomy” of states; and, states must be vibrant in order to serve as credible alternative political institutions, and that the vibrancy of state political institutions is supported in part by public perceptions of the “autonomy” of states; and, states must be vibrant in order to serve as credible alternative political institutions, and that the vibrancy of state political institutions is supported in part by public perceptions of the “autonomy” of states; and, states must be vibrant in order to serve as credible alternative political institutions, and that the
Criminal justice reform has become a bipartisan issue, but it often seems to be spoken of as being distinct from police brutality and police reform. How important is it to bring police reform into the broader context of criminal justice reform?
Organización Soriana, who with the Mexican company GEMEX and Swiss investor Grupo ECOS have formed the company Compaa Eólica de Tamaulipas S.A. de C.V. (CETSA), announce the closing of financing for the construction of its first wind energy project on the farm cooperative known as Ejido El Porvenir in Reynosa, Tamaulipas. The project consists of the installation of 30 wind turbines, each with a nominal capacity of 1.8 MW, which will be provided by the Danish company VESTAS, a worldwide supplier of wind turbines, as announced by Vestas Mediterranean on December 28, 2012. The project consists of the installation of 30 wind turbines, each with a nominal capacity of 1.8 MW, which will be provided by the Danish company VESTAS, a worldwide supplier of wind turbines,
Lack of a robust health workforce undermines effective domestic health systems and global public health interventions in resource-poor countries ravaged by disease and suffering from poor environmental and social determinants of health. Lack of a robust health workforce operating in stable delivery infrastructure undermines effective domestic health systems and global public health interventions in resource-poor countries ravaged by disease and suffering from poor environmental and social determinants of health. Lack of a robust health workforce operating in stable delivery infrastructure undermines effective domestic health systems and global public health interventions in resource-poor countries ravaged by disease and suffering from poor environmental and social determinants of health. Lack of a robust health workforce operating in stable delivery infrastructure undermines effective domestic health systems and global public health interventions in resource-poor countries ravaged by disease and suffering from poor environmental and social determinants of health. Lack of a robust health workforce operating in stable delivery infrastructure undermines effective domestic health
Small hydro power plants with small reservoirs require real-time reaction to fulfill the goals of maintaining the lake levels close to specified references and to preferentially produce energy during demanded (peak) hours. The current research tackles the control problems of systems composed of small hydro-power plants with small reservoirs that are located on the same river or interconnected rivers that compose a system. The small volumes of the reservoirs relative to the hydro-turbine required working flows make these plants very dynamic and require real-time reaction to fulfill the goals of maintaining the lake levels close to specified references and to preferentially produce energy during demanded (peak) hours. Due to the insufficient input flow and the efficiency requirement the power-generator could not work continuously. Any hydro-power plant is highly disturbed by the large variable input flows as consequence of rains and upstream plant working times. The cooperation of the plant controllers could diminish the highly variable disturbances and improve the
Negotiated rulemaking is a front-end add-on to a regulatory rulemaking that seeks to head off possible objections to regulations by including affected stakeholders in the development of the rule. The EPA created an office to facilitate the redevelopment of “brownfields,” or lands that in some way suffer from the taint of contamination by hazardous substances, and therefore remain undeveloped because of the fear of CERCLA liability. The mere threat of liability is enough to scare away potential developers. Tax breaks, liability relief, and other incentives aimed at defraying the cost of cleanup have been proposed as incentives to stimulate the redevelopment of such properties. The mere threat of liability is enough to scare away potential developers. The EPA created an office to facilitate the redevelopment of “brownfields,” or lands that in some way suffer from the taint of contamination by hazardous substances, and
Russia and China signed a space alliance to protect their interstellar rights, promote peaceful space exploration, and further the development of interstellar vehicles, reports SpaceDaily. “The US wants to preserve its monopoly in regulating space traffic, but Russia has been rebuffed by the US space agency, so in retribution they’ve threatened to publicize the location of US military satellites, reports SpaceDaily. “The US wants to preserve its monopoly in regulating space traffic, but Russia has been rebuffed by the US space agency, so in retribution they’ve threatened to publicize the location of US military satellites, reports SpaceDaily. “The US wants to preserve its monopoly in regulating space traffic, but Russia has been rebuffed by the US space agency, so in retribution they’ve threatened to publicize the location of US
Disengaged from the intensive continuity of war, the time of violence dilates and fi nishes by coinciding, through unfathomable intermittence, with the banal dimensions of daily life: a sort of homicidal version of so-called glocal. TH e object of looming destruction that menaces him everywhere and anyhow, the defenseless person becomes the fi gure of a vulnerability the more perfect in that it is chance that makes him into an exemplary victim. TH e object of looming destruction that menaces him everywhere and anyhow, the defenseless person becomes the fi gure of a vulnerability the more perfect in that it is chance that makes him into an exemplary victim. TH e object of looming destruction that menaces him everywhere and anyhow, the defenseless person becomes the fi gure of a vulnerability the more
Energy efficiency is key to sustainable growth – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole system approach – it’s necessary to take a whole
China is too important to be left to the Chinese hands – a “Shanghai coalition” made up of scholars and interests that receive material benefits or other “psychic rewards” from favoring engagement is speeding the day when China will emerge as Asia’s preponderant power
Allowing private parties to rely on assurances that federal law won’t apply to them isn’t a reversal of the separation of powers principle – relying on assurances that federal law won’t apply to them isn’t a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a re
Substantially, as used in ADA provision defining disability as impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities, suggests “considerable” or “to a large degree,” and word “substantial” thus clearly precludes impairments that interfere in only minor way with performance of manual tasks from qualifying as disabilities.
The Internet hasn’t collapsed, never to be rebooted – it’s a transportation system that transports data – e-mail, newsgroups, gopher, and FTP, and e-mail numbers are in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages, and spam is in the trillions of messages
Roe v. Wade is in absolute danger of being overturned, thanks to Justice Anthony Kennedy’s retirement. The right is planning on it, and we have to move forward knowing the consequences should such a horror happen. Women will die from illegal abortions – as they did before – and most of those women will be imprisoned for trying to end their pregnancies – as they did before – and most of those women will be imprisoned for trying to end their pregnancies – as they did before – and most of those women will be imprisoned for trying to end their pregnancies – as they did before – and most of those women will be imprisoned for trying to end their pregnancies – as they did before – and most of those women will be imprisoned for trying to end their pregnancies – as they did before
The CO2 concentration in the atmosphere can be limited to a doubling—from about 280 parts per million (ppm) in the pre-industrial era to 560 ppm in the future (we’re currently at about 400 ppm)—the IPCC assessment estimated with “high confidence” that Earth’s temperature will reach an equilibrium somewhere between 1.5 and 4.5 degrees Celsius above pre-industrial temperatures. The CO2 concentration in the atmosphere can be limited to a doubling—from about 280 parts per million (ppm) in the pre-industrial era to 560 ppm in the future (we’re currently at about 400 ppm)—the IPCC assessment estimated with “high confidence” that Earth’s temperature will reach an equilibrium somewhere between 1.5 and 4.5 degrees Celsius above pre-industrial temperatures. However, the IPCC assessment estimated with “high confidence” that Earth’s temperature will reach an equilibrium somewhere
Google is working with a number of car suppliers to build a fleet of 'beta one' cars, which will be more advanced than the dinky prototypes we’ve already seen in action
“Bona fide relationship” isn’t a political issue – it’s a legal question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one. It’s a political question, not a political one.
TANF purchases only add up to less than a percent of all benefit transactions – only two-tenths of 1 percent of total purchases and ATM withdrawals
Turning race into a fixed and stable entity would strip the category of the very dyna mism that the student movements helped to reveal. Turning race into a fixed and stable entity would strip the category of the very dyna mism that the student movements helped to reveal. Turning race into a fixed and stable entity would strip the category of the very dyna mism that the student movements helped to reveal. Turning race into a fixed and stable entity would strip the category of the very dyna mism that the student movements helped to reveal. Turning race into a fixed and stable entity would strip the category of the very dyna mism that the student movements helped to reveal. Turning race into a fixed and stable entity would strip the category of the very dyna mism that the student movements helped to reveal. Turning race into a fixed and stable entity would strip the category of the very dyna mism that the student movements helped
PFAS contamination in drinking water is so widespread that 99% of the population has at least one PFAS chemical in their bloodstream. 177Babies, who are the most affected by chemical exposures due to their low body mass, have been born with PFAS in their bloodstream. 178Humans cannot survive without consuming water, and there is no way to completely avoid exposure. 179 Individuals have been robbed of their ability to make decisions about what they want to put into their bodies because the federal government decided to allow manufacturers to continue to proliferate thousands of PFAS into the market for decades when it had knowledge that the chemicals posed a threat to health. 179 Individuals have been robbed of their ability to make decisions about what they want to put into their bodies because the federal government decided to allow manufacturers to continue to proliferate thousands of PFAS into the market for decades when it had
Oil prices are rising and there’s a demand/supply imbalance – speculators will make or lose money depending on how fundamental supply and demand factors play out – if prices are too low for too long, a shortage will undoubtedly develop, throwing a terrible wrench into the world’s economy – if prices are too low for too long, a shortage will undoubtedly develop, throwing a terrible wrench into the world’s economy – if prices are too low for too long, a shortage will undoubtedly develop, throwing a terrible wrench into the world’s economy – if prices are too low for too long, a shortage will undoubtedly develop, throwing a terrible wrench into the world’s economy – if prices are too low for too long, a shortage will undoubtedly develop, throwing a terrible wrench into the world’s economy – if prices are too low for
The prison is like a factory producing proletarians who have learnt to accept being propertyless without threatening the institution of private property. The point is to create a socially safe proletarian, that is, someone who has learnt to accept being propertyless without threatening the institution of private property. The point is to create a socially safe proletarian, that is, someone who has learnt to accept being propertyless without threatening the institution of private property.14 The capitalist organization of labour shapes the form of the prison as it does all other institutions – the entire system of social control is modelled on the relations of production. The only changes are those required by the evolving exigencies of capitalism: changes in the mode of production, fiscal crises, phases of unemployment, the requirements of capital. Throughout the story line, stated intentions are more or less irrelevant or only of derivative status. 
Violence ravaging Kenya is being planned and directed by political elites – the term “ethnic” is unwittingly framed as a result of ancient, hardened, immutable social divisions that spontaneously flare up from time to time – the term “riot” is unwittingly framed as a result of ancient, hardened, immutable social divisions that spontaneously flare up from time to time – the term “riot” is unwittingly framed as a result of ancient, hardened, immutable social divisions that spontaneously flare up from time to time – the term “riot” is unwittingly framed as a result of ancient, hardened, immutable social divisions that spontaneously flare up from time to time – the term “riot” is unwittingly framed as a result of ancient, hardened, immutable social
Oil prices have a direct impact on the domestic stability of petrostates – escalation of geopolitical tensions and escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of escalation of
Ossoff’s loss reopens the internal divides within the Democratic party that was revived in the aftermath of Hillary Clinton’s shock defeat in 2016 and reopens the internal divides within the Democratic party that was revived in the aftermath of Hillary Clinton’s shock defeat in 2016 and reopens the internal divides within the Democratic party that was revived in the aftermath of Hillary Clinton’s shock defeat in 2016 and reopens the internal divides within the Democratic party that was revived in the aftermath of Hillary Clinton’s shock defeat in 2016 and reopens the internal divides within the Democratic party that was revived in the aftermath of Hillary Clinton’s shock defeat in 2016 and reopens the internal divides within the Democratic party that was revived in the aftermath of Hillary Clinton’s shock defeat in 2016 and reopens the internal divides within the Democratic party that was revived in the aftermath
A jurisprudence is a theory of the relation between life and law. In life, “woman” and “man” are widely experienced as features of being, not constructs of perception, cultural interventions, or forced identities. Gender is lived as ontology, not as epistemology. Law is a particular potent source and badge of legitimacy, and site and cloak of force. When life becomes law in such a system, the transformation is both formal and substantive. It reenters life marked by power. In male supremacist societies, the male standpoint dominates civil society in the form of the objective standard that standpoint, which, because it dominates in the world, does not appear to function as a standpoint at all. Under its aegis, men dominate women and children, three-quarters of the world. Under its aegis, men dominate women and children, three-quarter
NSA Director General Keith Alexander’s claims don’t wash – he’s guilty of multiple counts of perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury, perjury,
THAAD is a tradeable commodity in “doing good deals” between the “big boys” – it’s a tradeable commodity in “doing good deals” between the “big boys” – it’s a tradeable commodity in “doing good deals” between the “big boys” – it’s a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable commodity in a tradeable
The U.S. has only one-fourth of the world’s college-educated adults – 1 in 6 adults in the United States did not have a high school diploma, and 46 percent had only a high school diploma or less. America’s educational problems begin in elementary and secondary schools. High quality pre-kindergarten has a proven record in effectively helping small children to be school-ready and to succeed in school and in life, but state programs are available to less than 18 percent of the nation’s three and four year olds. High quality pre-kindergarten has a proven record in effectively helping small children to be school-ready and to succeed in school and in life, but state programs are available to less than 18 percent of the nation’s three and four year olds. High quality pre-kindergarten has a proven record in effectively helping small children to be school-ready and to succeed in school and in life,
Amazon river dolphins haven’t done well in captivity – their sleep deprivation is a result of a lack of boundaries that allow them to rest in the arms of the river, in her mothering flow, supported by the boundaries we need to fully rest. I want that for you. I want that for me. All this time that I have been half-awake, I have been dreaming of a world that could deserve you. They told me it was a hallucination, this waking dream I want for you and for me. All this time that I have been half-awake, I have been dreaming of a world that could deserve you. They told me it was a hallucination, this waking dream I want for you and for me. Can we imagine a world where we are all safe enough to sleep held in the arms of the river, in her mothering flow,
A person convicted of a crime does not escape the consequences of that conviction just because time passes or the behavior is decriminalized – a person convicted of a crime does not escape the consequences of that conviction just because time passes or the behavior is decriminalized – a person convicted of a crime does not escape the consequences of that conviction just because time passes or the behavior is decriminalized – a person convicted of a crime does not escape the consequences of that conviction just because time passes or the behavior is decriminalized – a person convicted of a crime does not escape the consequences of that conviction just because time passes or the behavior is decriminalized – a person convicted of a crime does not escape the consequences of that conviction just because time passes or the behavior is decriminalized – a person convicted of a crime does not escape the consequences of
Negotiating a transatlantic free trade agreement with Canada and Mexico would be a major economic and strategic accomplishment; so, too, would be negotiating and implementing a NAFTA 2.0 that would more closely link the United States with its immediate neighbors so as to better manage shared interests related to trade and investment, security, energy, infrastructure, and the flow of people, and would be negotiating and implementing a NAFTA 2.0 that would more closely link the United States with its immediate neighbors so as to better manage shared interests related to trade and investment, security, energy, infrastructure, and the flow of people, and would be negotiating and implementing a NAFTA 2.0 that would more closely link the United States with its immediate neighbors so as to better manage shared interests related to trade and investment, security, energy, infrastructure, and the flow of people, and would be negotiating and implementing a NAFTA 2.0 that would more closely link the United
There’s a finite amount of carbon you can burn if you don’t want to go over 2C and there’s a finite amount of carbon you can burn if you don’t want to go over 2C and there’s a finite amount of carbon you can burn if you don’t want to go over 2C and there’s a finite amount of carbon you can burn if you don’t want to go over 2C and there’s a finite amount of carbon you can burn if you don’t want to go over 2C and there’s a finite amount of carbon you can burn if you don’t want to go over 2C and there’s a finite amount of carbon you can burn if you don’t want to go over 2C and there’s a finite amount of carbon you can burn if you don’
The all-volunteer force has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never been able to mobilize for war without adequate social welfare for its populace – it has never
“Perpetual growth is possible while sucking dry its petri dish.” This is an example of the failures of old-school environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental thinking – it’s an example of the failures of “old-school” environmental
The risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk or possibility of nuclear catastrophe was secondary to the importance of surviving it – the risk
The Asian Infrastructure Investment Bank and the US-dominated Asian Development Bank have signed an agreement to co-finance a dozen projects in sectors including transport, water and energy in Central Asia, South Asia, and East Asia. The two banks are discussing nearly a dozen cofinanced projects in sectors including transport, water and energy in Central Asia, South Asia, and East Asia. The two banks are discussing nearly a dozen cofinanced projects in sectors including transport, water and energy in Central Asia, South Asia, and East Asia. The two banks are discussing nearly a dozen cofinanced projects in sectors including transport, water and energy in Central Asia, South Asia, and East Asia. The two banks are discussing nearly a dozen cofinanced projects in sectors including transport, water and energy in Central Asia, South Asia, and East Asia. The two banks are discussing nearly a dozen cofinanced projects in sectors including transport, water and energy in Central Asia, South Asia, and East Asia
The U.S. will continue to make good progress on its commitments, even without a federal mandate, even without a federal mandate. The CPP provides a great deal of leverage for the U.S. in Paris, even without a federal mandate. The CPP requires states to reduce carbon pollution from power plants, but it allows states a great deal of flexibility in how they can meet their individual state targets, including joining emissions trading schemes or multistate compacts. The CPP requires states to reduce carbon pollution from power plants, but it allows states a great deal of flexibility in how they can meet their individual state targets, including joining emissions trading schemes or multistate compacts. The CPP requires states to reduce carbon pollution from power plants, but it allows states a great deal of flexibility in how they can meet their individual state targets, including joining emissions trading schemes or multistate compacts. The CPP provides a great deal of leverage for the
U.S. engagement with PLA negotiators isn’t effective – they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises – they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises – they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises, they don’t have the ability to deescalate crises
Malaysian officials confirmed that Flight MH370 crashed in the South Indian Ocean, implying the aircraft traversed thousands of miles untracked from its intended destination in Beijing. Malaysian officials confirmed on 24 March that new satellite data indicates that Flight MH370 crashed in the South Indian Ocean, implying the aircraft traversed thousands of miles untracked from its intended destination in Beijing. The US Navy has budgeted $4 million to devote search aircraft, including the Boeing P-8A Poseidon, and other equipment to the hunt for the wreckage. “There’s a role for Congress here particularly when you consider the expense we’re going through to find this plane,” says Rep Adam Schiff, a Democrat from California. “I’d like – expect – to have the Congress hold hearings with the NTSB and the FAA to find out what is the state of technology, how quickly are we moving to satellite
The FBI made the Occupy movement look like a threat to the republic if they had scripted a plan to blow up a bridge, led them to a arms merchant, and drove the team to the bomb site – the plan was a dud – federal agents have had to talk into embracing violence in the first place – not of terrorist suspects, but of young men federal agents have had to talk into embracing violence in the first place – not of terrorist suspects, but of young men federal agents have had to talk into embracing violence in the first place – not of terrorist suspects, but of young men federal agents have had to talk into embracing violence in the first place – not of terrorist suspects, but of young men federal agents have had to talk into embracing violence in the first place – not of terrorist suspects, but of young men federal agents have had to talk into embracing
The “precautionary principle,” which states that, for any activity that poses a possible threat to human health or the environment, precautionary measures should be taken even if the threat is not fully established scientifically, even if the threat is not fully established scientifically, even if the threat is not fully established scientifically, the “precautionary principle,” which states that, for any activity that poses a possible threat to human health or the environment, precautionary measures should be taken even if the threat is not fully established scientifically, even if the threat is not fully established scientifically, the “precautionary principle,” which states that, for any activity that poses a possible threat to human health or the environment, precautionary measures should be taken even if the threat is not fully established scientifically, even if the threat is not fully established scientifically, the “precautionary principle,” which states that, for any
The war in Yemen has been largely ignored by the media in favor of 24-hour coverage of President Trump’s foibles – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they’ve already made the argument that the conflict is morally and strategically bankrupt – they
Climate change causes conflict in the receiving area – causes lateral pressure, expansion of economic and political activities beyond the region’s or state’s borders, expansion of economic and political activities beyond the region’s or state’s borders, and causes lateral pressure, expansion of economic and political activities beyond the region’s or state’s borders, and causes lateral pressure, expansion of economic and political activities beyond the region’s or state’s borders, and causes lateral pressure, expansion of economic and political activities beyond the region’s or state’s borders, and causes lateral pressure, expansion of economic and political activities beyond the region’s or state’s borders, and causes lateral pressure, expansion of economic and political activities beyond the region’s or state’s borders, and causes lateral pressure, expansion of economic and political activities beyond the region’s or state’s borders, and causes lateral pressure, expansion of economic and political activities beyond
Immigrants play an outsize role in U.S. fertility, accounting for almost one-fourth (23%) of babies born in the United States (but just 14% of the overall population)
Critique of privilege perpetuates the invisibility and naturalization of power relations, which perpetuates the invisibility and naturalization of structural inequalities and creates internalized superiority in those who can, and typically do, assume that the advantages of privilege and their practices of domination are just the way things are. 
The Arctic Council is a fit venue to discuss peace and security in the region – it includes the world’s two largest nuclear superpowers and includes the indigenous peoples who call this territory their homeland. 
Israel still hopes to strike a deal on Palestine, but has yet to understand that no Palestinian state would ever consent to peaceful coexistence with Israel – Palestine could have a starkly injurious impact on Israel’s nuclear deterrence options and, ultimately, on the shape of war and terror in the Middle East.
Spaceflight isn’t a priority for NASA – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical costs – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical costs – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical costs – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical costs – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical costs – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical costs – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical costs – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical costs – it’s a way to draw attention from that agency’s truly astronomical
Legalizing marijuana for recreational use is a win for all involved – it’s a win for all involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved – it’s a win for everyone involved
“Islamist extremism is a result of the desire of corrupt and oppressive rulers to maintain themselves in power – it’s a result of the desire of corrupt and oppressive rulers to maintain themselves in power – it’s a result of the desire of corrupt and oppressive rulers to maintain themselves in power – it’s a result of the desire of corrupt and oppressive rulers to maintain themselves in power – it’s a result of the desire of corrupt and oppressive rulers to maintain themselves in power – it’s a result of the desire of corrupt and oppressive rulers to maintain themselves in power – it’s a result of the desire of corrupt and oppressive rulers to maintain themselves in power – it’s a result of the desire of corrupt and oppressive rulers to maintain themselves in power – it’s a result of the desire of corrupt and
                                                                                                   
Venezuela will maintain its oil industry tax and legal framework under the leadership of Nicolas Maduro, the OPEC nation’s oil minister said on Friday to reassure foreign investors after the death of President Hugo Chavez. “While our government is here and the people remain in charge, our oil policy will remain unchanged,” Ramirez said outside the National Assembly, where Maduro was being inaugurated as acting leader on Friday ahead of a new presidential election due in weeks. “While our government is here and the people remain in charge, our oil policy will remain unchanged,” Ramirez said outside the National Assembly, where Maduro was being inaugurated as acting leader on Friday ahead of a new presidential election due in weeks. “While our government is here and the people remain in charge, our oil policy will remain unchanged,” Ramirez said outside the National Assembly, where Maduro was being inaugurated as acting leader on Friday ahead of a new presidential
The MTCR is an informal political understanding among states that seeks to limit the proliferation of missiles and missile technology – the MTCR is not a treaty – it is an informal political understanding among states that seeks to limit the proliferation of missiles and missile technology – the MTCR is an informal political understanding among states that seeks to limit the proliferation of missiles and missile technology – the MTCR is an informal political understanding among states that seeks to limit the proliferation of missiles and missile technology – the MTCR is an informal political understanding among states that seeks to limit the proliferation of missiles and missile technology – the MTCR is an informal political understanding among states that seeks to limit the proliferation of missiles and missile technology – the MTCR is an informal political understanding among states that seeks to limit the proliferation of missiles and missile technology – the MTCR is an informal political understanding
Taiwan’s membership in the TPP is inherently in the interests of the 12 founding nations, particularly the US and Japan, not just in monetary terms, but also in geostrategic interests. Taiwan’s membership in the TPP is inherently in the interests of the 12 founding nations, particularly the US and Japan, not just in monetary terms, but also in geostrategic interests. Overby said that Taiwan’s membership in the TPP is inherently in the interests of the 12 founding nations, particularly the US and Japan, not just in monetary terms, but also in geostrategic interests. Overby said that Taiwan’s membership in the TPP is inherently in the interests of the 12 founding nations, particularly the US and Japan, not just in monetary terms, but also in geostrategic interests. Overby said that Taiwan’s membership in the TPP is inherently in the interests of the
The threat that terrorist hubs based in failed states pose to the United States and to its allies escalates dramatically if those hubs can get access to nuclear weapons
On Tuesday, the Georgia Supreme Court upheld the murder convictions and life sentences of those responsible for three especially heinous crimes: Edward Wallace had earlier been found guilty of robbing and fatally shooting Kyle Moore, 17, as he waited for a MARTA bus, pumping numerous bullets into him after he was already on the ground. Moore was a star football player at Washington High School in Atlanta and was being recruited by Harvard, Brown, and other colleges. The day after the shooting Wallace brazenly returned to the murder scene and signed a “signature page” next to a photo of the deceased that had been erected at the site by Moore’s family. Moore was a star football player at Washington High School in Atlanta and was being recruited by Harvard, Brown, and other colleges. The day after the shooting Wallace brazenly returned to the murder scene and signed a “signature page” next to
The Global Times is a propaganda rag whose views should be discounted, but everyone else needs to take a deep breath and relax.  Global Times is a propaganda rag whose views should be discounted, but everyone else needs to take a deep breath and relax.  Global Times is a propaganda rag whose views should be discounted, but everyone else needs to take a deep breath and relax.  Global Times is a propaganda rag whose views should be discounted, but everyone else needs to take a deep breath and relax.  Global Times is a propaganda rag whose views should be discounted, but everyone else needs to take a deep breath and relax.  Global Times is a propaganda rag whose views should be discounted, but everyone else needs to take a deep breath and relax.  Global Times is a propaganda rag whose views should be discounted, but everyone else needs
If you were bright -- and gifted in science and engineering -- the H-1B visa was your ticket to the United States. But maybe not for long... The lottery for such “high-skilled” worker visas opened Monday, with the 85,000 slots expected to go to Indian workers, as they have in recent years... Nearly three quarters of the visas are expected to go to Indian workers, as they have in recent years... Nearly three-quarters of the visas are expected to go to Indian workers, as they have in recent years... Nearly three-quarters of the visas are expected to go to Indian workers, as they have in recent years... Nearly three-quarters of the visas are expected to go to Indian workers, as they have in recent years...
The aff’s focus on the state creates the illusion that states have impenetrable walls, that they have an inside and an outside, and that nothing ever passes through. The aff’s focus on the state creates the illusion that states have impenetrable walls, that they have an inside and an outside, and that nothing ever passes through. The aff’s focus on the state creates the illusion that states have impenetrable walls, that they have an inside and an outside, and that nothing ever passes through. The aff’s focus on the state creates the illusion that states have impenetrable walls, that they have an inside and an outside, and that nothing ever passes through. The aff’s focus on the state creates the illusion that states have impenetrable walls, that they have an inside and an outside, and that nothing ever passes through. The aff’s
Arming Ukraine with anti-tank missiles triggers a disproportionate response from the Russians – it’s a vicious iteration of Robert Jervis’s spiral model
The U.S. will pull back from the world stage as a result of the financial crisis – it will lead to a collapse of the world’s financial architecture, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, a collapse of the world’s financial architecture, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, a collapse of the world’s economic and geopolitical structures, and a collapse of the world’
OTEC isn’t a panacea – increasing fossil fuel prices, increasing demand for clean and renewable energy, and the potential for OTEC to alleviate food and water security issues suggest that the time is right to revisit OTEC.
Iberdrola Renewables and Iberdrola Renewables are key to the success of the Copper Crossing solar project in Arizona
Biden says GOP efforts to limit voting rights are “sick” and “un-American,” vowing to prevent states from taking what he calls “despicable” actions that undermine democracy by making it harder for people to cast ballots.
Prosecutors are political creatures, who get political rewards for locking people up and almost unlimited power to do it. Pfaff has a simple explanation: it’s prosecutors. They are political creatures, who get political rewards for locking people up and almost unlimited power to do it. Pfaff has a simple explanation: it’s prosecutors. They are political creatures, who get political rewards for locking people up and almost unlimited power to do it. Pfaff has a simple explanation: it’s prosecutors. They are political creatures, who get political rewards for locking people up and almost unlimited power to do it. Pfaff has a simple explanation: it’s prosecutors. They are political creatures, who get political rewards for locking people up and almost unlimited power to do it. Pfaff has a simple explanation: it’s prosecutors. They are political creatures, who get political rewards for locking people up and almost unlimited
Exports and imports are split equally between developing and developing countries – exports and imports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between developing and developing countries and exports are split equally between
Productivity growth isn’t the primary cause of manufacturing job loss – it’s a result of trade deficits in manufacturing products prior to the Great Recession and then the massive output collapse during the Great Recession – only 900,000 of the 2.3 million net manufacturing jobs lost during the Great Recession have been recovered – only about 900,000 of the 2.3 million net manufacturing jobs lost during the Great Recession have been recovered – only about 900,000 of the 2.3 million net manufacturing jobs lost during the Great Recession have been recovered – only about 900,000 of the 2.3 million net manufacturing jobs lost during the Great Recession have been recovered – only about 900,000 of the 2.3 million net manufacturing jobs lost during the Great Recession have been recovered – only about 900,000 of the 2.3 million net manufacturing jobs lost during the Great Recession have been recovered – only about 
There’s a critical mass of support for NATO intervention in Ukraine – a no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-fly zone, no-
There’s a backlog of visas for Afghans working with U.S. forces – there’s a backlog of visas for translators, interpreters, and those who “perform sensitive and trusted activities”—there’s a backlog of visas for translators, interpreters, and those who perform sensitive and trusted activities—there’s a backlog of visas for translators, interpreters, and those who perform sensitive and trusted activities—there’s a backlog of visas for translators, interpreters, and those who perform sensitive and trusted activities—there’s a backlog of visas for translators, interpreters, and those who perform sensitive and trusted activities—there’s a backlog of visas for translators, interpreters, and those who perform sensitive and trusted activities—there’s a backlog of visas for translators, interpreters, and those
GE crops have a positive impact on biodiversity – increasing yields, decreasing insecticide use, and facilitating adoption of conservation tillage
The 111th Congress is a unique opportunity for the federal government to expand its role in climate change mitigation by drawing lessons from an expansive body of state and local policy experience generated over the past decade. This moment also opened a possibility for an intergovernmental partnership that might sort out respective functions and consider ways to either share governance responsibilities across government levels or concentrate select responsibilities within specific levels. Indeed, there is ample precedent in American government whereby state experimentation sets the stage for a more blended system, including a number of areas relevant to environmental protection. The American Clean Energy and Security Act, passed by a 219–212 vote in the House of Representatives in June 2009, was later withdrawn from serious consideration. Its 1,482-page text included a dizzying array of policy provisions, far short of a coherent approach to sorting out intergovernmental responsibilities or building federal law on the basis of actual state and local experience in climate policy implementation
Deleuze is only able to fulfill his magical formula, “PLURALISM = MONISM” by subordinating the organism to the process of creation itself, which creates the plurality which Deleuze wishes on the surface to take account of, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce creation to pure actuality itself, for to do so would be to reduce
Tourism helps conservation of wildlife and natural resources such as rain forests, as these are now regarded as tourism assets. It also helps generate funding for maintaining animal preserves and marine parks through entrance charges and guide fees. By creating alternative sources of employment, tourism reduces problems such as over-fishing and deforestation in developing nations.
The Occupy movement is a glimmer of sanity – it reminds us of how a crisis caused by the banks has been cynically transformed into a crisis of public spending. The Occupy movement is a glimmer of sanity – it reminds us of how a crisis caused by the banks has been cynically transformed into a crisis of public spending. The Occupy movement is a glimmer of sanity – it reminds us of how a crisis caused by the banks has been cynically transformed into a crisis of public spending. The Occupy movement is a glimmer of sanity – it reminds us of how a crisis caused by the banks has been cynically transformed into a crisis of public spending. The Occup
Federal involvement in police reform is key to solve the national scope of police misconduct – states and local entities are in a position best suited to determine the frailties of their local police departments – states and local entities are in a position best suited to determine the frailties of their local police departments – states and local entities are in a position best suited to determine the frailties of their local police departments – states and local entities are in a position best suited to determine the frailties of their local police departments – states and local entities are in a position best suited to determine the frailties of their local police departments – states and local entities are in a position best suited to determine the frailties of their local police departments – states and local entities are in a position best suited to determine the frailties of their local police departments – states and local entities are in a
It is not clear which form the base of a space elevator shall have, but it may have the form of artificial islands, installations and structures in the exclusive economic zone, the coastal state has the exclusive right to construct and authorize and regulate the construction, operation and use of: a) artificial islands; b) installations and structures which may interfere with the exercise of the rights of the coastal State in the zone; c) installations and structures which may interfere with the exercise of the rights of the coastal State in the zone; d) artificial islands, installations and structures which may interfere with the exercise of the rights of the coastal State in the zone; e) artificial islands, installations and structures which may interfere with the exercise of the rights of the coastal State in the zone; f) artificial islands, installations and structures which may interfere with the exercise of the rights of the coastal State in the zone; g) artificial islands, installations and structures which may interfere with the
Offshore aquaculture solves nutrient pollution and benthic effects – commercial farms will likely have 10 or more times this density in order to be economically viable – commercial salmon farms commonly stock 500,000 to a million fish at a site. It’s not a stretch to imagine a pattern similar to that of the US industrial livestock sector – commercial salmon farms commonly stock 500,000 to a million fish at a site – commercial salmon farms commonly stock 500,000 to a million fish at a site – commercial salmon farms commonly stock 500,000 to a million fish at a site – commercial salmon farms commonly stock 500,000 to a million fish at a site – commercial salmon farms commonly stock 500,000 to a million fish at a site – commercial salmon farms commonly stock 500,000 to a million fish at a site – commercial salmon farms commonly stock 500,000 to a million fish at a
Arms sales are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – arms sales are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to the U.S. defense industry – China, Russia, and Russia are key to
China is more afraid of the US than it is of North Korea – Trump would authorize a preemptive attack against the missile launch site (assuming it is an easily observable, liquid-fueled missile mated with a nuclear warhead onto the US) and perhaps against known nuclear weapons related facilities. This would trigger America’s mutual defense treaty commitments to defend South Korea and spark a series of classified, pre-planned U.S.-South Korean military operations. This would trigger America’s mutual defense treaty commitments to defend South Korea and spark a series of classified, pre-planned U.S.-South Korean military operations. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Reps. Angus King, I-Maine, and Mike Gallagher, R-Wis., called for the final bill to include cybersecurity measures that both USICA and America COMPETES share, as well as others contained in one bill or the other. Sen. Angus King, I-Maine, and Rep. Mike Gallagher, R-Wis., called for the final bill to include cybersecurity measures that both USICA and America COMPETES share, as well as others contained in one bill or the other. Sen. King and Gallagher, who co-chaired the Cyberspace Solarium Commission, sent a letter to Sen. Schumer and Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell, R-Ky., voicing their support for the $52 billion in CHIPS funding included in the bills, but said that the final bill should reflect the need for enhanced investment in cyber workforce and the nation’
(--) U.S. Congress fails to pass the production tax credit for wind, geothermal, and hydroelectric energy. 
The gendered critique of international law, including refugee law, has been an analysis of the public/private dichotomy. The terms ‘public’ and ‘private’ are used to refer both to the distinction between State and society, and to the distinction between non-domestic and domestic life.31 In both dichotomies, the State is conceived of as ‘public’, and the family, domestic and intimate life are viewed as ‘private’. It is an ideological distinction in so far as it presents society from a male perspective and ignores the political nature of the family.31 In both dichotomies, the State is conceived of as ‘public’, and the family, domestic and intimate life are viewed as ‘private’. It is an ideological distinction in so far as it presents society from a male perspective and ignores the political nature of the family.31 In both dichotomies, the
China’s rise constitutes the most serious geopolitical challenge facing the United States today. China’s economic renaissance since the 1980s has now positioned it to play a consequential rival to the United States as early as the end of this decade, at least when measured in purchasing power parity terms. China’s unique characteristics—being a continental size power, possessing a gigantic and technologically improving economy, having strategically advantageous location, and rapidly acquiring formidable military capabilities—add up quickly to make China a consequential rival to the United States as early as the end of this decade, at least when measured in purchasing power parity terms. China’s unique characteristics—being a continental size power, possessing a gigantic and technologically improving economy, having strategically advantageous location, and rapidly acquiring formidable military capabilities—add up quickly to make China a consequential rival to the United States as early as the end of this decade,
Relativism fails because meta-principles are not defined by the framework, but are the preconditions for meaning and the constraints upon what can be validly said. The underlying conditions of logical consistency and objectivity, our knowledge of Locoian physics and modern Western physics, our evidence from satellites allow us to judge truth in this matter. For example, assume a language, Loco, in which all Locoians believe the earth is a two dimensional plane. This belief, X is false, any outside observers who know Loco can correctly assert, in Loco, 'X is false' even though no native Locoian believes it is false even though no native Locoian believes it is false even though no native Locoian believes it is false even though no native Locoian believes it is false even though no native Locoian believes it is false even though no native Lo
GDP growth is a crude measure of good things that nearly everybody wants, including access to more and better food, longer and healthier lives, more educational opportunities, and greater scope for life choices. Ward and his colleagues are clearly right that there is only so much physical stuff on the Earth, but even they know that wealth is not created simply by using more stuff on the Earth, but even they know that wealth is not created simply by using more stuff on the Earth, but even they know that wealth is not created simply by using more stuff on the Earth, but even they know that wealth is not created simply by using more stuff on the Earth, but even they know that wealth is not created simply by using more stuff on the Earth, but even they know that wealth is not created simply by using more stuff on the Earth, but even they know that wealth is not created simply by using more stuff on the Earth, but even they know that wealth is not created simply by using more stuff on the
DOD needs to rebuild the readiness of the military, and modernize its systems and equipment to address future threats. Reductions in the size and capability of the military, as well as 19 years of conflict, have degraded US military readiness. To adapt to growing threats posed by major powers (such as China and Russia) and other adversaries, the Department of Defense must make urgent changes. However, senior DOD leaders are not getting the information they need to make important decisions because military analyses largely support the status quo. Additionally, the Army is developing Next Generation Combat Vehicles to provide more firepower, protection, and mobility. The Army is also developing Next Generation Combat Vehicles to provide more firepower, protection, and mobility. The Navy has had systemic maintenance issues with every type of ship that it has built—which will cost billions more to repair than expected. Additionally, the poor condition of Navy shipyards and aviation maintenance facilities have impeded
Land et al. (2009), consistent with Zimmerman (2004), concluded that the actual announcement of the impending execution provides the deterrent effect. However, this contradicts studies conducted by criminologists and economists that have found little support for a relationship between homicide and the media announcement of an impending execution or a completed execution (Bailey, 1990, 1998; Hjalmarsson, 2009; King, 1978; Peterson & Bailey, 1991; Phillips, 1980; Stolzenberg & D’Alessio, 2004).
Terrorism isn’t a threat to national security – whistleblowers and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblowers should be part of the Intelligence and Security Committee and whistleblower
Hugo Chavez’s “Socialist Revolution” is based on capitalist cash – oil sales to the US are 80% of foreign revenues and 60% of all oil sales are directly to the US. No more revolution, no more “Bush The Devil” chants at the United Nations, and South America’s oil reserves will be back under a stable government. 
The aff’s ad hoc subordination to executive policy undermines the basic structure of the Constitution – the aff’s deference to the political organs ignores the undifferentiated mass that “the people” are the same undifferentiated mass that “historically, unmistakably and, at times, militantly insisted that when executive power immediately threatens personal liberty, a judicial remedy must be available to ensure that when executive power immediately threatens personal liberty, a judicial remedy must be available to ensure that when executive power immediately threatens personal liberty, a judicial remedy must be available to ensure that when executive power immediately threatens personal liberty, a judicial remedy must be available to ensure that when executive power immediately threatens personal liberty, a judicial remedy must be available to ensure that when executive power immediately threatens personal liberty, a judicial remedy must be available to ensure that when executive
D.C. 82, 598 F.2d 1 (D.C.Cir. 1978) Unlike Halkin v. Helms, 194 U.S. App. D.C. 82, 598 F.2d 1 (D.C.Cir. 1978), on which the Government so heavily relies, these documents do not strictly concern past and ongoing foreign intelligence gathering. The Government asserts that although the plaintiffs are interested only in domestic surveillance of domestic activities, the procedures described by the regulations and manual at issue also applied to foreign intelligence conducted both in this country and abroad. Unlike Halkin v. Helms, 194 U.S. App. D.C. 82, 598 F.2d 1 (D.C.Cir. 1978), on which the Government so heavily relies, these documents do not strictly concern past and ongoing foreign intelligence gathering. The Government assert
The aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’
Oil prices don’t have a negative impact on Russia’s economy
Despite neoliberal policies, labor trafficking is a blatant and widespread violation of human rights. Our analysis proves that neoliberal policies create a permissive environment for labor trafficking. Our analysis proves that neoliberal policies in general, as measured by the Economic Freedom Index, are positively and significantly related to labor trafficking at the source and destination stages, and are also conducive to trafficking within a country. Our analysis proves that neoliberal policies in general, as measured by the Economic Freedom Index, are positively and significantly related to labor trafficking at the source and destination stages, and are also conducive to trafficking within a country. Our analysis proves that neoliberal policies in general, as measured by the Economic Freedom Index, are positively and significantly related to labor trafficking at the source and destination stages, and are also conducive to traffic
The current distribution of the world’s people in relation to the productive capacity of the land over which they have control is extremely disparate and becoming more so all the time. The current distribution of the world’s people in relation to the productive capacity of the land over which they have control is extremely disparate and becoming more so all the time. The fossil fuels and minerals of the earth would require similar redistribution of people or by redistributing the products of their labour in relation to the basic needs of each person. The fossil fuels and minerals of the earth would have to be treated as world resources to be divided up among the entire human family. Nothing could be more evident than that none of these changes has the remotest possibility of coming about in the foreseeable future. The current distribution of the world’s people in relation to the productive capacity of the land over which they have control is extremely disparate and becoming more so all the time. The fossil fuels
The U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment – the U.S. Navy is committed to being responsible stewards of the environment –
More than 1,258,182 students enrolled in public school across the country were homeless, according to the data released Monday. That’s an 8 percent increase from the previous school year, and more than an 85 percent increase from the 2006-07 school year. Of those more than 1.25 million students, 75,940 are unaccompanied youths, meaning they were living on their own. The staggering increase in the number of homeless students happened during the height of the Great Recession, when the unemployment rate as well as the number of home foreclosures and personal bankruptcies soared. Until this year, the number of unaccompanied youths had only been reported for school districts that received subgrants from the McKinney-Vento Education for Homeless Children and Youth program – federal aid that states distribute to school districts on a competitive basis. Until this year, the number of unaccompanied youths was only reported for school districts
It’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize the economy – it’s impossible to decarbonize
Regulation is an edict that limits the free market, sometimes in efficiencyenhancing ways, sometimes in ways that are adverse to efficiency. In the context of e-learning, regulation can refer to internal and/or external forces of constraint that deal with systems, institutions, faculty, students, and so forth. In the context of e-learning, regulation can refer to internal and/or external forces of constraint that deal with systems, institutions, faculty, students, and so forth. In the context of e-learning, regulation can refer to internal and/or external forces of constraint that deal with systems, institutions, faculty, students, and so forth. In the context of e-learning, regulation can refer to internal and/or external forces of constraint that deal with systems, institutions, faculty, students, and so forth. In the context of e-learning, regulation can refer to internal and/or external forces of constraint that deal with
Congress will pass a bill to ban police chokeholds, end “no-knock” search warrants in drug cases, and pass a bill to ban officers from restricting “the flow of air or blood by compressing the windpipe, diaphragm, or the carotid arteries by compressing the windpipe, diaphragm, or the carotid arteries by compressing the windpipe, diaphragm, or the carotid arteries by compressing the windpipe, diaphragm, or the carotid arteries by compressing the windpipe, diaphragm, or the carotid arteries by compressing the windpipe, diaphragm, or the carotid arteries by compressing the windpipe, diaphragm, or the carotid arteries by compressing the windpipe,
Hillary Clinton is on course to win the Democratic primary and would go on to trounce her Republican opponents, according to a new poll. Despite rivals’ protestations, Hillary Clinton and Jeb Bush enjoy the support of their own party’s voters, with Vermont socialist Bernie Sanders far behind on 15%. Despite rivals’ protestations, Hillary Clinton and Jeb Bush enjoy the support of their own party’s voters, with Vermont socialist Bernie Sanders far behind on 15%. Despite rivals’ protestations, Hillary Clinton and Jeb Bush enjoy the support of their own party’s voters, with Vermont socialist Bernie Sanders far behind on 15%. Despite rivals’ protestations, Hillary Clinton and Jeb Bush enjoy the support of their own party’s voters, with Vermont socialist Bernie Sanders far behind on 15%. Despite rivals’ protestations, Hillary Clinton and Jeb Bush enjoy the support of their own party’s voters, with Vermont socialist Bernie Sanders far behind
The CRBSCP is a watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based watershed-based
Venezuela’s economy grew by over 10% during the past 5 years, decreasing poverty levels from over 50% to less than 28%, surpassing any country in the world in terms of the rate of poverty reduction. The economy has accumulated over $35 billion dollars in foreign exchange reserves despite a vast increase in social spending and has totally freed itself of dependence on the onerous terms imposed by the self-styled ’international banks’ (IMF, World Bank and Inter-American Development Bank) by paying off its debt
The pharmakon of the pharmakon of writing undercuts the binary logic that structures Western thought. It is not a matter of deciding whether writing reveals or conceals because it does both simultaneously. The pharmakon of writing undercuts the binary logic that structures Western thought. It is not a matter of deciding whether writing reveals or conceals because it does both simultaneously. The pharmakon of writing undercuts the binary logic that structures Western thought. It is not a matter of deciding whether writing reveals or conceals because it does both simultaneously. The pharmakon of writing undercuts the binary logic that structures Western thought. It is not a matter of deciding whether writing reveals or conceals because it does both simultaneously. The pharmakon of writing undercuts the binary logic that structures Western thought. It is not a matter of deciding whether writing reveals or conceals because it does both simultaneously.
Democrats are now favored in 201 districts – they’ll only need to win 15 of the 22 Republican-held toss-ups to get to 218 – they’ll only need to win 15 of the 22 Republican-held toss-ups to get to 218 – that’s ignoring another 26 “lean Republican” and 29 “likely Republican” districts – that’s ignoring another 26 “lean Republican” and 29 “likely Republican” districts – that’s ignoring another 26 “lean Republican” and 29 “likely Republican” districts – that’s ignoring another 26 “lean Republican” and 29 “likely Republican” districts – that’s ignoring another 26 “lean Republican” and 29 “likely Republican” districts – that’s ignoring another 26 “lean Republican” and 29 “likely Republican” districts – that’s
The Taiwanese subempire is a neocolonial empire that uses economic and political intervention to influence policy direction and the control over markets by recourse to its dominant position within the neocolonial structure. 
Biden needs political capital—the intangible bank of trust to rally legislators and the public behind his ideas
Oil and gas development in the Eastern Gulf is incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’s incompatible with the presence of fixed or mobile oil platforms – it’
Black nihilism is the inescapable interlocutor in every utterance about blackness – it demands an address – it is the inescapable interlocutor in every utterance about blackness – it demands an address – it is the inescapable interlocutor in every utterance about blackness – it demands an address – it is the inescapable interlocutor in every utterance about blackness – it demands an address – it is the inescapable interlocutor in every utterance about blackness – it demands an address – it is the inescapable interlocutor in every utterance about blackness – it demands an address – it is the inescapable interlocutor in every utterance about blackness – it demands an address
The United States and China can cooperate more to solve a range of challenges to advance global economic recovery, said Tung Chee Hwa, vice chairman of the National Committee of the Chinese People’s Political Consultative Conference (CPPCC). China’s political advisory body, Tung Chee Hwa, vice chairman of the National Committee of the Chinese People’s Political Consultative Conference (CPPCC), China’s political advisory body, here Wednesday. Over the past few decades, the economic relationship between the United States and China has developed from virtually nonexistent to becoming a highly interdependent and mutually beneficial one. The United States and China are the two largest trading nations globally, and are each other’s second largest trading partners, Tung said at a seminar on US-China economic relations hosted by the Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS), a Washington-based think tank.
Xiaoping’s “fang-shou cycle” collapses China’s political stability – famine, oil shortages, and industrial stagnation are just a few of the aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s
The settler colonial frontier’s ideological signi cance is not so much a line in space as a line in time as a line in time—speci cally, in the time of the settler nation-state. The frontier’s ideological signi cance is not so much a line in space as a line in time as a line in space as a line in time—speci cally, in the time of the settler nation-state. The settler state both traces itself back to the frontier and disavows the frontier, which is disowned as the work of irregular mavericks rather than as the primary means of settler expan- sion. The settler state both traces itself back to the frontier and disavows the fundamental fact of frontier processes—the violent expropriation of indigenous lands as the work of “irregular ma
Higher education isn’t a bubble – it’s a result of overvalued assets
Marijuana legalization solves Mexican drug trafficking and embitters a long-suffering populace – U.S.-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink – US-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink and US-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink and US-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink and US-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink and US-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink and US-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink and US-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink and US-Mexico relations are teetering on the brink and US-Mexico relations
The United States must move outside the construct of unilateral action to preserve its sovereign rights in the Arctic, capitalize on the opportunities available, and safeguard vital national interests in the region
There is no way to know what is inside of a file without examining it. There is no way to know what is inside of a file without examining it. There is no way to know what is inside of a file without examining it. Practically speaking, when police obtain a warrant to search a computer, they can access all of the files stored on that machine. Such a search is not limited to pure data files; it also includes programs and applications installed on the machine. Seems to be, that search would also include files one can see in those installed applications. That assumption is premature because the Fourth Amendment protects a person’s individual effects from government intrusion as well. Practically speaking, when police obtain a warrant to search a computer, they can access all of the files stored on that machine. Such a search is not restricted to pure data files; it also includes programs and applications installed on the machine.
“Inclusion and empowerment are vital for democracy and development in conflict and post-conflict situations, according to Nicholas Haysom, special representative of United Nations Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon for Sudan and South Sudan. I think the temptation in some of these situations is to suppress different people’s identities. They’ll say there’s only one identity, [and] you can understand that because of the imperative of nation building. But that cannot be the basis of building a firm and inclusive society. It has to be one that recognizes people’s differences but based on their shared values and shared interests and destiny. I moved very directly from Afghanistan to South Sudan, and almost immediately, the government of national unity in South Sudan effectively collapsed and we saw the outbreak of violence between the two components of that government. The very dangerous element in that collapse is that it has taken place along ethnic lines, and so you have the potential eruption of a civil war
Venezuelan arms sales aren’t a threat to the US – they’re a diplomatic and economic relationship
The Korean War isn’t on the brink – the US and North Korea are both interested in avoiding a war that would be in no’s interest – they’re both interested in avoiding a war that would be in no’s interest – the US and North Korea are both interested in avoiding a war that would be in no’s interest – the US and North Korea are both interested in avoiding a war that would be in no’s interest – the US and North Korea are both interested in avoiding a war that would be in no’s interest – the US and North Korea are both interested in avoiding a war that would be in no’s interest – the US and North Korea are both interested in avoiding a war that would be in no’s interest – the US and North Korea are both interested in avoiding a war that would be in no’s interest
OMEGA solves environmental problems by growing algae in municipal wastewater using NASA’s photobioreactors, which are flexible plastic tubes that float in seawater. In the process of growing the algae treat wastewater and address environmental problems by consuming nutrients from the wastewater and carbon dioxide. The nutrients, if left unconsumed, would otherwise be released into the coastal waters contributing to undesired algae blooms. The OMEGA system is designed to grow freshwater algae in municipal wastewater using NASA’s photobioreactors, which are flexible plastic tubes that float in seawater. In the process of growing the algae treat wastewater and address environmental problems by consuming nutrients from the wastewater and carbon dioxide. The nutrients, if left unconsumed, would otherwise be released into the coastal waters contributing to undesired algae blooms. Just like shrubs and trees, algae have an appetite for the greenhouse gas, carbon dioxide. The algae release
US-Venezuela relations have been strained since Hugo Chavez assumed the presidency in 1999
Comey is urging Congress to take up the topic of encryption -- setting up a potentially historic debate on Capitol Hill over whether U.S. tech firms can be required to bake into their technology ways for law enforcement to legally access users’ e-mails, texts and other digital communications. In remarks at the Brookings Institution on Thursday, Comey used the phrase “going dark” to describe the decisions by companies like Apple and Google to encrypt by default more and more of their services. The problem, Comey argued, is that the process locks away for good some data that could be useful to law enforcement as it fights crime. The argument against that notion is that any time you create a means of access for law enforcement—what Comey called a “front door” that the FBI can use “with clarity and transparency”—it increases the chances that those with ill-intentions can get at that same data
Institutional privatization and school autonomy are key to educational efficiency in OECD countries
The U.S. is willing to reduce arms sales to Taiwan if China removes its missiles. 
The US and China are interdependent in a host of ways. They’re not in it because they fell in with each other, they’re in it because forces beyond them made it happen and now they’re stuck with each other and now they have to deal with it. One way of ’dealing with it’ is through annual high-level talks like the Strategic and Economic Dialogue, which got under way in Beijing on Monday. Chinese president Xi Jinping kicked off the event with a call for more mutual trust – he quoted a Song Dynasty Chinese poet who said, “Rivers always take meandering paths before reaching their destination. For the US side, Secretary of State John Kerry is handling security talks, while US Treasury Secretary Jacob Lew leads the economic track. Having grown to be one of the two largest economies in the world, it’s increasingly important for China to accept the responsibilities of being
Taking up Heidegger’s hermeneutic ontology in its reflection on Being allows us to envision global warming as a symptom, as an appearing, complex phenomenon through a particular way, the interpretive form of Being to which modern human life has been claimed. We are led to the essence of which global warming is an appearing, complex phenomenon through a particular way, the interpretive form of Being to which modern human life has been claimed. We are led to the essence of which global warming is an appearing, complex phenomenon through a particular way, the interpretive form of Being to which modern human life has been claimed. We are led to the essence of which global warming is an appearing, complex phenomenon through a particular way, the interpretive form of Being to which modern human life has been claimed. We are led to the essence of which global warming is an appearing, complex phenomenon through a particular way, the interpretive form of Being to which modern
Exports reduced the U.S. trade deficit by 3.6 percent in March to $40.37 billion, the Commerce Department said Tuesday. Exports rose 2.2 percent - the largest increase since June 2013 - to $193.9 billion, while imports climbed 1.7 percent to $234.28 billion, driven by higher sales of foreign foodstuffs and consumer goods. U.S. gross domestic product grew at an annualized rate of 0.1 percent in the January-March period, according to the Commerce Department’s initial estimate. A surge in exports reduced the U.S. trade deficit by 3.6 percent in March to $40.37 billion, the Commerce Department said Tuesday. Exports rose 2.2 percent - the largest increase since June 2013 - to $193.9 billion, while imports climbed 1.7 percent to $234.28 billion, driven by higher sales of foreign foodstuffs and consumer goods.
Nietzsche’s values of equality and democracy arose out of the slave revolt in morality. They are generated by the spirit of revenge and hatred of the powerful for the powerful. Nietzsche’s values of equality and democracy arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt in morality arose out of the slave revolt
Obesity discourse is constructed as a mechanistic view of the body and focuses on the presumed relationship between inactivity, poor diet, obesity and health. The afflicts an increasing number of countries in the world where physical activity and dietary restraint are lacking, and threatens a global health catastrophe. The afflicts an increasing number of countries in the world where physical activity and dietary restraint are lacking, and the afflicts an increasing number of countries in the world where physical activity and dietary restraint are lacking, and the afflicts an increasing number of countries in the world where physical activity and dietary restraint are lacking, and the afflicts an increasing number of countries in the world where physical activity and dietary restraint are lacking, and the afflicts an increasing number of countries in the world where physical activity and dietary rest
The U.S. military is on a solid ground, despite squabbles over many of the details. 
North Korea doesn’t want a war, because it knows it will lose and lose decisively. China doesn’t want a war, not on its border, not with nuclear weapons in play, not when its number one vital interest is political stability and economic growth to keep a poor and potentially restive population focused on dreams of a middle class life. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
CEs have been expanded to include broad categories of actions that should receive a detailed look by the agencies and the public because these actions can’t be categorically excluded from NEPA analysis – they’ve been expanded to include broad categories of actions that should receive a detailed look by the agencies and the public because these actions can’t be categorically excluded from NEPA analysis – they’ve been expanded to include broad categories of actions that should receive a detailed look by the agencies and the public because these actions can’t be categorically excluded from NEPA analysis – they’ve been expanded to include broad categories of actions that should receive a detailed look by the agencies and the public because these actions can’t be categorically excluded from NEPA analysis – they’ve been expanded to include broad categories of actions that should receive a detailed look by the agencies and the public because these actions can’t be cate
Sarbanes-Oxley creates three categories of corporations: private corporations that are not directly subject to federal requirements, listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-Oxley, and listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-Oxley, and listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-Oxley, and listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-Oxley, and listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-Oxley, and listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-Oxley, and listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-Oxley, and listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-Oxley, and listed public corporations that must satisfy both the minimum standards of Sarbanes-
China’s economic slowdown causes a retaliation war in the East China Sea – the risk of a retaliation war is higher than the risk of a retaliation war – the risk of a retaliation war is higher than the risk of a retaliation war – the risk of a retaliation war is higher than the risk of a retaliation war – the risk of a retaliation war is higher than the risk of a retaliation war – the risk of a retaliation war is higher than the risk of a retaliation war – the risk of a retaliation war is higher than the risk of a retaliation war – the risk of a retaliation war is higher than the risk
The decline of the cosmopolitan imagination associated with the Enlightenment and the rise of the nation-state could be seen as the beginning of a different kind of cosmopolitanism, one less premised on the assumptions of a world republic or on elites and also one less Eurocentric. In contrast to the dominant Enlightenment notion of cosmopolitanism as a transnational republican order, current developments in social theory suggest a post-universalistic cosmopolitanism that takes as its point of departure different kinds of modernity and processes of societal transformation that do not presuppose the separation of the social from the political or postulate a single world culture. Current debates in political theory draw attention to the revival of the Kantian ideal, which it is argued is relevant in the present context of globalization, the alleged crisis of the nation-state and the need for global civil
Affirmative action enslaves a race of people for hundreds of years, sets them free bedraggled and penniless, pits them, without assistance in a hostile environment, against privileged victimizers, and then reasonably expects the gap between the heirs of the two groups to narrow
EU-PRC relations must be based on the “reciprocity” principle – OBOR, the Asian Infrastructure Investment Bank, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-PRC Investment Agreement, the EU-
Immigration doesn’t have a negative impact on productivity – it’s the dominant driver of population growth
There are other factors at play which those anxious about China’s slowdown need to consider. Xi, unlike his predecessors, is not a reactionist. He doesn’t rush to turn on the stimulus taps at the first sign of economic weakness, avoiding the trap of stimulating the economy to ensure short term growth targets are met without considering the long term consequences. No, maybe what we’re seeing today is Xi playing the long game, taking short term economic pain to ensure long term economic gain. No, maybe what we’re seeing today is Xi playing the long game, taking short term economic pain to ensure long term economic gain. Xi’s team is also choosing, as a direct consequence of this focus on rectifying and rebuilding the CCP, to constrain the government’s capacity for economic management, not least by pulling China’s technocratic bureaucracy into the whirlwind of elite
Democratic voters in Wisconsin are divided on the effect of trade on unemployment, an issue that Vermont Sen. Bernie Sanders has played up in a flood of television ads over the past few weeks. &lt;b&gt;------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
COOPERATIVE AND UNCOOPERATIVE FEDERALISM IN THE CONTEXT OF FOREIGN AFFAIRS – COOPERATIVE AND UNCOOPERATIVE FEDERALISM IN THE CONTEXT OF FOREIGN AFFAIRS – COOPERATIVE AND UNCOOPERATIVE FEDERALISM IN THE CONTEXT OF FOREIGN AFFAIRS – COOPERATIVE AND UNCOOPERATIVE FEDERALISM IN THE CONTEXT OF FOREIGN AFFAIRS – COOPERATIVE AND UNCOOPERATIVE FEDERALISM IN THE CONTEXT OF FOREIGN AFFAIRS – COOPERATIVE AND UNCOOPERATIVE FEDERALISM IN THE CONTEXT OF FOREIGN AFF
Biden’s urgency is in plain sight – he’s holding Oval Office meetings where he negotiates directly on it. He’s expending significant political capital to get it across the finish line.
Identity Politics reifies identities as they are already defined in the world, and then by describing them as if they were inherent to us in some way instead of as descriptions of positions within extremely hierarchical, preexisting social structures of power. We messed up, at the beginning, first by choosing to reify identities as they were already defined in the world, and then by describing these identities as if they were inherent to us in some way instead of as descriptions of positions within extremely hierarchical, preexisting social structures of power. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Modern citizenship is an institution deployed for colonial and imperial campaigns to create governable (rather than subject) peoples. We observe this development in previously colonized territories and frontiers carved up by colonial powers such as in the Americas, Africa, and Asia as well as those that were ostensibly never colonized and yet were subject to imperial interventions, such as the Ottoman and Chinese empires. Today, many seemingly intractable questions about territory, people, sovereignty, and political subjectivity that are played out in post-colonial, postoriental, or even ostensibly decolonized societies, inherit this empire and willingly or unwittingly serve its ends, unable to break the hold of its allure and seduction, if not domination.
An Immigration Board would have the authority to distribute unused visas during the transition between the national origin quotas system and the new regime established by the Act (the visas allocated to Great Britain, Ireland, and Germany, were underutilized, and the Administration sought to reallocate them, though not to increase the numbers of visas available. During his testimony before the House Judiciary Committee in 1964, Robert F. Kennedy was pressed on whether the President should be given such power. He invoked the already existing power of the President to exclude immigrants in the nation’s interest – today’s 212(f) – to support his claim that the creation of the Commission would not be out of the ordinary. He invoked the already existing power of the President to exclude immigrants in the nation’s interest – today’s 212(f) – to support his claim that the creation of the Commission would not be out of
Climate change isn’t fundamentally different from other extinction threats in terms of identifying species in danger of extinction – a study of 36 amphibian and reptile species endemic to the US has concluded that climate change isn’t fundamentally different from other extinction threats – a study of 36 amphibian and reptile species endemic to the US has concluded that climate change isn’t fundamentally different from other extinction threats – a study of 36 amphibian and reptile species endemic to the US has concluded that climate change isn’t fundamentally different from other extinction threats – a study of 36 amphibian and reptile species endemic to the US has concluded that climate change isn’t fundamentally different from other extinction threats – a study of 36 amphibian and reptile species endemic to the US has concluded that climate change isn
NATO is a huge axel in the wheel of the military industrial complex, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital. NATO is a huge axel in the wheel of the military industrial complex, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate capital, driven by the ferocious appetites of corporate
The hegemonic masculinity of the state is perceived as a core value by citizens – hegemonic masculinity cannot be applied generically to all males but is sustained through subordinated and devalued masculinities, such as homosexuality and, more importantly, through its relation to various devalued femininities, such as homosexuality and, more importantly, through its relation to various devalued feminineities. Hegemonic masculinity cannot be applied generically to all males but is sustained through subordinated and devalued masculinities, such as homosexuality and, more importantly, through its relation to various devalued feminineities, such as homosexuality and, more importantly, through its relation to various devalued feminineities, such as homosexuality and, more importantly, through its relation to various devalued feminineities, such as homosexuality and, more importantly, through its relation to various devalued feminineities
US-EU AI cooperation is already a top priority within existing EU-US S&T collaboration and benefits from a reciprocal funding agreement between the US NIH and the EU.42 Covid-19 and prioritization by both the US and the EU to develop AI applications for healthcare further the potential for stronger US-EU AI collaboration in this sector.42 Covid-19 and prioritization by both the US and the EU to develop AI applications for healthcare further the potential for stronger US-EU AI collaboration in this sector.42 Covid-19 and prioritization by both the US and the EU to develop AI applications for healthcare further the potential for stronger US-EU AI collaboration in this sector.42 Covid-19 and prioritization by both the US and the EU to develop AI applications for healthcare further the potential for stronger US-EU AI collaboration in this sector.42 Covid-19 and prioritization by both the US and the EU to develop AI applications for healthcare
Trump isn’t a misogynistic pig – he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’s a republican, he’
Cuban-Iranian relations have rekindled over the past decade
Effective teachers of minority students have high expectations for their students – they restructure the learning activities assuming that the child has not yet mastered the materials, not that the child is incapable or unwilling to learn. They do not ascribe blame to external factors, such as the child’s parents or previous teachers, nor do they impute negative characteristics to the child. They restructure the learning activities, assuming that the child has not yet mastered the materials, not that the child is incapable or unwilling to learn. When their pupils do not initially master the materials, these effective teachers do not ascribe blame to external factors, such as the child’s parents or previous teachers, nor do they impute negative characteristics to the child. They restructure the learning activities, assuming that the child has not yet mastered the materials, not that the child is incapable or unwilling to learn. They restructure the learning activities, assuming that the child has
There’s still a long way to go – there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there’s still a long way to go and there
Reforms must be more authoritarian, and power must be more centralized, if the status quo is to become more hospitable to innovative approaches to student learning
Iran might retaliate against US troops or allies, launching missiles at military installations or civilian populations in the Gulf or perhaps even Europe. This could trigger sectarian tensions in Iraq, disrupting the Arab Spring, and ordering terrorist attacks against Israel and the United States. Even if Iran did not threaten the Strait of Hormuz, speculators, fearing possible supply disruptions, bid up the price of oil, possibly triggering a wider economic crisis at an already fragile moment. Even if Iran did not threaten the Strait of Hormuz, speculators, fearing possible supply disruptions, bid up the price of oil, possibly triggering a wider economic crisis at an already fragile moment. Even if Iran did not threaten the Strait of Hormuz, speculators, fearing possible supply disruptions, bid up the price of oil, possibly triggering a wider economic
One key capability gap that will continue to hamper Arctic operations in the coming decades is in maritime domain awareness in the polar region. MDA – the effective ability of US forces to locate, identify, and track vessels or any other activity in the maritime domain that could affect national security interests – remains extremely limited, largely because of the remoteness of the region, inadequate Arctic Ocean and weather data, lack of communication and navigation infrastructure, insufficient intelligence informa-tion, and the lack of a consistent US presence in the High North. Given the very limited sensor coverage of the area, great distances from main bases, and harsh, rapidly changing atmospheric conditions, even collecting and maintaining a basic awareness of other ships, subma-rines, and aircraft in the Arctic becomes a nearly impossible task. Not long after the start of the Coast Guard’s 2008 summer deployment in the polar region, District 17 officials based in Alaska
Public edu-cation for deaf children was considered a right as well as a sensible civic and economic investment, for deaf children it was an altruistic act that came under the purview of state boards of charities. Even in adulthood deaf children it was an altruistic act that came under the purview of state boards of charities. Even in adulthood deaf children it was an altruistic act that came under the purview of state boards of charities. Deaf people were among the thousands of disabled immigrants turned back at American ports as defective and undesirable. They were excluded in large part because they were thought likely to be bearers of a defective heredity. The public edu-cation for hearing children was considered a right as well as a sensible civic and economic investment, for deaf children it was an altruistic act that came under the purview of state boards of charities
There are only two exceptions in which someone can be deported – if he or she committed a serious felony, or if a federal judge signed a final order of deportation.
White hat hackers are ready and willing to help – it’s only a matter of time if we don’t allow them to find vulnerabilities within our most important digital infrastructure – it’s only a matter of time if we don’t allow white hat hackers to find vulnerabilities within our most important digital infrastructure – it’s only a matter of time if we don’t allow white hat hackers to find vulnerabilities within our most important digital infrastructure – it’s only a matter of time if we don’t allow white hat hackers to find vulnerabilities within our most important digital infrastructure – it’s only a matter of time if we don’t allow white hat hackers to find vulnerabilities within our most important digital infrastructure – it’s only a matter of time if we don’t allow white hat hackers to find vulnerabilities within our most important digital infrastructure – it’s only 
Education is a homogenizing epistemological and modernizing role – education is a homogenizing epistemological and modernizing role in fostering societies that have the potential to reduce poverty and promote sustainable development in countries with heterogeneous socio-economic and politi-cal systems, both in the core and the periphery, and is distributed in substantial part through the World Bank, IMF, UN organizations, INGOs such as USAID, Save the Children, etc., and through state-to-state cooperation on education. 
The first set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The second set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The first set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The first set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The second set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The first set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The second set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The first set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The second set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The first set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The second set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The first set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The second set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The first set of mechanisms focuses specifically on US energy dependence. The second set of mechanisms 
Economic and fiscal trends pose the most severe long-term threat to the United States’ position as global leader – retrenchment would reshape the international order, increase geopolitical competition, and undercut our will to preclude or respond to international crises because of the higher risk of escalation – economic and fiscal trends pose the most severe long-term threat to the United States’ position as global leader – economic and fiscal trends pose the most severe long-term threat to the United States’ position as global leader – economic and fiscal trends pose the most severe long-term threat to the United States’ position as global leader – economic and fiscal trends pose the most severe long-term threat to the United States’ position as global leader – economic and fiscal trends pose the most severe long-term threat to the United States’ position as global leader – economic and fiscal trends pose the most severe long-term threat to the
Democracies can shift the defense burden away from the median voter by developing a certain type of military, one cannot assume that the costs of defense and ultimately of war are evenly distributed across society, a crucial assumption of democratic exceptionalism.
Democracies in antiquity fought against one another because of the built-in electoral and institutional checks on government power. 
Cognitive dissonance doesn’t explain how regulatory negotiation works – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the legitimacy of the process – it doesn’t diminish the
Reverse osmosis water desalination is an expensive, energy-intensive process currently dependent on carbon-heavy fossil fuels. Solar energy is an abundant, carbon-free energy source that can reduce the energy costs and carbon footprint of desalination. Desalination is an expensive, energy-intensive process currently dependent on carbon-heavy fossil fuels. A solar microgrid that supplies El Paso’s desalination plant with energy in tandem with the regional grid will reduce the plant’s energy expenditures in the long term compared to solely buying energy from the regional grid. We used the Hybrid Optimization for Multiple Energy Resources (HOMER) model created by the National Renewable Energy Laboratory. The results suggest that a solar microgrid whose modules use one axis tracker could reduce the plant’s energy expenditures in the long term compared to solely buying energy from the regional grid.
Turkey’s business culture has long been a staging post for trade between east and west. There are three kinds of Turkish business. The first is large firms, often conglomerates. These account for a quarter of employment and half of the business sector’s value-added. Some are joint ventures with European firms. The best manufacture high quality capital goods, car parts and military hardware for export. They approach German levels of productivity. At the other end of the scale is small, unregistered firms, with low productivity. In between is a third group of medium-sized family firms, with some workers on the books and others not. This structure helps explain the agility of Turkish business. The largest conglomerate, Koc Holding, has four main divisions: vehicles and parts (in joint ventures with Ford and Fiat), white goods, oil refining and banking. Sabanci Holding, another conglomerate, has retail, energy
Algae biofuels are key to geopolitical stability
Those who argue the oppositional standpoint are not doing anything different from their enemies and are most certainly not directly changing the downtrodden lives of those who seek their survival in metropolitan and nonmetropolitan spaces alike. Those who argue the oppositional standpoint are not doing anything different from their enemies and are most certainly not directly changing the downtrodden lives of those who seek their survival in metropolitan and nonmetropolitan spaces alike. Those who argue the oppositional standpoint are not doing anything different from their enemies and are most certainly not directly changing the downtrodden lives of those who seek their survival in metropolitan and nonmetropolitan spaces alike. Those who argue the oppositional standpoint are not doing anything different from their enemies and are most certainly not directly changing the downtrodden lives of those who seek their survival in metropolitan and nonmetropolitan spaces alike. Those who argue the oppositional standpoint are not doing anything different from their enemies
You are already in something. You are already in the thing that you call for and that calls you. Moten and Harney want to gesture to another place, a wild place that is not simply the left over space that limns real and regulated zones of polite society; rather, it is a wild place that continuously produces its own unregulated wildness. The call is always a call to dis-order and this disorder or wildness shows up in many places: in jazz, in improvisation, in noise. The disordered sounds that we refer to as cacophony will always be cast as extra-musical, as Moten puts it, precisely because we hear something in them that reminds us that our desire for harmony is arbitrary and in another world, harmony would sound incomprehensible. Listening to cacophony and noise tells us that there is a wild beyond to the structures we inhabit and that inhabit
Low approval ratings annoy the president and warm the cockles of left-leaning Americans, they don’t mean much at this point. Trump hasn’t enjoyed the positive approval numbers that most newly minted presidents enjoy, but he lost the popular vote by nearly 3 million ballots, a record negative margin for an election winner—he could hardly have expected a honeymoon period—but the overall takeaway is that local conditions (like what sort of candidates the opposition party fields and how aggressively gerrymandered House districts are) will matter a lot – local conditions (like what sort of candidates the opposition party fields and how aggressively gerrymandered House districts are) will matter a lot – Trump isn’t up for reelection until 2020, and even the 2018 midterms are a long way off
Environmental activism is based on apocalyptic apocalyptic predictions – apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic a
The United States is already committed, by its own policies, to abide by UNCLOS rules on transit rights and wants other nations to do so as well. The answer provided in UNCLOS III is a new international tribunal, most of whose judges—elected by the usual U.S. formulas to assure geographical and political “balance”—cannot be expected to have much sympathy for American concern
Multilateral development banks are part of a broader trend toward the decentralization of financing and other aspects of development cooperation. The United Nations must adapt accordingly if it is to maintain or expand its own relevance as a coordinating mechanism as well as a resource in development. To do so, a clearer division of labor must be achieved, much in the mold of what is happening in international security, in which regional organizations like the African Union have emerged that act under the tacit umbrella of the United Nations, both operatively and normatively. The United Nations must adapt accordingly if it is to maintain or expand its own relevance as a coordinating mechanism as well as a resource in development cooperation. They seem to be long term projects rather than short term stopgap measures, and the United Nations must adapt accordingly if it is to maintain or expand its own relevance as a coordinating mechanism as well as a resource in development cooperation.
The federal government is centralized and bureaucratized, undermining the balance of federalism and threatening self-government
Play is just the opposite. Play is always voluntary. What might otherwise be play is work if it’s forced. This is axiomatic. The point is not that play is without consequences. This is to demean play. The point is that the consequences, if any, are gratuitous. Play makes a mockery of freedom. The official line is that we all have rights and live in a democracy. Other unfortunates who aren’t free like we are have to live in police states. These victims obey orders or-else, no matter how arbitrary. He has you spied on by snitches and supervisors, he amasses a dossier on every employee. With a few exceptions he can fire you for any reason, or no reason. He has you spied on by snitches and supervisors, he amasses a dossier on
Foreign investment in the U.S. dwarfed US investment abroad by the biggest margin on record for much of last year, leaving the U.S. economy more vulnerable to external shocks but also suggesting the nation remains a magnet for foreign funds after the financial crisis
Transparency reports from major communications providers routinely show that law enforcement uses the lowest possible standard of demand—the subpoena, often never even seen by a judge, let alone approved by one—when it asks these corporations for our information. The most commonly used court order, called a (d) order, does not require the government show probable cause that the information obtained in the search will be evidence of a crime. Probable cause is the gold standard of American justice spelled out in the Fourth Amendment’s warrant requirement. Agencies from the FBI all the way down to local police have been obtaining not just our purchasing and communications records but the actual content of our communications, and our location information, using these (d) orders. The standard is so easy to meet, and the system of transparency around (d) orders is so broken, that a magistrate judge has said “it’s reasonable to infer that far more
F. Effective Solutions 1. Expanding Whistleblower Protection This article asserts that the burden for creating early detection systems, including whistleblower protection, should be on the drug companies themselves because they are the ones with the greatest financial interest in the drug’s success and the greatest access to information about potential dangers. Moreover, Congress has already identified extending whistleblower protection for employees of pharmaceutical companies as an important method of ensuring compliance with federal anti-fraud laws such as Dodd-Frank n99 and the Affordable Care Act. n100 Whistleblower protection must be geared to what these people know, substance based, not how they know it, job title based. n101 This section provides some suggestions for how that change should occur. n100 Whistleblower protection must be geared to what these people know, substance based, not how they know it, job title 
Exxon, Devon, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Chesapeake, Ches
US-Mexico relations have been a high-water mark in the last 12 years, and especially the last six years, have really been a high-water mark in US-Mexico collaboration, particularly on security issues. Levels of trust are so high that we have had the opportunity to fly drones in Mexico, we have agents operating in direct collaboration with their Mexican counterparts, we’ve seen record levels of extradition. US-Mexico relations have been a high-water mark in the last 12 years, and especially the last six years, have really been a high-water mark in US-Mexico collaboration, particularly on security issues. Levels of trust are so high that we have had the opportunity to fly drones in Mexico, we have agents operating in direct collaboration with their Mexican counterparts, we’ve seen record levels of extradition.
The West Side is a major target in the war against public education – it’s disproportionately affected by the closing of 50 schools, most of them in Black and Latino neighborhoods. The West Side has been a center of social activism from the Haymarket martyrs, to the Jane Addams-led Hull House, to today’s anti-poverty activists of Action Now. Despite growing gentrification on the traditionally segregated West Side, most of the area remains majority Black and Latino. Despite growing gentrification on the traditionally segregated West Side, most of the area remains majority Black and Latino. Despite growing gentrification on the traditionally segregated West Side, most of the area remains majority Black and Latino. Despite growing gentrification on the traditionally segregated West Side, most of the area remains majority Black and Latino. Despite growing gentrification
A principle-based citizenship test promotes the fiction of a universalist citizenship ideology based on limited notions of certain disfavored groups-most notably, immigrants and nonwhite minorities-who are positioned as antithetical to democratic values. A principle-based citizenship test does not actually advance a universalist ideology but instead masks an exclusionary construct based on limited notions of certain disfavored groups-most notably, immigrants and nonwhite minorities-who are positioned as antithetical to democratic values. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
The INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction” than is commonly understood – the INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction” than is commonly understood – the INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction” than is commonly understood – the INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction” than is commonly understood – the INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction” than is commonly understood – the INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction” than is commonly understood – the INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction” than is commonly understood – the INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction” than is commonly understood – the INA has a far more expansive definition of the term “conviction
“Democracy is a cipher for overplaying the waning of white supremacy and the waxing of a supposedly racially inclusive multicultural reality,” argues Omi and Winant. “Democracy is embedded within enslavement, rooted in captivity, and a leitmotif for social parasitism,” argues Winant. “Democracy is embedded within enslavement, rooted in captivity, and a leitmotif for social parasitism,” argues Winant. “Democracy is embedded within enslavement, rooted in captivity, and a leitmotif for social parasitism,” argues Winant. “Democracy is embedded within enslavement, rooted in captivity, and a leitmotif for
Legislation to ban online gambling that was written with the help of lobbyists for Sheldon Adelson will soon be introduced in Congress. Adelson, chairman and CEO of Las Vegas Sands Corp., is on a crusade to stop online gambling, arguing it would be harmful to children and the nation’s moral fabric. He is pushing for a federal law to stop the industry in its tracks. He is pushing for a federal law to stop the industry in its tracks, arguing it would be harmful to children and the nation’s moral fabric. He is pushing for a federal law to stop the industry in its tracks, arguing it would be harmful to children and the nation’s moral fabric. He is pushing for a federal law to stop the industry in its tracks, arguing it would be harmful to children and the nation’s moral fabric. He is pushing for a federal law to stop the industry in its tracks
Black women are subjected to forms of police violence most often associated with and thought of as Black men. Black women are subjected to forms of police violence most often associated with and thought of as Black men. Black women are subjected to forms of police violence most often associated with and thought of as Black men. Black female gender, which is always undone, unrealized, and violated, is central to slavery and its afterlife. As a Black woman she carries the antecedents of an arrangement where human cargo is held captive on ships and logged without gender, the visuality of her body served as justification for capture. The slave trade catapulted from the bareness of her bosom, the robustness of her posterior flesh. While the logbooks on the ship became the official record, the absence of gender specification is not the sum total of this equation. From assessing and cataloguing the conditions of genit
China drones have recently been deployed in conflicts in the Middle East and Africa by several countries, including U.S. allies that the U.S. blocked from buying American models.
Gender equity reform requires a capacity for self reflection and sense of collective action. It requires self reflection on one’s own gender subjectivity and of long held institutional, cultural and personal practices and beliefs. It is closely tied to power relations at home, school and work and connected to emotion. Many men who actively went out of their way to encourage and promote gender equity reform, when questioned about whether their initiatives reflected any change in their attitudes, spoke of their closehand experiences as ’partners of feminists’ and ’fathers of daughters’ to what gender inequity and discrimination in schools and at work meant on daily basis for women and girls (Blackmore, 1996a; Sinclair, 1994). It was their emotional connectedness to those who experienced the impact of overt and covert sexism, structural and cultural discrimination, and often ongoing harassment, which allowed them to empathise and better understand the ways in which
Education reforms dismantling centralised education bureaucracies are emerging all over Europe. A main aim is to enhance autonomy at local government and school levels. Hence new forms of regulation in education are being established. By regulation we mean the public activity which is normatively founded in the law and the legislative procedures aiming to supervise and control what is subject to regulation (Lgreid & Christensen, 2006). Hence new forms of regulation in education are being established. By regulation we mean the public activity which is normatively founded in the law and the legislative procedures aiming to supervise and control what is subject to regulation (Lgreid & Christensen, 2006). Hence new forms of regulation in education are being established. By regulation we mean the public activity which is normatively founded in the law and the legislative procedures aiming to supervise and control what is subject to regulation (Lgreid 
Roberts has been involved in 800 decisions while on the high court, according to Washington University School of Law’s Supreme Court Database.1 In 313 of these, he voted with the majority in a decision that the database describes as liberal, as coded by the database’s maintainers, a group of legal and political science scholars. If any code for a case was liberal, we’ve included the case in this tally. In only 15 of those cases, however, was Roberts’s vote pivotal. That is, there were only 15 instances in which Roberts voted with the majority in a 5-4, liberal-leaning decision, where switching his vote would also have switched the ruling to a conservative one. What do you call a swing justice who doesn’t swing? They cover a small grab bag of topics and, with one big exception, aren’t exactly the sorts of results that show
The U.S. government has determined that Russia has violated the INF Treaty by testing a prohibited ground-launched cruise missile (GLCM). So far, the Russian government has simply denied any violation and refused to engage the U.S. in constructive discussions on the issue.
The Panopticon is a building that allows a watchman to observe every occupant from one vantage point. This led occupants to act as if they were being observed at all times, regardless of whether a watchman was in the tower or observing them; the mere potential of constant surveillance altered occupant behavior. Foucault discussed his social theory of Panopticism in Discipline & Punish: The Birth of the Prison, noting that He who is subjected to a field of visibility, and who knows it, assumes responsibility for the constraints of power; he makes them play spontaneously upon himself; he inscribes in himself the power relation in which he simultaneously plays both roles; he becomes the principle of his own subjection. In the 1970s, a piece of software called DIALOG was designed to replicate the Panopticon effect and tested at a large pharmaceutical company as part
Postmodernism is a ruthlessly “totalizing” system that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and emancipatory politics. Postmodernism is a ruthlessly “totalizing” system that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and emancipatory politics that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and emancipatory politics that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and emancipatory politics that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and emancipatory politics that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and emancipatory politics that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and emancipatory politics that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and emancipatory politics that forecloses a vast range of critical thought and
Iran will use Venezuela as a transshipment point to provide nuclear weapons to terrorist groups in the hemisphere, or with the help of Venezuelans, the Iranians would use Venezuela as a transshipment point to provide nuclear weapons to terrorist groups in the hemisphere, or with the help of Venezuelans, the Iranians would use Venezuela as a transshipment point to provide nuclear weapons to terrorist groups in the hemisphere, or with the help of Venezuelans, the Iranians would use Venezuela as a transshipment point to provide nuclear weapons to terrorist groups in the hemisphere, or with the help of Venezuelans, the Iranians would use Venezuela as a transshipment point to provide nuclear weapons to terrorist groups in the hemisphere, or with the help of Venezuelans, the Iranians would use Venezuela as a transshipment point to provide nuclear weapons to terrorist groups in the
Ecological threats aren’t a direct military threat to the state – they are mutually reinforcing the state’s ability to cope with the traditional / military dimension of drug trafficking
Hezbollah is responsible for the majority of US terrorism deaths, including the 1983 bombings of U.S. Marine barracks and U.S. embassy in Beirut, in addition to a series of attacks in the ’80s. Hezbollah is also responsible for countless attacks on Israel throughout the years, including 1983 bombings of U.S. Marine barracks and U.S. embassy in Beirut, in addition to a series of attacks in the ’80s in addition to a series of attacks in the ’80s in addition to a series of attacks in the ’80s in addition to a series of attacks in the ’80s in addition to a series of attacks in the ’80s in addition to a few examples that don’t even account for the thousands of rockets Hezbollah has launched into Israel throughout the
“Hybrid warfare is now real warfare,” said Jamie Shea, senior fellow at Friends of Europe and former Deputy Assistant General at NATO. “This is an opportunity for the private sector and government to solve the problems,” he said. “This is an opportunity for the private sector and government to solve the problems.” “Hybrid warfare is now real warfare,” said Jamie Shea, senior fellow at Friends of Europe and former Deputy Assistant General at NATO. “This is an opportunity for the private sector and government to solve the problems.” “Hybrid warfare is now real warfare,” said Jamie Shea, senior fellow at Friends of Europe and former Deputy Assistant General at NATO. “This is an opportunity for the private sector and government to solve the problems.” “Hybrid warfare is now real warfare,” said Jamie Shea, senior fellow at Friends of Europe and former Deputy Assistant General at NATO. “This is an opportunity for the private
Military deterrence isn’t enough to deter war – it’s the only thing that prevents war – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that deterrence solves – it’s the only thing that
Obama and Congress are offsetting each other, leading to a national environment in which neither party has that great of an edge – we’re left with two unpopular entities – Obama and Congress are offsetting each other, leading to a national environment in which neither party has that great of an edge – we’re left with two unpopular entities – Obama and Congress are offsetting each other, leading to a national environment in which neither party has that great of an edge – we’re left with two unpopular entities – Obama and Congress are offsetting each other, leading to a national environment in which neither party has that great of an edge – we’re left with two unpopular entities – Obama and Congress are offsetting each other, leading to a national environment in which neither party has that great of an edge – we’re left with two unpopular entities – Obama and Congress are offsetting each other, leading
High-poverty schools have fewer guidance counselors, tutors, and psychologists, lower-paid teachers, more dilapidated facilities, and bigger class sizes
Geoengineering is no longer fringe science, with the debate shifting from whether it should be done to how. One controversial idea gaining traction among scientists is injecting small particles, known as aerosols, into the stratosphere to block the sun’s radiation. They can also provide “seeds” around which waterdroplets coalesce to form clouds, thus further increasing the planet’s reflectivity. The particles are fairly long lived in the stratosphere, a stable region of the atmosphere that begins five to six miles up. This makes the idea of aerosols’ use as a global planet-cooler fairly attractive. Mount Pinatubo, a volcano in the Philippines that erupted in 1991, spewed so much sulfur dioxide into the stratosphere that the planet cooled by 1 degree Fahrenheit (0.55 degrees Celsius) and stayed cool for more than two years.
Oil industry groups reacted tepidly, saying they were still poring over the 137-page rule released by the Interior Department. Government regulators issued a final set of safety rules for offshore drilling Wednesday, fine-tuning a series of emergency measures put in place after the BP oil spill in 2010. Oil industry groups reacted tepidly, saying they were still poring over the 137-page rule released by the Interior Department. Some environmental activists reacted tepidly, calling it insufficient to prevent another catastrophe such as the explosion on the Deepwater Horizon rig that killed 11 people and caused 200 million gallons of oil to leak into the Gulf of Mexico. The oil industry groups reacted tepidly, saying they were still poring over the 137-page rule released by the Interior Department. Some environmental activists reacted tepidly, calling it insufficient
The NSA needs to be more transparent about what it is doing, sharing with the American people, which it wasn’t. The NSA should be more transparent about what it is doing, sharing with the American people, which it wasn’t. The NSA should be more transparent about what it is doing, sharing with the American people, which it wasn’t. The NSA should be more transparent about what it is doing, sharing with the American people, which it wasn’t. The NSA should be more transparent about what it is doing, sharing with the American people, which it wasn’t. The NSA should be more transparent about what it is doing, sharing with the American people, which it wasn’t. The NSA should be more transparent about what it is doing, sharing with the American people, which it wasn’t. The NSA should be more transparent about what it is doing, sharing with the American people, which it wasn’t
Making demands does not necessarily mean working within the state or reaffirming its legitimacy – they call into question the legitimacy and even the sovereignty of the state by highlighting fundamental inconsistencies between, for instance, a formal constitutional order which guarantees certain rights and equalities, and state practices which in reality violate and deny them – they call into question the legitimacy and even the sovereignty of the state by highlighting fundamental inconsistencies between, for instance, a formal constitutional order which guarantees certain rights and equalities, and state practices which in reality violate and deny them – they call into question the legitimacy and even the sovereignty of the state by highlighting fundamental inconsistencies between, for instance, a formal constitutional order which guarantees certain rights and equalities, and state practices which in reality violate and deny them – they call into question the legitimacy and even the sovereignty of the state by highlighting fundamental inconsistencies between, for
Local elites play a key role in China’s transition from authoritarianism to democracy – they can emerge at the height of crisis, but then stall and be superseded by action at the local and regional level that goes further than what was intended – an attempt at change from above starting the process, but then stalling and being superseded by action at the local and regional level that goes further than what was intended – an attempt at change from above starting the process, but then stalling and being superseded by action at the local and regional level that goes further than what was intended – an attempt at change from above starting the process, but then stalling and being superseded by action at the local and regional level that goes further than what was intended – an attempt at change from above starting the process, but then stalling and being superseded by action at the local and regional
It’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal is almost done, it’s too far-fetched to say a deal
Defend him or stand back silently, and Trump drags the Republican Party along with him as he flames out – the inevitable Trumpian disaster leaves House and Senate Republicans with a stark choice – Defend him or stand back silently, and Trump drags the Republican Party along with him as he flames out – the inevitable Trumpian disaster leaves House and Senate Republicans with a stark choice – Defend him or stand back silently, and Trump drags the Republican Party along with him as he flames out – the inevitable Trumpian disaster leaves House and Senate Republicans with a stark choice – Defend him or stand back silently, and Trump drags the Republican Party along with him as he flames out – the inevitable Trumpian disaster leaves House and Senate Republicans with a stark choice – Defend him or stand back silently, and Trump drags the Republican
“Dirty nigger! Or simply, “Look a Negro!” I came into the world imbued with the will to find a meaning in things, my spirit filled with the desire to attain to the source of the world, and then I found that I was an object in the midst of other objects. Sealed into that crushing objecthood, I turned beseechingly to others. Their attention was a liberation, running over my body suddenly abraded into nonbeing, endowing me once more with an agility that I had thought lost, and by taking me out of the world, restoring me to it. But just as I reached the other side, I stumbled, and the movements, the attitudes, the glances of the other fixed me there, in the sense in which a chemical solution is fixed by a dye. I was indignant; I demanded an explanation. Nothing happened. I
DeVos is sounding an old tune in her insistence on the power of parental choice as a lever to improve education in America. In the late 1980s and early 1990s, the notion became a rallying cry for conservatives and some liberals eager for states to embrace private school voucher programs, charter schools, or both. Charter schools are public-private hybrids that typically must follow the reporting requirements of traditional public schools, including test scores and graduation rates. Voucher programs, by contrast, divert public funds—often in the form of “tuition vouchers”—to private schools that lack the regulations and transparency of public ones. Voucher programs, by contrast, divert public funds—often in the form of “tuition vouchers”—to private schools that lack the regulations and transparency of public ones. Voucher programs, by contrast, divert public funds—often in the form of “tu
The EPA is responsible for enforcing federal clean water and safe drinking water standards under the Clean Water Act and the Safe Drinking Water Act. EPA Regions 6 and 8 (Colorado, Utah, Wyoming) administer the DWIG-TSA program in conjunction with IHS, funding projects identified and prioritized by the IHS SFC Program. EPA Region 9 (Arizona, California, Nevada) has established its own solicitation process and provides DWIG-TSA funding both directly to Tribes and through IHS. EPA Region 6 (New Mexico) and 8 (Colorado, Utah, Wyoming) administer the DWIG-TSA program in conjunction with IHS, funding projects identified and prioritized by the IHS SFC Program. EPA Region 9 (Arizona, California, Nevada) has established its own solicitation process and provides DWIG-TSA funding both directly to Tri
It’s not clear that harsher enforcement decreases the supply of drugs, said Harold Pollack, of the University of Chicago. It’s not clear that harsher enforcement efforts decrease the supply of drugs, said Harold Pollack, of the University of Chicago. It’s not clear that harsher enforcement efforts decrease the supply of drugs, said Harold Pollack, of the University of Chicago. It’s not clear that harsher enforcement efforts decrease the supply of drugs, said Harold Pollack, of the University of Chicago. It’s not clear that harsher enforcement efforts decrease the supply of drugs, said Harold Pollack, of the University of Chicago. It’s not clear that harsher enforcement efforts decrease the supply of drugs, said Harold Pollack, of the University of Chicago. It’s not clear that harsher enforcement efforts decrease the supply of drugs, said Harold Pollack, of the University of Chicago. It’s not clear that harsher enforcement efforts decrease
The NAACP argued that both the Detroit Board and state government actively increased school segregation by implementing an optional attendance zone policy, building new schools in white neighborhoods, and drawing boundaries that created the most racially segregated schools possible. The NAACP argued that both the Detroit Board and state government actively increased school segregation by implementing an optional attendance zone policy, building new schools in white neighborhoods, and drawing boundaries that created the most racially segregated schools possible. The NAACP argued that both the Detroit Board and state government actively increased school segregation by implementing an optional attendance zone policy, building new schools in white neighborhoods, and drawing boundaries that created the most racially segregated schools possible. The NAACP argued that both the Detroit Board and state government actively increased school segregation by implementing an optional attendance zone policy, building new schools in white neighborhoods, and drawing boundaries that created
Securitization is the result of institutionalization of the field of security and the construction of threats through speech act, acceptance of the audience and facilitating conditions or other nonsecuritizing actors contribute to a successful securitization through the speech act, acceptance of the audience and facilitating conditions or other nonsecuritizing actors contribute to a successful securitization through the speech act, acceptance of the audience and facilitating conditions or other nonsecuritizing actors contribute to a successful securitization through the speech act, acceptance of the audience and facilitating conditions or other nonsecuritizing actors contribute to a successful securitization through the speech act, acceptance of the audience and facilitating conditions or other nonsecuritizing actors contribute to a successful securitization through the speech act, acceptance of the audience and facilitating conditions or other nonsecuritizing actors contribute to a successful securitization through
Competitive grantmaking creates a system of education winners and losers that creates a system of education winners and losers that creates a system of education winners and losers that creates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system of education winners and losers that perpetuates a system
Predictive policing is a de facto system of separate and unequal application of laws, police practices, sentencing terms, and conditions of confinement that operates more as a system of social control by racial hierarchy that operates more as a de facto system of separate and unequal application of laws, police practices, conviction rates, sentencing terms, and conditions of confinement that operates more as a system of social control by racial hierarchy that operates more as a de facto system of separate and unequal application of laws, police practices, conviction rates, sentencing terms, and conditions of confinement that operates more as a system of social control by racial hierarchy that operates more as a de facto system of separate and unequal application of laws, police practices, conviction rates, sentencing terms, and conditions of confinement that operates more as a system of social control by
Threat hunting is essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to stop and prevent attacks in its networks – it’s essential to any organization that wants to
CO2 acts like a blanket, preventing heat from escaping – more frequent and intense heat waves, widespread crop failures, dramatic shifts in animal and plant ranges, and dramatic shifts in animal and plant ranges
Russia’s main motives in Latin America are geopolitical and tied to its self-presentation as a great global superpower and rival of America. Latin American states will not follow Russian policies against their own interests simply to gain trade or let Russia hijack them for its purposes, unless the Obama administration utterly ignores them, which is unlikely.
Blackness is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness here is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness here is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness here is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness here is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness here is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness here is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness here is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness here is not a term of intimacy or human vagary but of publicness. Blackness
Life is the luxury of which death is the highest degree, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries of life, human life is the most extravagantly expensive, that of all the luxuries
China’s expanding economic presence in Latin America generates economic stability and well-being in a manner that suits the U.S. desire to see a prosperous and healthy neighborhood – China is unlikely to automatically encroach on potential U.S. markets in Latin America because its enhanced presence will help spur the development of entirely new markets in Latin America to which the U.S. will have access. China is unlikely to automatically encroach on potential U.S. markets in Latin America because its enhanced presence will help spur the development of entirely new markets in Latin America to which the U.S. will have access. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Pan’s argument that the China opportunity theory leads to inevitable disappointment and subtly reinforces the China threat paradigm is, also, somewhat misleading. Pan’s subsequent argument that the China opportunity thesis leads to inevitable disappointment and subtly reinforces the China threat paradigm is, also, somewhat misleading. Pan’s subsequent argument that the China opportunity thesis leads to inevitable disappointment and subtly reinforces the China threat paradigm is, also, somewhat misleading. Pan’s subsequent argument that the China opportunity thesis leads to inevitable disappointment and subtly reinforces the China threat paradigm is, also, somewhat misleading. Pan’s subsequent argument that the China opportunity thesis leads to inevitable disappointment and subtly reinforces the China threat paradigm is, also, somewhat misleading. Pan’s subsequent argument that the China opportunity thesis leads to inevitable disappointment and subtly reinforces the China threat paradigm is, also, somewhat misleading. Pan’s subsequent argument that the China opportunity thesis leads to inevitable disappointment and
War of (over, for) speed is an irreducibly new phenomenon, an invention linked to a set of inventions of the so-called nuclear age, or is it rather the brutal acceleration of a movement that has always been at work? This form of the question itself is the war of (over, for) speed (with all that it entails) an irreducibly new phenomenon, an invention linked to a set of inventions of the so-called nuclear age, or is it rather the brutal acceleration of a movement that has always already been at work? This form of the question itself is the war of (over, for) speed (with all that it entails) an irreducibly new phenomenon, an invention linked to a set of inventions of the so-called nuclear age, or is it rather the brutal acceleration of a movement that has always already been at work? This form of the question itself is the
Man-made, endocrine disrupting chemicals are just another version of the trivial dichotomy natural is good versus man-made is bad – it’s just another version of the trivial dichotomy natural is good versus man-made is bad – why should EDCs primarily affect male sex, such as a potential decline in male fertility, a hypothetical increase in the incidence of hypospadias and cryptorchidism in male babies, increase in the incidence of male testicular cancers, a reduced penis length in male alligators, Guilette et al., 1996), or cause feminisation of male fish? ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
To woo the “underdeveloped” away from communism was to maintain him within the Western capitalist bloc – the “underdeveloped” was stabilized in international relation theory and practice as a specific problem that the Western bloc of sovereign states urgently had to address – the “underdeveloped” was stabilized in international relation theory and practice as a specific problem that the Western bloc of sovereign states urgently had to address – the “underdeveloped” was stabilized in international relation theory and practice as a specific problem that the Western bloc of sovereign states urgently had to address – the “underdeveloped” was stabilized in international relation theory and practice as a specific problem that the Western bloc of sovereign states urgently had to address – the “underdeveloped” was stabilized in international relation theory and practice as a specific problem that the Western bloc of sovereign states urgently had to address – the “underdeveloped” was stabilized in international
Prolif will come to be seen as a lost cause and the restraints on prolif will come to be seen as a lost cause and the transition to a highly proliferated world will be very rapid – restraints on prolif will come to be seen as a lost cause and the transition to a highly proliferated world will come to be seen as a lost cause and the restraints on prolif will come to be seen as a lost cause and the restraints on prolif will come to be seen as a lost cause and the restraints on prolif will come to be seen as a lost cause and the restraints on prolif will come to be seen as a lost cause and the restraints on prolif will come to be seen as a lost cause and the restraints on prolif will
“Highly skilled” workers aren’t the best and brightest around the world – they’re not the best and brightest around the world – they’re people of just ordinary talent, doing ordinary work. They’re not the best and brightest around the world – they’re people of just ordinary talent, doing ordinary work. They’re not the best and brightest around the world – they’re people of just ordinary talent, doing ordinary work. They’re not the best and brightest around the world – they’re people of just ordinary talent, doing ordinary work. They’re not the best and brightest around the world – they’re people of just ordinary talent, doing ordinary work. They’re not the best and brightest around the world – they’re people of just ordinary talent, doing ordinary work. They’re not the best and brightest around the world – they’re people
The US is overestimating the impact of cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness – it overestimates the impact of commercial cyber espionage on US competitiveness –
Capitalism is the operating system of the world economy that consumes vast quantities of resources from the environment and returns to the environment vast quantities of waste products. Capitalism is a powerful drive to earn profi ts, invest them, innovate, and thus grow the economy, typically at exponential rates, with the result that the capitalist era has in fact been characterized by a remarkable exponential expansion of the world economy. Capitalism as we know it today encompasses the core economic concept of private employers hiring workers to produce products and services that the employers own and then sell with the intention of making a profi t. But it also includes competitive markets, the price mechanism, the modern corporation as its principal institution, the consumer society and the materialistic values that sustain it, and the administrative state actively promoting economic strength and growth for a variety of reasons. Inherent in the dynamics of capitalism is a powerful drive to earn profi
Education is key to economic growth – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to school – it doesn’t matter how long you went to
Manufacturing has the largest backward linkage – a dollar’s worth of final sales of manufactured products supports $1.33 in output from other sectors – a dollar’s worth of final sales of manufactured products supports $1.33 in output from other sectors – a dollar’s worth of final sales of manufactured products supports $1.33 in output from other sectors – a dollar’s worth of final sales of manufactured products supports $1.33 in output from other sectors – a dollar’s worth of final sales of manufactured products supports $1.33 in output from other sectors – a dollar’s worth of final sales of manufactured products supports $1.33 in output from other sectors – a dollar’s worth of final sales of manufactured products supports $1.33 in output from other sectors – a dollar’s worth of final sales of manufactured products supports $1.33 in output from other sectors – a dollar’s worth
Private prisons have been ineffective at providing high-quality detention services – the GEO Group and CoreCivic donated $250,00062 each to President Trump’s inaugural committee.
US norms will cause less harm than raw international law – authoritarian states are likely to select norms that serve the interests of those in power, regardless of the norms we adopt. 
There’s too many people on the planet to sustainably support on the planet – there’s a four in five chance the world’s population will be between 9.6 and 12.3 billion by the end of the century – there’s a four in five chance the world’s population will be between 9.6 and 12.3 billion by the end of the century – there’s a four in five chance the world’s population will be between 9.6 and 12.3 billion by the end of the century – there’s a four in five chance the world’s population will be between 9.6 and 12.3 billion by the end of the century – there’s a four in five chance the world’s population will be between 9.6 and 12.3 billion by the end of the century – there’s a four in five chance the world’s population will be between 9.6 and 12.3 billion by the end of
The Cuban embargo is a form of retribution aimed at the United States in response to the imposition of the embargo in the midst of its unfathomable and deplorable effects on the Cuban populace. The embargo is a form of retribution aimed at the United States in response to the imposition of the embargo in the midst of its unfathomable and deplorable effects on the Cuban populace. The embargo is a form of retribution aimed at the United States in response to the imposition of the embargo in the midst of its unfathomable and deplorable effects on the Cuban populace. The embargo is a form of retribution aimed at the United States in response to the imposition of the embargo in the midst of its unfathom
A superintelligence poses a fundamentally different problem than those typically studied under the banner of “robot ethics.” This is because a superintelligence is multifaceted, and therefore potentially capable of mobilizing a diversity of resources in order to achieve objectives that are potentially incomprehensible to humans, let alone controllable.
Latin America can be physically grouped as a geographic region, but referring to Latin America as one leg in a triangular relationship falsely assumes that actions by the other legs—the United States and China impact Latin America as a whole. 
The conventional wisdom on conspiracy theories flies in the face of history and would be politically catastrophic if put into practice. It would blind us to the machinations of torturers and scheming politicians, and convert a large part of the political realm into a chaos of incoherent effects whose causes were beyond the reach of rational enquiry.
The energy revolution of the 21st century isn’t about solar energy or wind power and the “scramble for oil” isn’t going to drive global politics – if the energy revolution now taking shape lives up to its full potential, we are headed into a new century in which the location of the world’s energy resources and the structure of the world’s energy trade support American affluence at home and power abroad – if the energy revolution now taking shape lives up to its full potential, we are headed into a new century in which the location of the world’s energy resources and the structure of the world’s energy trade support American affluence at home and power abroad – if the energy revolution now taking shape lives up to its full potential, we are headed into a new century in which the location of the world’s energy resources and the structure of the world’s energy trade
The Department of Defense will reclaim two Humvees that were given to Ferguson, Missouri, under a controversial program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several government officials involved in the program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several government officials involved in the program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several government officials involved in the program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several government officials involved in the program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several government officials involved in the program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several government officials involved in the program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several government officials involved in the program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several government officials involved in the program to distribute surplus weapons, vehicles, and other gear, according to several
U.S.-Japan FTA negotiable – Japan-EU FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-Japan FTA negotiable – US-J
The “China Threat” argument is based on a narcissistic understanding of the U.S. self and on a positivist-based realism, concerned with absolute certainty and security, a concern central to the dominant U.S. self-imaginary, concerned with absolute certainty and security, a concern central to the dominant U.S. self-imaginary, concerned with absolute certainty and security, a concern central to the dominant U.S. self-imaginary, concerned with absolute certainty and security, a concern central to the dominant U.S. self-imaginary, concerned with absolute certainty and security, a concern central to the dominant U.S. self-imaginary, concerned with absolute certainty and security, a concern central to the dominant U.S. self-imaginary, concerned with absolute certainty and security, a concern central to the dominant U.S. self-imaginary
Modernity and coloniality can be seen as projects for the radical reconversion of human and biophysical ecologies world wide. One may speak about a systematic project of cultural, ecological, and economic reconversion along eurocentric lines. Conversely, one may consider the need to build on practices of cultural, ecological, and economic difference for concrete projects of world transformation – for worlds and knowledges otherwise. This helps give flesh and blood to the colonial difference and global coloniality. One may speak about a systematic project of cultural, ecological, and economic reconversion along eurocentric lines. Alternatively, one may consider the need to come up with new economic imaginaries, imaginaries that enable effective and practical resistance to the seemingly overpowering imaginary of the market sanctified by neoliberal globalization. Ethnographically, we can follow in the wake of ecological anthropologists documenting practices of ecological difference, which
The South China Sea is not a flashpoint – the US and China have gone to great lengths to manage crises and prevent them from spiraling out of control
U.S.-Russia relations in Asia and the Pacific require both sides to make something of a conceptual leap. For the United States, it means taking Moscow seriously as an Asian power. For Russia, it means accepting the limitations of its strategic partnership with China and pursuing a more balanced approach in the region—including making rapprochement with Japan a priority. It also means being serious about developing Siberia and the Far East, which will be the most important factor in the success or failure of Russia’s push for greater influence in Asia and the Pacific. The United States has never seen Russia as a major power in Asia and the Pacific, a view that Russia’s own ambivalence has only reinforced. The United States has reason to welcome and even promote a more prominent Russian presence in the region—but only if Washington is convinced that Russia’s Asia pivot is both substantive and not driven by a desire to counterbalance US
Mexico is already the United States’ third-largest trading partner, while the United States ranks first among Mexico’s trading partners. Mexico is already the United States’ third-largest trading partner, while the United States ranks first among Mexico’s trading partners. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
The U.S. federal government trumps state laws – the EPA, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Environmental Protection Agency, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, the
Water wars caused by drought, crop failures, and a shortage of fresh water are as urgent now for the public in many areas as the use of nuclear bombs, chemical weapons, and other weapons of mass destruction. They lead to massive migration flows, exacerbate the political situation, and are the cause of armed clashes and wars.
Maduro’s long-term challenges are looming – inflation, public anger over the chronic shortages of basic goods, and the ballooning murder rate exceeds Europe and the US’s combined
Any overarching normative criterion for inclusion in the pluriversal is contradictory to the idea of pluriversality. Any overarching normative criterion for inclusion in the pluriversal is contradictory to the idea of pluriversality. Any overarching normative criterion for inclusion in the pluriversal is contradictory to the idea of pluriversality. Jürgen Habermas’ attempts to produce overarching norms come under the understandable criticism that these work again to be exclusionary of those who cannot or don’t want to be discursively engaged, who cannot or refuse to accept the terms of engagement, and this would include some indigenous groups, for example, who want disengagement and autonomy more than anything else. Yet without an overarching normative criterion for inclusion in the pluriversal, Dussel is right that plurivers
Adopting a rights based approach to development aid perpetuates neo-colonial biases and creates a repressive apparatus that prevents people from crossing to Europe. 
Last year, attempts to create huge marine reserves in Antarctica failed when Russia blocked plans by the US and others for a third time. Ocean campaigners have welcomed the new US plan as an important step – there is an amazing array of biodiversity around these islands, there are sea mount systems with a lot of deep sea species, all types of marine mammals. 
U.S. inflation accelerated in May to the fastest pace in more than six years, reinforcing the Fed’s outlook for gradual interest-rate hikes while eroding wage gains that remain relatively tepid despite an 18-year low in unemployment.
Business conditions continue to improve, but much more slowly than in pre-crisis years – the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as the economy undergoes a process of deleveraging as
Petrobras has taken numerous steps to cope with its rising risks, they have hundreds of trained workers available to respond to oil spills round the clock, and thousands more that they can mobilize on short notice for shoreline cleanups. They’ve stockpiled the equipment needed to contain offshore spills, such as oil pumps, dispersants and skimmers. Their offshore drilling rigs use preventive mechanisms such as gas detectors and well pressure alarms. They have vessels dedicated to oil spill control and firefighting, in addition to support boats and barges. In an effort to coordinate their responses to spills, they created ten environmental protection centers throughout Brazil that can act jointly or individually depending on the emergency. They also conducted 18 regional drills in 2011 with the Brazilian Navy, the Civil Defense, firefighters, the military police, environmental organizations, and local governmental and community entities. 
China, India, Pakistan, Japan, South Korea, Great Britain, France, and Germany will all have nuclear weapons capability, as will Israel, Iran, Egypt, and North Korea. China, India, Pakistan, Japan, South Korea, Great Britain, France, and Germany will all have nuclear weapons capability, as will Israel, Iran, Egypt, and North Korea. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
China threat theory creates a perception of China as a revisionist power that encircles India with a network of hostile alliances and fomenting Islamic fundamentalism in Kashmir and beyond. 
Even if high-income countries fulfill their commitments, these do not necessarily lead to the 2 °C target – even if high-income countries fulfill their commitments, these do not necessarily lead to the 2 °C target – even if high-income countries fulfill their commitments, these do not necessarily lead to the 2 °C target – even if high-income countries fulfill their commitments, these do not necessarily lead to the 2 °C target – even if high-income countries fulfill their commitments, these do not necessarily lead to the 2 °C target – even if high-income countries fulfill their commitments, these do not necessarily lead to the 2 °C target – even if high-income countries fulfill their commitments, these do not necessarily lead to the 2 °C target – even if high-income countries fulfill their commitments, these do not necessarily lead to
emigration of doctors kills people in Africa – lack of incentives, lack of rural service incentives, lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a mismatch between medical training and the health problems of the poorest, weak transportation infrastructure, or abysmal sanitation systems, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a mismatch between medical training and the health problems of the poorest, weak transportation infrastructure, or abysmal sanitation systems, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals, a lack of adequate medical supplies and pharmaceuticals,
Using GPI and KOF indices allows for a variety of channels through which globalization can affect the level of peacefulness in a country and vice versa i.e. increasing levels of internal and external peace that facilitates the integration of a country in the globalization process in all its facets: economic, political, social. 
U.S. aid to Mexico would create viable alternatives to illicit economic activities for Mexicans living in poverty.
Using science for diplomacy doesn’t solve – science diplomacy doesn’t solve – science diplomacy doesn’t solve – science diplomacy doesn’t solve – science diplomacy doesn’t solve – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomacy solves – science diplomac
State-centred security narratives are based on a deontological cosmopolitanism in which the security of people on the move prevails over any other issues, and a system of security based on the insecurity of the non-citizen individual is ethically reprehensible based on the insecurity of the non-citizen individual is ethically reprehensible based on the insecurity of the non-citizen individual is ethically reprehensible based upon the insecurity of the non-citizen individual is ethically reprehensible based upon the insecurity of the non-citizen individual is ethically reprehensible based upon the insecurity of the non-citizen individual is ethically reprehensible based upon the insecurity of the non-citizen individual is ethically reprehensible based upon
Burning methane hydrates will push global warming past the point of no return while further delaying the emergence of renewables as the world’s primary energy source – it’s impossible to discern whether the shift can be traced to changing environmental attitudes or old-fashioned political realism – it’s impossible to discern whether the shift can be traced to changing environmental attitudes or old-fashioned political realism – it’s impossible to discern whether the shift can be traced to changing environmental attitudes or old-fashioned political realism – it’s impossible to discern whether the shift can be traced to changing environmental attitudes or old-fashioned political realism – it’s impossible to discern whether the shift can be traced to changing environmental attitudes or old-fashioned political realism – it’s impossible to discern whether the shift can be traced to changing environmental attitudes or old-fashioned political realism –
Nuclear war causes famine, epidemics, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots,
Courts won’t be better able to make good on an inflexible statutory mandate – they’re used to dealing with issues of war and peace, as in considering war-risk insurance clauses. A mistake in the insurance context might implicate the survival of a company; a mistake in a case involving the use of U.S. forces abroad could well jeopardize the lives of our troops and might conceivably implicate the survival of the nation.
The idea of a scientific community is inseparable from the actual existence of science as an institution that would change humanity’s direction forever – it’s inseparable from the actual existence of science as an institution that would change humanity’s direction forever – it’s inseparable from the actual existence of science as an institution that would change humanity’s direction forever – the aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s aff’s 
Enframing can take place through an unlimited number of guises, practices and material settings, since it works by creating certainty on the availability, usability and controllability of things and subjects. Through the apparatus of enframing, the modern subject and the modern nature of paralysed objects were sucked up into standing reserves and thus revealed as an enframed array available for the use of calculative machinations. Through the apparatus of enframing, the modern subject and the modern nature of paralysed objects were sucked up into standing reserves and thus revealed as an enframed array available for the use of calculative machinations. Through the apparatus of enframing, the modern subject and the modern nature of paralysed objects were sucked up into standing reserves and thus revealed as an enframed array available for the use of calculative machinations.
The Indian is a threshold of past and future, regimes of signs characterized by polyvocality, dance, proximity to nature, and a plurilinear, multidimensional semiotic that wards off any kind of signifying circularity. Despite its origins in the “primitiveist” thought of Western philosophy, the presignifying regime serves in A Thousand Plateaus as the delineation of a system of signs characterized by polyvocality, dance, proximity to nature, and a plurilinear, multidimensional semiotic that wards off any kind of signifying circularity. Despite its origins in the “primitiveist” thought of Western philosophy, the presignifying regime serves in A Thousand Plateaus as the delineation of a system of signs characterized by polyvocality, dance, proximity to nature, and a plurilinear, multidimensional semiotic that wards
The human landscape is both object of development and a testimonial to its power, so too is its physical counterpart. In Johnston’s virtually uninhabited pre-colonial landscape, natural forests are destroyed by bush fires set by the evil-minded. This image is given analytical substance by several of the chapters in this volume. In her study of the silencing power of environmental discourse in colonial Kenya, Fiona Mackenzie argues that Africans are constructed as ’unscientific exploiters’ of the environment. Their knowledge of the local environment can then be disqualified as pre-modern and ’unscientific’. The peasant fanner, undifferentiated and ungendered, is established as the object in need of exogenous agricultural science and ’expertise’. In South Africa, the language of environmental mismanagement was also central to the idea of ‘separate development’ described by Tapscott
We have seen that there are plenty of problems caused by the Hegemony of English. The underlying problem is that there has been almost no criticism of the Hegemony of English. Rather, the Hegemony of English has been unconsciously accepted; it has been perceived as inevitable. The notion of English as a global standard language has been taken-for-granted knowledge. The West creates and represents the universal values, and therefore the rest of the world should follow the Western model. Especially during the times of Western imperialistic invasion of the whole world, Western-centered Universalism was employed to justify Western rule and control. Below is a speech by an Englishman who invaded Australia in the nineteenth century: Black men – Love White men. Love other tribes of black men. Do not quarrel together. Tell other tribes to love white men, and to build good huts and wear clothes. Learn to speak English
Grain markets have been on a bull run for the last several months, with futures prices hitting multiyear highs. Corn in early February 2021 hit a seven year high, with soybeans scoring six year highs. The move took many in the industry by surprise, given that grain prices in the spring of 2020 had hit new contract and multiyear lows at the height of the COVID-19 pandemic. The move took many in the industry by surprise, given that grain prices in the spring of 2020 had hit new contract and multiyear lows at the height of the COVID-19 pandemic. The move took many in the industry by surprise, given that grain prices in the spring of 2020 had hit new contract and multiyear lows at the height of the COVID-19 pandemic. The move took many in the industry by surprise, given that grain prices in the spring of 2020 had hit new contract and multiyear lows at
The aff’s failure to link military assistance and arms sales to a recipient country’s domestic political behavior is a structural problem – the aff’s failure to link military assistance and arms sales to a recipient country’s domestic political behavior is a structural problem – the aff’s failure to link military assistance and arms sales to a recipient country’s domestic political behavior is a structural problem – the aff’s failure to link military assistance and arms sales to a recipient country’s domestic political behavior is a structural problem – the aff’s failure to link military assistance and arms sales to a recipient country’s domestic political behavior is a structural problem – the aff’s failure to link military assistance and arms sales to a recipient country’s domestic political behavior is a structural problem – the aff’s failure to link military assistance and arms sales to a recipient country’s
The US is the world’s biggest military spender and the world’s leader in incarceration. 
Alternatives to the anthropocentric status quo are emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in the human imagination – alternative to the anthropocentric status quo is emerging in
Maduro reaffirmed his willingness to give asylum to Snowden because he cares enough about the nationalistic values Chávez so firmly defended. 
Bataille and Trungpa draw a strong causal link between existential resentment and particular systemic challenges such as class exploitation and racism. Their resonant approaches to the origins and cessation of domination resonantly link existential resentment to particular systemic challenges such as class exploitation and racism. Their resonant approaches to the origins and cessation of domination resonantly link existential resentment to particular systemic challenges such as class exploitation and racism. Their resonant approaches to the origins and cessation of domination resonantly link existential resentment to particular systemic challenges such as class exploitation and racism. Their resonant approaches to the origins and cessation of domination resonantly link existential
Sarbanes Oxley is a reversal of Sarbanes Oxley – it’s a reversal of Sarbanes Oxley – it’s a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal of a reversal
Trumpism repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies and repackages neoliberal “trickle-down” policies
Coral reefs in the Pacific islands, the Caribbean and coastal Florida are unique high diversity ecosystems, providing economic and environmental benefits such as food, tourism and buffering from coastal storms. Regional observing systems in these regions need to provide detailed information on physical, chemical and biological variables that can help managers evaluate reef health, understand what and why changes are occurring over time and better manage the wide array of impacts on these fragile habitats. Coral reefs in the Pacific islands, the Caribbean and coastal Florida are unique high diversity ecosystems, providing valuable economic and environmental benefits such as food, tourism and buffering from coastal storms. They are increasingly threatened by overfishing, pollution, sedimentation, ocean acidification, and warming trends that cause reef degradation and loss. Regional observing systems in these regions need to provide detailed information on physical, chemical and biological variables that can help managers evaluate reef health, understand what and why changes are occurring over time and better manage the wide array of impacts on
Cap-and-trade legislation makes it harder to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it – it’s easier to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than it is to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than it is to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than it is to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than it is to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than it is to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than it is to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than it is to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than it is to persuade Democrats from swing districts and states to vote for it than
Nuclear war causes famine, epidemics of infectious diseases, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food riots, food 
Even if the federal government reduces transportation spending, the overall economic effect is pretty small – there’s no correlation between congestion and job growth
For decades, immigrants and their families have played a vital role in the U.S. labor force and economy at large. Today, our broken immigration system stifles the contributions of immigrants and in turn withholds significant benefits from American workers.
Biden’s recommitment to multilateralism and climate change could be exploited by China, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide, the world’s largest emitter of carbon dioxide
Even if insider trading is harmful or otherwise morally wrongful and ought to be proscribed, lengthy sentences are hardly the most efficient way to achieve deterrence – even if insider trading is harmful or otherwise morally wrongful and ought to be proscribed, lengthy sentences are hardly the most efficient way to achieve deterrence – even if insider trading is harmful or otherwise morally wrongful and ought to be proscribed, lengthy sentences are hardly the most efficient way to achieve deterrence – even if insider trading is harmful or otherwise morally wrongful and ought to be proscribed, lengthy sentences are hardly the most efficient way to achieve deterrence – even if insider trading is harmful or otherwise morally wrongful and ought to be proscribed, lengthy sentences are hardly the most efficient way to achieve deterrence – even if insider trading is harmful or otherwise
Pemex’s decision to drill in the Perdido Fold Belt doesn’t make sense – it’s about defending the final frontier of national sovereignty and sticking the Mexican flag on the floor of the Gulf of Mexico to advise US companies that they have no right to drill for oil in the ultradeep waters on the Mexican side – it’s about defending the final frontier of national sovereignty and sticking the Mexican flag on the floor of the Gulf of Mexico to advise US companies that they have no right to drill for oil in the ultradeep waters on the Mexican side – it’s about defending the final frontier of national sovereignty and sticking the Mexican flag on the floor of the Gulf of Mexico to advise US companies that they have no right to drill for oil in the ultradeep waters on the Mexican side – it’s about defending the final frontier of national sovereignty and sticking the Mexican flag on the floor of the Gulf of Mexico to advise US companies that they
20 percent of those working on advanced artificial intelligence at the Berkeley Artificial Intelligence Research Lab are Chinese nationals. 30 of the 38 post-doctorial researchers at the University of Maryland’s Bing Nano Research Group are from China.
The U.S. economy is returning to where it was seven years ago – the economy is now leaner and more capable of sustainable growth
Structural analysis of settler colonialism creates a false binary between resistance/sovereignty and co-optation in the colonizing process – this creates a false dichotomy between resistance/sovereignty and co-optation in the colonizing process – this creates a false dichotomy between resistance/sovereignty and co-optation in the colonizing process – this creates a false dichotomy between resistance/sovereignty and co-optation in the colonizing process – this creates a false dichotomy between resistance/sovereignty and co-optation in the colonizing process – this creates a false dichotomy between resistance/sovereignty and co-optation in the colonizing process – this creates a false dich
Multiracialism is a movement of opposition to or defiance of the one drop rule, an injunction entirely singular to the historical construction of racial blackness in the North American instance. Multiracialism is a movement of opposition to or defiance of the one drop rule, an injunction entirely singular to the historical construction of racial blackness in the North American instance. Multiracialism is a movement of opposition to or defiance of the one drop rule, an injunction entirely singular to the historical construction of racial blackness in the North American instance. Multiracialism is a movement of opposition to or defiance of the one drop rule, an injunction entirely singular to the historical construction of racial blackness in the North American instance. Multiracialism is a movement of opposition to or defiance of the one drop rule, an injunction entirely singular to the
In a statement, Trumka said the federation was committed to ending systemic racism, bringing about criminal justice reform and demanding “better practices from our nation’s police departments and officers.” In a statement, Trumka said the federation was committed to ending systemic racism, bringing about criminal justice reform and demanding “better practices from our nation’s police departments and officers.” In a statement, Trumka said the federation was committed to ending systemic racism, bringing about criminal justice reform and demanding “better practices from our nation’s police departments and officers.” In a statement, Trumka said the federation was committed to ending systemic racism, bringing about criminal justice reform and demanding “better practices from our nation’s police departments and officers.” In a statement, Trumka said the federation was committed to ending systemic racism, bringing about criminal justice reform and
Mexico’s infrastructure is key to success in the global economy – recurrent financial crises, the insufficiency of public finances, the lack of clear incentives, and a network of trade agreements allow Mexico direct access to the world’s largest market but to different regions and to more than one billion consumers on several continents. 
Green democracy is not a logical and unconditional relationship, but a contingent and highly conditional one that relies on a number of additional constraints and assumptions that cannot be supposed to apply in general – it is a contingent and highly conditional one that relies on a number of additional constraints and assumptions that cannot be supposed to apply in general – it is a contingent and highly conditional one that relies on a number of additional constraints and assumptions that cannot be supposed to apply in general – it is a contingent and highly conditional one that relies on a number of additional constraints and assumptions that cannot be supposed to apply in general – it is a contingent and highly conditional one that relies on a number of additional constraints and assumptions that cannot be supposed to apply in general – it is a contingent and highly conditional one that relies on a number of additional constraints and assumptions that cannot be supposed to apply in
AI race isn’t winning – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which no one wins – it’s creating a world in which
US economy shrank at a 32.9% annual rate between April and June as the country grappled with lockdowns and spending cutbacks during the pandemic
The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens owe a responsibility. The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens owe a responsibility. The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens owe a responsibility. The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens owe a responsibility. The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens owe a responsibility. The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens owe a responsibility. The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens owe a responsibility. The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens owe a responsibility. The state is the only legitimate user of force and the organisation to which individual citizens
Microsoft v. United States exemplifies some of the shortcomings of existing law to fit modern technology. Officially named (in clunky fashion) In the Matter of a Warrant to Search a Certain E-Mail Account Controlled and Maintained by Microsoft Corporation, the case shows how ECPA has fallen out of date and wasn’t really created with contemporary cloud computing in mind. A New York magistrate judge issued a warrant requested by the Department of Justice on Microsoft to turn over data stored in Ireland. The warrant was issued under ECPA’s Stored Communications Act (SCA). Microsoft sought to quash the warrant. Microsoft argued that the government should not be able to demand from Microsoft data stored in a foreign country without going through the Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty between that country and the United States. The government cannot use a warrant under the Fourth Amendment to gather data oversees. The warrant would be meaningless in
The Afghan drug trade fuels the insurgency, fuels corruption, and creates major public health challenges. We cannot afford to divert our attention away from counternarcotics efforts in Afghanistan. The United States faces difficult choices in terms of prioritizing diminishing resources and manpower to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in order to ensure that only the most effective programs and strategies are implemented in
Retaining satellite coverage in the AM and mid-AM orbits would have the greatest effect on military operational planners, for whom having the most recent local observations, particularly visual imagery, is important. Metop satellites carry the AVHRR imager (the same instrument included in Option 2 and 3), which has some spatial distortion that makes its imagery less than ideal for visual interpretation, and it does not have the high-sensitivity day-night band that is available on DMSP. Further, DMSP satellites broadcast data directly to users in the field, both on land and onboard ships. That capability is not currently available on Metop. If two mid-AM orbit satellites were added to Option 1 to retain the current two-orbit DoD coverage, CBO estimates that it would require an additional $3.2 billion to procure and launch those satellites, not counting any additional storage costs.
Mexico emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emboldens anti-immigrant sentiment, emb
Nuclear deterrence rests on the ability of strategic assets to survive an enemy’s first strike and to retaliate, ensuring mutually assured destruction. UUVs can function without the direction of a human operator and have wide dual-use (that is, civilian and military) applications. UUVs can gather intelligence on opponents, detect and neutralise mines, hunt submarines and chart the ocean floor. They can detonate warheads and take part in a coordinated attack on an enemy submarine in conjunction with ’friendly’ submarines and surface vessels. UUVs can function without the direction of a human operator and have wide dual-use (that is, civilian and military) applications. UUVs can function without the direction of a human operator and have wide dual-use (that is, civilian and military) applications. UUVs can function without the direction of a human operator and have wide dual
Attack on Iran escalates into a nuclear war in the Middle East, destabilizing a region that is already deep in problems
Teacher unionism is key to building a counter-hegemonic alliance with the power to defeat neoliberal education that prefigures the society we wish to have—one premised not on exploitation but on the full development of human beings in social solidarity that prefigures the society we wish to have—one premised not just to defend the public education we have, but to advocate for a just, inclusive, democratic, humanizing education that prefigures the society we wish to have—one premised not just to defend the public education we have, but to advocate for a just, inclusive, democratic, humanizing education that prefigures the society we wish to have—one premised not just to defend the public education we have, but to advocate for a just, inclusive, democratic, humanizing education that prefigures the society we wish to have—one premised not
(--) Advancing American AI Innovation Act passed as part of the FY 2022 National Defense Authorization Act (NDAA). This bipartisan legislation creates a Department of Defense pilot program establishing AI data libraries relevant to the development of AI intelligence software and technology, ensuring private companies have access to accurate data so they can better meet DoD needs. This bipartisan legislation creates a Department of Defense pilot program establishing AI data libraries relevant to the development of AI intelligence software and technology, ensuring private companies have access to accurate data so they can better meet DoD needs. This bipartisan legislation creates a Department of Defense pilot program establishing AI data libraries relevant to the development of AI intelligence software and technology, ensuring private companies have access to accurate data so they can better meet DoD needs. This bipartisan legislation creates a Department of Defense pilot program establishing AI data libraries relevant to the development of AI intelligence software and technology, 
The U.S. economy is resilient to rising oil prices – a 10 cent increase in oil prices knocks around 0.2% off output in the first year and 0.5% in the second year. The impact on growth and inflation in individual countries will differ. In America, a net importer which taxes fuel lightly, the standard rule is that a $10 increase in oil prices (which corresponds to a 25 cent rise in the price of petrol) knocks around 0.2% off output in the first year and 0.5% in the second year. That would slow, but hardly fell, an economy that is widely expected to grow by more than 2% this year. The impact on growth and inflation in individual countries will differ. In America, a net importer which taxes fuel lightly, the standard rule is that a $10 increase in oil prices (which corresponds to a 25 cent rise in the price of petrol) knocks around 0.2% off output in the
The neoliberal accommodationist economic structure engenders niche marketing of various ethnic and minoritized groups, normalizing the production of a gay and lesbian tourism industry built on the discursive distinction between gay-friendly and not-gay-friendly destinations. Not unlinked to this is what I call the “human rights industrial complex.” The neoliberal accommodationist economic structure engenders niche marketing of various ethnic and minoritized groups, normalizing the production of a gay and lesbian tourism industry built on the discursive distinction between gay-friendly and not-gay-friendly destinations. Not unlinked to this is what I call the “human rights industrial complex.” The neoliberal accommodationist economic structure engenders niche marketing of various ethnic and minoritized groups, normalizing the production of a gay and lesbian tourism industry built on the discursive distinction between gay-friendly and
Exports are normalized, routinized, serial moments of exception operating within the terrain of security, dealing with weapons technologies that are not only securitized but militarized, yet dealt with in individual decisions that are, by and large, not even heavily politicized. Even Parliamentary or Congressional committees concerned with defence exports rarely consider more than a tiny proportion of these decisions. They are the example, par excellence of decisions taken within a narrow body of security professionals, as part of daily bureaucratic routines whose only external audience is usually the company applying for licences. This is security as an oxymoron – technologies that are not only securitized but militarized, yet dealt with in individual decisions that are, by and large, not even heavily politicized, serial moments of exception operating as part of daily bureaucratic routines whose only external audience is usually the company applying for licences
Nuclear expansion reduces “elemental diversity” by depleting the world’s supply of rare metals and making them unavailable to future generations
Turkey has lifted its veto over Finland and Sweden’s bid to join NATO, ending a weeks-long dispute that tested the unity of the alliance against Russia’s invasion of Ukraine.
Kurdish forces have seized Tal Abyad, cutting a key supply route from Turkey to Raqqa and increasing the likelihood of convoys being intercepted or destroyed
US economic preeminence in Latin America has waned in recent years. China and Europe have made huge inroads in the region – their share of trade in Brazil, Chile, and Peru has surpassed that of the U.S. China and Europe have made huge inroads in the region – their share of trade in Brazil, Chile, and Peru has surpassed that of the U.S. China and Europe have made huge inroads in the region – their share of trade in Brazil, Chile, and Peru has surpassed that of the U.S. China and Europe have made huge inroads in the region – their share of trade in Brazil, Chile, and Peru has surpassed that of the U.S. China and Europe have made huge inroads in the region – their share of trade in Brazil, Chile, and Peru has surpassed that of the U.S. China and Europe have made huge in
The NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the US has more favorable conditions for cooperation from the major Internet service providers because many of them are US companies. The NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments – the NSA programs in the US are larger in scope than those of other governments
Protected areas create natural refuges that were too deep, remote, hard to locate, or unfishable in the past – demersal populations can re-produce supplying eggs and larvae dispersed by ocean currents to both reserves and surrounding fished areas
The U.S. will be short of 1.1 million STEM workers by 2024—it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations—it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across all STEM occupations---it’s not consistent across
EU integration is a political project right from the founding Treaty of Rome in 1957 – the rest of Europe has always wanted to keep the show on the road because they see closer co-operation as an ideal and a way of avoiding World War III in Europe.
Under the new U.S. policy drone sales can now to go through the direct commercial sales (DCS) process instead of the more time-consuming foreign military sales (FMS) process. Under the new U.S. policy drone sales can now to go through the direct commercial sales (DCS) process instead of the more time-consuming foreign military sales (FMS) process. Under the new U.S. policy drone sales can now to go through the direct commercial sales (DCS) process instead of the more time-consuming foreign military sales (FMS) process. Under the new U.S. policy drone sales can now to go through the direct commercial sales (DCS) process instead of the more time-consuming foreign military sales (FMS) process. Under the new U.S. policy drone sales can now to go through the direct commercial sales (DCS) process instead of the more time-consuming foreign military sales (FMS) process.
The Constitution grants the president the power to grant reprieves and pardons for offenses against the United States, except in cases of impeachment. The same constitutional sentence giving the president authority to reduce or eliminate most federal legal sanctions also identifies the president as the Commander in Chief of the armed forces. The bare text of Article II, Section 2 of the Constitutional Convention, the Framers’ intent in light of their understanding of treason as a warlike act, and subsequent historical practice all suggest a greater connection than has been drawn between the president’s war powers and the power to pardon. The bare text of Article II, Section 2 of the Constitutional Convention, the Framers’ intent in light of their understanding of treason as a warlike act, and subsequent historical practice all suggest a greater connection than has been drawn between the president’s war powers and the power to pardon
Water scarcity is key to poverty alleviation in Sub-Saharan Africa – a lack of awareness of the impact of water scarcity on poverty alleviation in Sub-Saharan Africa resulted in a lack of awareness of the impact of water scarcity on poverty alleviation in Sub-Saharan Africa – a lack of awareness of the impact of water scarcity on poverty alleviation in Sub-Saharan Africa – a lack of awareness of the impact of water scarcity on poverty alleviation in Sub-Saharan Africa – a lack of awareness of the impact of water scarcity on poverty alleviation in Sub-Saharan Africa – a lack of awareness of the impact of water scarcity on poverty alleviation in Sub-Saharan Africa – a lack of awareness of the impact of water scarcity on poverty alleviati
Law enforcement likes forfeiture money because, as one police chief stated, it’s based on a need-well, I take that back. There’s some limitations on it-well, I take that back. There’s not really on the forfeiture stuff. We just usually base it on something that would be nice to have that we can’t get in the budget, for instance. We try not to use it for things that we need to depend on because we need to have those purchased. It’s kind of like pennies from heaven-it gets you a toy or something that you need is the way we typically look at it to be perfectly honest.
The death of Antonin Scalia sets up a battle between the White House and the Senate over who will nominate a new associate justice—a dispute over governing norms and constitutional imperatives, played out in the most powerful republic in the world.
______________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Space-borne transponders are a potential inlet for a cyber attack – they can still be orbiting with enough propellant to move through space and with functional communications which could be reactivated. Even afterward it can still be orbiting with enough propellant to move through space and with functional communications which could be reactivated. Space contains thousands of satellites, both active and inactive, launched by numerous organizations and countries, hosting 5,000 space-borne transponders communicating with Earth. Every transmission is a potential inlet for a cyber attack. Space contains thousands of satellites, both active and inactive, launched by numerous organizations and countries, hosting 5,000 space-borne transponders communicating with Earth. Every transmission is a potential inlet for a cyber attack. Space contains thousands of satellites, both active and inactive, launched by numerous organizations and countries, hosting 5,000 space-borne transponders communicating with Earth
Virginia is poised to reap big benefits from offshore oil and natural gas development if the federal government allows drilling in the Atlantic Outer Continental Shelf (OCS). The state would gain about 5,000 jobs by 2025 and nearly 25,000 jobs a decade later. Only North Carolina and South Carolina – states with ample coastlines on the Atlantic – would fare better. Only North Carolina and South Carolina – states with ample coastlines on the Atlantic – would fare better. Only North Carolina and South Carolina – states with ample coastlines on the Atlantic – would fare better. Only North Carolina and South Carolina – states with ample coastlines on the Atlantic – would fare better. Only North Carolina and South Carolina – states with ample coastlines on the Atlantic – would fare better. Only North Carolina and South Carolina – states with ample coastlines on the Atlantic – would fare better. Only North Carolina and South Carolina –
(k) The term “exploration” means the process of searching for minerals, including (1) geophysical surveys where magnetic, gravity, seismic, or other systems are used to detect or imply the presence of such minerals, and (2) any drilling, whether on or off known geological structures, including the drilling of a well in which a discovery of oil or natural gas in paying quantities is made and the drilling of any additional delineation well after such discovery which is needed to delineate any reservoir and to enable the lessee to determine whether to proceed with development and production; (l) The term “development” means those activities which take place following discovery of minerals in paying quantities, including geophysical activity, drilling, platform construction, and operation of all onshore support facilities, and which are for the purpose of ultimately producing the minerals discovered; (m) The term “production” means those activities which take place after the successful completion of any means for the removal of minerals,
China and Russia are key to US credibility as a responsible AI actor, increasing their attractiveness in the global competition for AI talent. If China and Russia don’t sign, it would undermine US credibility as a responsible AI actor, increasing their attractiveness in the global competition for AI talent.
Even in the context of the tsunami, nature is rendered into a picture that at once domesticates nature by enframing it and simultaneously guarantees, through this process of enframing the position of the spectator who watches the drama unfold from the safety of the shore or, as discussed below, as the magisterial viewer of a ’wall of screens’ (Natali 2006, 100–1) the position of the spectator who watches the drama unfold from the safety of the shore or, as the magisterial viewer of a ’wall of screens’ (Natali 2006, 100–1) the position of the spectator who watches the drama unfold from the safety of the shore or, as the magisterial viewer of a ’wall of screens’ (Natali 2006, 100–1) the position of the spectator who watches the drama unfold from the safety of the shore or, as the magisterial viewer of
Geography is the least appreciated factor that will mitigate the chances of a US-China war, but it could be nearly as important as nuclear weapons. Indeed, geography has a history of allowing countries to avoid the Thucydides Trap, and it works against a US-China war in a couple of ways. First, both the US and China are immensely large countries—according to the Central Intelligence Agency, the US and China are the third and fourth largest countries in the world by area, at 9,826,675 and 9,596,961 square km respectively. They also have difficult topographical features and complex populations. Neither China nor the U.S. has to realistically entertain such fears, and this will lessen their insecurity and therefore the security dilemma they operate within. Besides being immensely large countries, China and the U.S. are also separated by the Pacific Ocean, which will also weaken their sense
The aff’s “stateless” depiction of the US high tech economy accurately captures the prevailing understanding of US techno-industrial preeminence – the aff’s “stateless” depiction of the US high tech economy accurately captures the prevailing understanding of US techno-industrial preeminence – the aff’s “stateless” depiction of the US high tech economy accurately captures the prevailing understanding of US techno-industrial preeminence – the aff’s “stateless” depiction of the US high tech economy accurately captures the prevailing understanding of US techno-industrial preeminence – the aff’s “stateless” depiction of the US high tech economy accurately captures the prevailing understanding of US techno-industrial preeminence – the aff’s “stateless” depiction of the US high tech economy accurately capture
UAVs are employed as a high tech answer by government to problems such as drug trafficking, gang violence, deforestation, and other illegal activities
U.S. intervention in the Middle East has resulted in a war with Iran – it’s a result of a cozy relationship with the pro-American shah of Iran – it’s a result of a cozy relationship with the pro-American shah of Iran – it’s a result of a cozy relationship with the pro-American shah of Iran – it’s a result of a cozy relationship with the pro-American shah of Iran – it’s a result of a cozy relationship with the pro-American shah of Iran – it’s a result of a cozy relationship with the pro-American shah of Iran – it’s a result of a cozy relationship with the pro-American shah of Iran – it’s a result of a cozy relationship with the pro-American sha
The GED is a real alternative to secondary education – 861,000 people a year take the test in the United States and Canada, a 14-fold increase since the 1960s, with roughly a 70 percent passing rate. The GED is increasingly regarded as less of a last resort and more as a real alternative to secondary education for dropouts, immigrants, and home-schoolers, among others--ever more interchangeable with high school in some respects (students receive a GED diploma and are encouraged to attend graduation ceremonies) as well as in the eyes of colleges, employers, and the government. 
As of March 2011, there were 90,339 DOD contractor personnel in Afghanistan, compared to approximately 99,800 uniformed personnel. Contractors made up 48% of DOD’s workforce in Afghanistan – 20,000 40,000 60,000 80,000 100,000 120,000 Sep. 07 Dec. 07 Mar. 08 Jun. 08 Dec. 07 Mar. 08 Dec. 08 Mar. 09 Jun. 08 Dec. 08 Mar. 09 Dec. 10 Mar. 11 Total Contractors Troops Source: CENTCOM Quarterly Census Reports; Troop Levels in the Afghan and Iraq Wars, FY2001-FY2012: Cost and Other Potential Issues, by Amy Belasco; Joint Staff, Joint Chiefs of Staff, “Boots on the Ground” monthly reports to Congress. Type of Work Performed by Contractors DOD does not report the breakdown of services that contractors provide in Afghanistan, with the exception of data on private security contractors. 
EPA approval leads to access roads and decongestion at the actual border – a decade’s work of new infrastructure projects leads to a decade’s work of new access roads and decongestion at the actual border – a decade’s work of new infrastructure projects leads to a decade’s work of new access roads and decongestion at the actual border – a decade’s work of new infrastructure projects leads to a decade’s work of new access roads and decongestion at the actual border – a decade’s work of new infrastructure projects leads to a decade’s work of new access roads and decongestion at the actual border – a decade’s work of new infrastructure projects leads to a decade’s work of new access roads and decongestion at the actual border – a decade’s work of new infrastructure projects leads to a decade’s work of new access roads and
Native American border rights have not been a hot button issue on a nation-wide level – policy shifts, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double standards, double
Baudrillard is clear in his support for feminism when feminist critique and activism are aimed at the code, at the fundamental problem of the dichotomous logic that creates the split of male/female and makes the female the unmarked term (see MOP: 134–5). In the opening to this chapter I indicated that Baudrillard’s objection to feminism stems from his critique of a movement of those on the ‘other’ side of the bar who articulate their desire to instantiate a subjectivity, a positive identity. Such a desire fails to oppose the binary logic instituing an essentialist and phallocentric ontology. In Irigaray’s work we have seen an ambiguity with respect to this desire, but certainly the desire is articulated: a desire for women’s subjectivity, and relatedly, a desire for the representation
The shale gas boom is the greatest opportunity for economic expansion that we will ever see in our lifetimes. There is a brewing problem, that no one is talking about, that could squander this once in a lifetime economic opportunity. The first 10% in the name of the problem comes from the 6 bcfd increase in demand we know is coming from already announced manufacturing capital projects totaling $80 billion in investment. That investment and the thousands of jobs it will create are all due to the favorable natural gas price. The second 10% in the problem comes from a January EIA report that analyzed (on the low end) a 6 bcfd increase in demand due to LNG exports by 2016. (For your information, a total of 19 companies have applied to export potential volume that would increase demand by 42 percent.) The best bang for our buck is using natural gas in the manufacturing sector where it provides
Mass incarceration has destroyed African-American communities, families, and lives all around the country. Reforms must be driven by the moral imperative of repairing all that is wrong with the current system. The Moral Monday movement shifted North Carolina’s political discourse toward morality while focusing on individual stories and the damage done to real people by real, and unjust, policies. The Moral Monday movement shifted North Carolina’s political discourse toward morality while focusing on individual stories and the damage done to real people by real, and unjust policies. The Moral Monday movement shifted North Carolina’s political discourse toward morality while focusing on individual stories and the damage done to real people by real, and unjust policies. The Moral Monday movement shifted North Carolina’s political discourse toward morality while focusing on individual stories and the damage done to real people by real, and unjust policies. The Moral Monday movement shifted North Carolina’s political discourse toward
“I think it is doable,” McCain said at a breakfast sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor. “I think it is doable,” Schumer said at a breakfast sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor. “I think it is doable,” McCain said at a breakfast sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science Monitor sponsored by the Christian Science
The invocation of Munich suggests that aggressor states are inherently insatiable and that failure to act against them automatically endangers US security.
“Immigrants are key to the workforce in every industry,” economist Mark Zandi says. “It’s pretty clear that if the president wants to build his wall between Mexico and the United States, he’s going to have to hire Mexicans to do it because there are literally no American construction workers there to do anything other than build the homes that are going up,” Zandi says. “If the president wants to build his wall between Mexico and the United States, he’s going to have to hire Mexicans to do it because there are literally no American construction workers there to do anything other than build the homes that are going up,” Zandi says. “If the president wants to build his wall between Mexico and the United States, he’s going to have to hire Mexicans to do it because there are literally no American construction workers there to do anything other than build the homes that are going up.”
Allowing judicial review of the S-6 visa allows the government to ascertain the number of individuals enlisted by the FBI as counterterrorism informants
Interstitial federalism solves interstate water law by redrawing jurisdictional boundaries through the interstate compact process, granting jurisdiction to river basin commissions under the compact. Interstitial federalism solves interstate water law by redrawing jurisdictional boundaries through the interstate compact process, granting jurisdiction to river basin commissions under the compact. Interstitial federalism solves interstate water law by redrawing jurisdictional boundaries through the interstate compact process, granting jurisdiction to river basin commissions under the compact. Interstitial federalism solves interstate water law by redrawing jurisdictional boundaries through the interstate compact process, granting jurisdiction to river basin commissions under the compact. Interstitial federalism solves interstate water law by redrawing jurisdictional boundaries through the interstate compact process, granting jurisdiction to river basin commissions under the compact.
Stuxnet will serve as the weapon and the U.S. electrical grid will serve as the target in this risk analysis – the complexity of the attack path, the limited capability of non-state adversaries to develop cyber-weapons, and the existence of multiple methods of mitigating cyber-attacks
Disrupting the ability to move and launder money is a key tool in disabling the operations of Drug Trafficking Organizations (DTOs). Through a Bilateral Money Laundering Working Group, Mexican and US law enforcement agencies are cooperating to create the programs and strategies that will improve coordination in the area of investigations and prosecutions, bulk cash seizures, and the overall reduction of money laundering activities. The USG, through the Departments of Justice, Homeland Security and Treasury, are cooperating to create the programs and strategies that will improve coordination in the area of investigations and prosecutions, bulk cash seizures, and the overall reduction of money laundering activities. The USG, through the Departments of Justice, Homeland Security and Treasury, are cooperating to create the programs and strategies that will improve coordination in the area of investigations and prosecutions, bulk cash seizures, and the overall reduction of money laundering activities. The USG, through the Departments of Justice, Homeland
Misuse of legal terminology impedes the understanding of the law and impedes the progress of the law
India’s economy is resilient – domestic demand, high savings rate, and regulatory mechanisms make it a resilient economy
U.S. leadership, determination, diplomatic skill, and military efficiency earned a reputation for being able to handle itself capably through the Marshall Plan, the reunification of Germany, and the Persian Gulf War, and that helped mitigate the intractable problems from the proliferation of nuclear weapons to Europe’s propensity for catastrophic violence, earned a reputation for being able to handle itself capably through the Marshall Plan, the reunification of Germany, and the Persian Gulf War, and that helped mitigate the intractable problems from the proliferation of nuclear weapons to the propensity for catastrophic violence, earned a reputation for being able to handle itself capably through the Marshall Plan, the reunification of Germany, and the Persian Gulf War, and that helped mitigate the intractable problems from the proliferation of nuclear weapons to the propensity for catastrophic violence, earned a reputation for being able to handle itself capably through the Marshall
The economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in a state of overshoot now – the economy is in 
Democracies have a culture of peace that pervades decision-making
Xavier’s mission is to promote a more just and humane society by preparing students to assume roles of leadership and service in a global society. Our mission is to promote a more just and humane society by preparing students to assume roles of leadership and service in a global society. Our mission is to promote a more just and humane society by preparing students to assume roles of leadership and service in a global society. Our mission is to promote a more just and humane society by preparing students to assume roles of leadership and service in a global society. Our mission is to promote a more just and humane society by preparing students to assume roles of leadership and service in a global society. Our mission is to promote a more just and humane society by preparing students to assume roles of leadership and service in a global society. Our mission is to promote a more just and humane society by 
India loses $2 billion a year because of the emigration of computer experts to the U.S. Indian students going abroad for their higher studies costs India a foreign exchange outflow of $10 billion annually. Thousands of Indian scientists, doctors, engineers and other qualified persons have migrated and are staying in other countries. Every year hundreds of our best brains make frantic efforts to leave India. The demand for passports is increasing every year, even though more and more employment opportunities are being created within the country. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Betsy DeVos has only been education secretary for a week and a half, but it’s already clear that she will make decisions that would cut the Department of Education significantly, undermine civil rights and protection from sexual assault, and continue more partisan hires.
ISIS continues its bloody war of attrition throughout Syria, into Iraq and on and on. ISIS continues its bloody war of attrition throughout Syria, into Iraq and on and on. ISIS continues its bloody war of attrition throughout Syria, into Iraq and on and on. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
The USS Fort Worth patrols a group of disputed islands and reefs being fortified by China, while the Chinese frigate Yancheng trailed closely behind in the South China Sea. The difference lies in whether the Navy designates its operation as a planned patrol or as a Freedom of Navigation operation, a more pointed mission which the US uses to call out nations it believes aren’t following international maritime law. On Wednesday, 7th Fleet Vice Adm. Robert Thomas declined to discuss specifics of Fort Worth’s patrol near the Spratly Islands, but described patrols in the disputed region as relatively normal. “It’s routine for US 7th Fleet ships to operate in the South China Sea and also routine for [Chinese] PLAN ships to operate at visual range of us,” Thomas said. “Not a day goes by that the US 7th Fleet and the PLAN are not talking to each other
Extinction is the gravest consequence of the biodiversity crisis, since it is irreversible. Human activities have elevated the rate of species extinction to a thousand or more times the natural background rate. Human activities have escalated the rate of species extinction to a thousand or more times the natural background rate. Human activities have escalated the rate of species extinction to a thousand or more times the natural background rate. Human activities have escalated the rate of species extinction to a thousand or more times the natural background rate. Human activities have escalated the rate of species extinction to a thousand or more times the natural background rate. Human activities have escalated the rate of species extinction to a thousand or more times the natural background rate. Human activities have escalated the rate of species extinction to a thousand or more times the natural background rate. Human activities have escalated the rate of species extinction to a thousand or more times the
U.S.-Japan space cooperation is key to counterspace war
Social statuses interlock at specific moments and locations to shape the production of essentialist, defensively situated collective identities on the part of racialized people. The key issue is not what these collective identities look like in any kind of objective sense, but what the people who project such intersubjective identities want them to look like to those constructed as outsiders at specific locations and moments. When looking at such imagined communities, anyone concerned will find that the key issue is not what these collective identities look like in any kind of objective sense, but what the people who project such intersubjective identities want them to look like to those constructed as outsiders at specific locations and moments. When looking at such imagined communities, anyone concerned will find that the key issue is not what these collective identities look like in any kind of objective sense, but what the people who project such intersubjective identities want them to look like to those constructed as outsiders at specific locations
The Sixth Summit of the Americas is the only forum that brings together the heads of state and government of the countries of the Organization of American States. The Summit of the Americas is the only forum that brings together the heads of state and government of the countries of the Organization of American States. The Summit of the Americas is the only forum that brings together the heads of state and government of the countries of the Organization of American States. The Summit of the Americas is the only forum that brings together the heads of state and government of the countries of the Organization of American States. The Summit of the Americas is the only forum that brings together the heads of state and government of the countries of the Organization of American States. The Summit of the Americas is the only forum that brings together the heads of state and government of the countries of the Organization of American States. The Summit of the Americas is the only forum that brings together the heads of state and government of the countries of the
Cuba’s Cienfuegos oil refinery has sustained damage due to flooding after heavy rainfalls from subtropical depression Alberto, sending an unspecified amount of crude oil into the Cienfuegos Bay. Barriers were set up to try to contain the oil spill, but not before 12,000 cubic meters of contaminated wastewater leaked into the bay. Over 20,000 people have been evacuated from Cuba in the wake of the storm. The refinery, located 150 miles southeast of Havana, is run by state-run Cupet, after taking over total control of the refinery which was previously co-owned by Venezuela’s PDVSA. PDVSA relinquished its 49% stake in the refinery mid-2017 due to alleged debts it owed to Cuba. The refinery had been idled for some time prior to the handoff, and was partially shut for a period of 120 days in
The plan D of world order is associated with the degree to which transnational civil society activism can mobilize a constituency for the promotion of global security by way of the development and implementation of international law (see Keck and Sikkink, 1998). There is no doubt that such civil society activism has been effective in a number of specific contexts, including exerting pressures supportive of lawmaking in relation to human rights, some forms of environmental protection, prohibition of antipersonnel landmines, and the establishment of the International Criminal Court. But as has been obvious at the level of implementation, the vertical dimension of the state system means that implementation will be subject to geopolitical control, with resulting double standards. Civil society initiatives have sought to overcome the failure of international law to protect the human interest in relation to criminal accountability, climate change, and nuclear disarmament, but have not had the capability to generate global law responsive to the challenge or to alter
Education reform is key to US competitiveness and standing as a leader in the global economy – high school graduation rate, racial and economic achievement gap, and civic apathy are critical components that cause students to lag behind their peers in reading, mathematics, and science, despite investing more in K-12 education than any other developed country in the world. 
Democracies are more peaceful
Not all immigration reform supporters think Obama has so much space to move on immigration without Congress. Rep. Henry Cuellar (Texas), vice-chairman of the Democratic Steering and Policy Committee, said the president has some license to make border security moves and spending decisions. But pretty much he’s done what he can do right now, and after that it’s up to Congress to address the rest of the issues. Rep. Henry Cuellar (Texas), vice-chairman of the Democratic Steering and Policy Committee, said the president has some license to make border security moves and spending decisions. Rep. Henry Cuellar (Texas), vice-chairman of the Democratic Steering and Policy Committee, said the president has some license to make border security moves and spending decisions. Rep. Henry Cuellar (Texas), vice-chairman of the Democratic Steering and Policy Committee, said the president has
Postcolonial feminism is necessary in international relations, not just as a tool for Western society to understand their “inferiors.” Postcolonial feminism is necessary in international relations not just as a tool for Western society to understand their “inferiors” – it is necessary in international relations not just as a tool for Western society to understand their “inferiors” – it is necessary in international relations not just as a tool for Western society to understand their “inferiors” – it is necessary in international relations not just as a tool for Western society to understand their “inferiors” – it is necessary in international relations not just as a tool for Western society to understand their “inferiors” – it is necessary in international relations not just as a tool for Western society to understand their “inferiors” – it is
The 21st century won’t be a second American Century – it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second American Century, it won’t be a second
Reclamation’s dams, water conveyance systems, and power generating facilities are integral components of our nation’s infrastructure. Effectively managing our infrastructure and the benefits these structures provide is among the significant challenges facing Reclamation. Approximately 50 percent of Reclamation’s dams were built between 1900 and 1950, and approximately 90 percent of the dams were built before adoption of currently used, state-of-the-art design and construction practices. Of the 492 dams in Reclamation’s inventory, our Dam Safety Program has identified 363 high and significant hazard dams, where there is potential for loss of life and/or significant economic damage if those dams were to experience significant structural failures. Reclamation evaluates dams to address new hydrologic or seismic data, or changes in state-of-the-art criteria deemed necessary for safety purposes to ensure that risks do not exceed current Reclamation public protection
Teachers and students aren’t sure they agree with the new, stringent policies designed to enforce the ideological shift, and they are voting with their feet.
Ocean Acidification Causes Mass Extinction – Acidification Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extinction – Causes Mass Extin
Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism – Marxism is still the only doctrine that calls for the systematic overthrow of capitalism –
The U.S. needs to stabilize the global order and create mechanisms to solve global crises without overturning the international order. 
Critical education is just a bad dream, the ravings, the drawings of the mad – critical education is there to pick it up, and to tell it, never mind – it was just a bad dream, the ravings, the drawings of the mad – it was just a bad dream, the ravings, the drawings of the mad – it was just a bad dream, the ravings, the drawings of the mad – it was just a bad dream, the ravings, the drawings of the mad – it was just a bad dream, the ravings, the drawings of the mad – it was just a bad dream, the ravings, the drawings of the mad – it was just a bad dream, the ravings, the drawings of the mad – it was just a bad dream, the ravings
The mass migration of spiny lobsters off the coasts of the Yucatan, the Bahamas, and Florida, among other places, takes place in the autumn. The nocturnal ‘queuing’ begins before the autumn storms and may take several weeks to complete. These queues have many lengths (as little as two lobsters) and their formation each autumn is a seasonal refrain. The mass migration of spiny lobsters off the coasts of the Yucatan, the Bahamas, and Florida, among other places, takes place in the autumn. The nocturnal ‘queuing’ begins before the autumn storms and may take several weeks to complete. These queues have many lengths (as little as two lobsters) and their formation each autumn is a seasonal refrain. The mass migration of spiny lobsters off the coasts of the Yucatan, the Bahamas, and Florida, among other places, takes place
Girls’ right to bare arms is an idea with a long and meaningful tail – it’s just a palimpsests of sexism – it’s an idea with a long and meaningful tail that’s just a palimpsests of sexism that’s just a palimpsests of sexism that’s just a palimpsests of sexism that’s just a palimpsests of sexism that’s just a palimpsests of sexism that’s just a palimpsests of sexism that’s just a palimpsests of sexism that’s just a palimpsests of sexism that’s just 
Aggregate energy demand declines due to a 10 percent increase in electricity prices
Russia, China and Uzbekistan are among the countries that the U.S. says aren’t doing enough to combat modern-day slavery
Cellmark’s ability to offer local database services can serve as an entry point to the market for forensic DNA processing for property crimes – even ten years ago it was not economically feasible for most law enforcement agencies to use DNA to investigate routine property crimes, but that is no longer the case – Cellmark’s ability to offer local database services can serve as an entry point to the market for forensic DNA processing for property crimes – even ten years ago it was not economically feasible for most law enforcement agencies to use DNA to investigate routine property crimes – Cellmark’s ability to offer local database services can serve as an entry point to the market for forensic DNA processing for property crimes – Cellmark’s ability to offer local database services can serve as an entry point to the market for forensic DNA processing for property crimes – Cellmark’s ability to offer local database services can serve as an entry point to the market for forensic DNA processing for property
Economic desperation drives proliferation – economic desperation drives Russia and some of the former Warsaw Pact nations to peddle weapons and technology – economic desperation drives Russia and some of the former Warsaw Pact nations to peddle weapons and technology – economic desperation drives Russia and some of the former Warsaw Pact nations to peddle weapons and technology – economic desperation drives Russia and some of the former Warsaw Pact nations to peddle weapons and technology – economic desperation drives Russia and some of the former Warsaw Pact nations to peddle weapons and technology – economic desperation drives Russia and some of the former Warsaw Pact nations to peddle weapons and technology – economic desperation drives Russia and some of the former Warsaw Pact nations to peddle weapons and technology – economic desperation drives Russia and some of the former Warsaw Pact nations to peddle weapons and technology –
Mass U.S. tourism to Cuba was also not barred by law. All existing sanctions at that time were contained in executive orders that, of course, could be lifted by other executive orders, at any time, by any president. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
The nexus requirement exacerbates erroneous perceptions of protectors and victims in the global South, making sexual politics a marker of distinction between “progressive” and “backwards” countries.
Water scarcity has the potential to escalate from a personal concern to a national critical issue – water is dynamic and never ceases, water moves from ocean to land and from land to ocean again in clouds, rivers, and streams, it crosses mountains, plains, forests, deserts, and not to be forgotten, political boundaries. Water is dynamic and never ceases, water moves from ocean to land and from land to ocean again in clouds, rivers, and streams, it crosses mountains, plains, forests, deserts, and not to be forgotten, political boundaries. Water is dynamic and never ceases, water moves from ocean to land and from land to ocean again in clouds, rivers, and streams, it crosses mountains, plains, forests, deserts, and not to be forgotten, political boundaries. Water is dynamic and never ceases, water moves from ocean to land and from land to ocean again in clouds, rivers, and streams, it crosses mountains,
The Great Recession hasn’t triggered a ratcheting up of conflict in the Middle East, border disputes in the South China Sea, and even the disruptions of the Occupy movement fuel impressions of surge in global public disorder. The economic downturn hasn’t triggered a ratcheting up of great power conflict in the Middle East, border disputes in the South China Sea, and even the disruptions of the Occupy movement fuel impressions of surge in global public disorder in the Middle East, border disputes in the South China Sea, and even the disruptions of the Occupy movement fuel impressions of surge in global public disorder in the Middle East, border disputes in the South China Sea, and even the disruptions of the Occupy movement fuel impressions of surge in global public disorder in the Middle East, border disputes in the South China Sea, and even the disruptions of the Occup
Special Operations Command needs native speakers to bridge the gap between US forces and local natives to build trust in dangerous and remote areas of the world. Special Operations Command needs native speakers to bridge the gap between US forces and local natives to build trust in dangerous and remote areas of the world. Special Operations Command needs native speakers to bridge the gap between US forces and local natives to build trust in dangerous and remote areas of the world. Special Operations Command needs native speakers to bridge the gap between US forces and local natives to build trust in dangerous and remote areas of the world. Special Operations Command needs native speakers to bridge the gap between US forces and local natives to build trust in dangerous and remote areas of the world. Special Operations Command needs native speakers to bridge the gap between US forces and local natives to build trust in dangerous and remote areas of the world. Special Operations Command needs native speakers to bridge the gap between US forces and local natives to build trust in dangerous and remote areas of
States will try to resist federal court rulings – the courts can’t be directly lobbied and pressured on a routine basis in the same way that the president can, nor can judges be removed from office very easily, nor can the courts be directly lobbied and pressured on a routine basis in the same way that the president can, nor can the courts be directly lobbied and pressured on a routine basis in the same way that the president can, nor can the courts be directly lobbied and pressured on a routine basis in the same way that the president can, nor can the courts be directly lobbied and pressured on a routine basis in the same way that the president can, nor can the courts be directly lobbied and pressured on a routine basis in the same way that the president can, nor can the courts be directly lobbied and pressured on a
It’s insufficient to reform the most egregious instances of violence and abuse that occur in prison while retaining a commitment to prison backed criminal law enforcement as a primary social regulatory framework. It’s insufficient to reform the most egregious instances of violence and abuse that occur in prison while retaining a commitment to prison backed criminal law enforcement as a primary social regulatory framework. Two hundred and forty years of slavery and ninety years of legalized segregation, enforced in large measure through criminal law administration, render US carceral and punitive policing practices less amenable to reforms undertaken, for reasons related to the specific historical and racially subordinating legacies of American incarceration and punitive policing
The 2020 election is destined to go down in the history books as the first time in history that the majority of the Democratic candidates support marijuana legalization on a grand scale, at least not outside of Bill Clinton admitting that he used marijuana but “did not inhale” and Barack Obama saying “when I was a kid, I inhaled frequently” and Barack Obama saying “when I was a kid, I inhaled frequently” and Hillary Clinton admitting that he used marijuana but “did not inhale” and Barack Obama saying “when I was a kid, I inhaled frequently” and Hillary Clinton admitting that he used marijuana but “did not inhale” and Hillary Clinton admitting that he used marijuana but “did not inhale” and Hillary Clinton admitting that he used marijuana but “did not inhale” and Hillary Clinton admitting that he used marijuana but “did not inhal
Ethical pragmatism uses the state of exception as an enthymeme to justify EESA legislation. Ethical pragmatism uses the state of exception as an enthymeme to justify EESA legislation. The aff uses the state of exception as an enthymeme to justify EESA legislation. The aff uses the state of exception as an enthymeme to justify EESA legislation. The aff uses the state of exception as an enthymeme to justify EESA legislation. The aff uses the state of exception as an enthymeme to justify EESA legislation. The aff uses the state of exception as an enthymeme to justify EESA legislation. The aff uses the state of exception as an enthymeme to justify EESA legislation. The aff uses the state
Algae biodiesel is the only rational answer to the question of how to make the massive amounts of biofuels needed to displace significant amounts of fossil fuels without competing with agriculture – it’s the only rational answer to the question of how to make the massive amounts of biofuels needed to displace significant amounts of fossil fuels without competing with agriculture – it’s the only rational answer to the question of how to make the massive amounts of biofuels needed to displace significant amounts of fossil fuels without competing with agriculture – it’s the only rational answer to the question of how to make the massive amounts of biofuels needed to displace significant amounts of fossil fuels without competing with agriculture – it’s the only rational answer to the question of how to make the massive amounts of biofuels needed to displace significant amounts of fossil fuels without competing with agriculture – it’s the only rational answer to the
The idea of a complicated conversation creates a way of thinking about the curriculum as a process without image – insofar as an image of the curriculum assumes the organization of compositional elements given in advance, the image of the curriculum separates curricular thought from its vital (virtual) powers for change, experimentation, and becoming. Insofar as an image of the curriculum assumes the organization of compositional elements given in advance, the image of the curriculum separates curricular thought from its vital (virtual) powers for change, experimentation, and becoming – insofar as an image of the curriculum assumes the organization of compositional elements given in advance, the image of the curriculum separates curricular thought from its vital (virtual) powers for change, experimentation, and becoming – insofar as an image of the curriculum assumes the organization of compositional elements given in advance, the
National and international actors institutionalize normative underpinnings where, for example, clean water is tied to life support and a sensibility for the natural world. In Ecuador, it was the two major political parties that supported a ban on gold mining, only to be challenged by a transnational mining company in an international tribunal. In El Salvador, it was the two major political parties that supported a ban on gold mining, only to be challenged by a transnational mining company in an international tribunal. In Germany, it was the two major political parties that supported a ban on gold mining, only to be challenged by a transnational mining company in an international tribunal. In Ecuador, it was the two major political parties that supported a ban on gold mining, only to be challenged by a transnational mining company in an international tribunal. In El Salvador, it was the two major political parties that supported a ban on gold mining, only to be challenged by
Urban agriculture is key to a sustainable Cuban food production system – Cubans in urban areas face two options – starvation or self-sufficiency without reliance on chemical or mechanical technologies – Cubans in urban areas faced two options – starvation or self-sufficiency without reliance on chemical or mechanical technologies – Cubans in urban areas faced two options – starvation or self-sufficiency without reliance on chemical or mechanical technologies – Cubans in urban areas faced two options – starvation or self-sufficiency without reliance on chemical or mechanical technologies – Cubans in urban areas faced two options – starvation or self-sufficiency without reliance on chemical or mechanical technologies – Cubans in urban areas faced two options – starvation or self-sufficiency without reliance on chemical or mechanical technologies 
To think the future with Marshall McLuhan is to hold in creative tension both the visible media of the technological future that he explored with such prescient, and truly astonishing, clarity and the hidden impulses animating technologies of inertia, substitution, abandonment, and disappearance that he explored with such prescient, and truly astonishing, clarity and the hidden impulses animating technologies of inertia, substitution, abandonment, and disappearance that he explored with such prescient, and truly astonishing, clarity and the hidden impulses animating technologies of inertia, substitution, abandonment, and disappearance that he explored with such prescient, and truly astonishing, clarity and the hidden impulses animating technologies of inertia, substitution, abandonment, and disappearance that he explored with such prescient, and truly astonishing, clarity and the hidden impulses animating technologies of inertia
Powerful countries persuade or coerce weaker countries into accepting international treaties that enshrine their own norms
The loss of phytoplankton in the Indian Ocean is a result of global warming – phytoplankton are a key food source for whales, shrimp, snails, and jellyfish. The loss of phytoplankton in the Indian Ocean is a great example of unintended consequences of climate change. The loss of phytoplankton in the Indian Ocean is a great example of unintended consequences of climate change. The loss of phytoplankton in the Indian Ocean is a great example of unintended consequences of climate change. The loss of phytoplankton in the Indian Ocean is a great example of unintended consequences of climate change. The loss of phytoplankton in the Indian Ocean is a great example of unintended consequences of climate change. The loss of phytoplankton in the Indian Ocean is a great example of unintended consequences of climate change
The UK government and the Met Office will join forces with the US government, NASA and Google to improve access to weather forecasts and climate information in poor countries. This will help farmers to plan ahead and boost food production as well as help to predict and plan for weather related disasters like droughts, floods and storms. DFID’s contribution to the project will support projects that will: Strengthen early warning systems for droughts, floods and storms and ensure warnings reach the most vulnerable people. DFID’s contribution to the project will support projects that will: Strengthen early warning systems for droughts, floods and storms and ensure warnings reach the most vulnerable people. DFID’s contribution to the project will support projects that will: Strengthen early warning systems for droughts, floods and storms and ensure warnings reach the most vulnerable people. DFID’s contribution to the project will support projects that will: Strengthen
Natural products have been the sole means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’ve been the only means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’ve been the only means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’ve been the only means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’ve been the only means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’ve been the only means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’ve been the only means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’ve been the only means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’ve been the only means to treat diseases and injuries over the past millennia – they’
As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption. As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption. As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption. As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption. As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption. As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption. As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption. As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption. As the debates continue, some influential politicians (including the prime minister) have started to pick on encryption.
Shinzo Abe has a nationalistic approach towards China – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking a nationalistic approach – he’s taking 
Nitrogen oxides are natural and also are produced by man’s activities. They are a result of bacterial processes, biological growth and decay, lightning, and forest and grassland fires. The primary source of nitrogen oxides is from the burning of fossil fuels.
U.S. arms sales to Ukraine are key to escalating the conflict and creating a neo-Nazi government
The Navy is phasing AI into its ship systems, weapons, networks, and command and control infrastructure as computer automation becomes more reliable and advanced algorithms make once-impossible discernments and analyses.
Biden pledging to work with Europe and stop at nothing to ensure democratic values prevail allies and rivals alike at the Munich Security Conference Friday morning, pledging to work with Europe and stop at nothing to ensure democratic values prevail around the world. Biden insisted that only trans-Atlantic unity could contain Russia. Biden insisted that only trans-Atlantic unity could contain Russia. Biden insisted that only trans-Atlantic unity could contain Russia. Biden insisted that only trans-Atlantic unity could contain Russia. Biden insisted that only trans-Atlantic unity could contain Russia. Biden insisted that only trans-Atlantic unity could contain Russia. Biden insisted that only trans-Atlantic unity could contain Russia. Biden insisted that only trans-Atlantic unity could contain Russia. Biden in
FISA encroaches on the president’s constitutional power
State, local, and tribal governments and nonprofit organizations in their work to reduce recidivism and improve outcomes for people returning from state and federal prisons, local jails, and juvenile facilities. Passed with bipartisan support and signed into law on April 9, 2008, SCA legislation authorizes federal grants for vital programs and systems reform aimed at improving the reentry process for people returning from state and federal prisons, local jails, and juvenile facilities. Passed with bipartisan support and signed into law on April 9, 2008, SCA legislation authorizes federal grants for vital programs and systems reform aimed at improving the reentry process for people returning from state and federal prisons, local jails, and juvenile facilities. Passed with bipartisan support and signed into law on April 9, 2008, SCA legislation authorizes federal grants for vital programs and systems reform aimed at improving the reentry process for people returning from state and federal
The CCP’s claim to power is based on its ability to save China from its “century of humiliation” at the hands of the Western and Japanese colonial powers. The CCP has always emphasized that it saved China from its “century of humiliation” at the hands of the Western and Japanese colonial powers. The CCP has always emphasized that it saved China from its “century of humiliation” at the hands of the Western and Japanese colonial powers. The CCP has always emphasized that it saved China from its “century of humiliation” at the hands of the Western and Japanese colonial powers. The CCP has always emphasized that it saved China from its “century of humiliation” at the hands of the Western and Japanese colonial powers. The CCP has always emphasized that it saved China from its “century of humiliation” at the hands of the Western and Japanese colon
Sentencing reform policy involves legislative control over official decisions in determining the use of confinement, the period of confinement, and the termination of confinement in the sanctioning process for a wide variety of offenses committed by different types of offenders under varying circum- stances. Sentencing reform policy today involves an effort to impose legislative control over official decisions in determining the use of confinement, the period of confinement, and the termination of confinement in the sanctioning process for a wide variety of offenses committed by different types of offenders under varying circum- stances. State legislatures have taken several approaches toward a set of shared goals accompanied by several guiding principles. Students of sentencing reform policy in the United States present several sentencing models as a means to describe these basic approaches toward legislative control over sentencing decisions.
There is a problem with speaking for others – where one speaks from affects both the meaning and truth of what one says, and can serve either to authorize or dis-authorize one’s speech – where one speaks from affects both the meaning and truth of what one says, and thus can serve either to authorize or dis-authorize one’s speech – where one speaks from affects both the meaning and truth of what one says, and thus can serve either to authorize or dis-authorize one’s speech – where one speaks from affects both the meaning and truth of what one says, and thus can serve either to authorize or dis-authorize one’s speech – where one speaks from affects both the meaning and truth of what one says, and thus can serve either to authorize or dis-authorize one’s speech – where one speaks from affects both the meaning and truth of what one says, and thus can serve
Federal agencies use facial-recognition software to look for suspects and witnesses to crime, scanning hundreds of millions of photos, including from state driver’s license databases, to unlock cellphones, monitor public venues, and guard the entryways of schools, workplaces and housing complexes, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials, scanning visitors’ faces to grant them access to or alert security officials
The DNR’s infested waters list shows 138 lakes, rivers and wetlands infested with zebra mussels this year. There have been seven new infestations of eurasian water milfoil this year and two new infestations of flowering rush. Spiny water fleas are another concern with two new infestations this year and faucet snails are another invasive species finding its way to more lakes and rivers. The DNR’s infested waters list shows 138 lakes, rivers and wetlands infested with zebra mussels this year. There have been seven new infestations of eurasian water milfoil this year and two new infestations of flowering rush. Spiny water fleas are another concern with two new infestations this year and faucet snails are another invasive species finding its way to more lakes and rivers. The DNR’s infeste
The value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s currency is its Achilles heel – the value of a nation’s
Companies need to integrate sustainability into all aspects of their work – employees are highly motivated to incorporate sustainability into their jobs due to their concern for the environment and society. Environmental educators can both foster and learn from the experience of the corporate sector, as some companies are developing innovative ways to bring environmental education to their employees. Environmental educators can both foster and learn from the experience of the corporate sector, as some companies are developing innovative ways to bring environmental education to their employees. Environmental educators can both foster and learn from the experience of the corporate sector, as some companies are developing innovative ways to bring environmental education to their employees. Environmental educators can both foster and learn from the experience of the corporate sector, as some companies are developing innovative ways to bring environmental education to their employees. Environmental educators can both foster and learn from the experience of the corporate sector, as some companies are developing innovative ways to bring environmental education to their employees. Environmental educators can both foster and learn from the experience of the corporate sector, as some
The Smith-Hughes Act reframes the content, context and culture of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to an extent, reframes the educational philosophy of agricultural education and, to
Growth-glorifying free-marketism has a dreadful track record for reducing emissions. Never mind that Elon Musk’s low-carbon brainchildren are crushing it on the stock exchange, gross domestic product — the thing that’s getting bigger when we talk about growth — is a terrible barometer of prosperity.
China’s economy grew 6.7% in the first quarter, "in line with the government’s growth target of 6.5% to 7% for the full year," according to Bloomberg. China’s economy grew 6.7% in the first quarter, "in line with the government’s growth target of 6.5% to 7% for the full year," according to Bloomberg. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Failing nation-states pose a nuclear threat – stateless groups will gain access to nuclear weapons, most likely by theft from a nation-state. Stateless groups can strike without fear of overwhelming retaliation, and they wield much more effective destructive power than nation-states. Terrorists can wield weapons and mount assaults that no nationstate would dare to attempt – terrorists can wield weapons and mount assaults that no nationstate would dare to attempt – stateless groups are much more effective than nation-states because terrorists can wield weapons and mount assaults that no nationstate would dare to attempt – stateless groups are much more effective than nation-states because terrorists can wield weapons and mount assaults that no nationstate would dare to attempt – stateless groups are much more effective than nation-states because terrorists can wield
Hip-hop is a response to the neoliberal turn in cities, to manufacturing and safety net disinvestment on the one hand, and to punitive and financial capital investment on the other hand. Hip-hop is in many ways a response to the neoliberal turn in cities, to manufacturing and safety net disinvestment on the one hand, and to punitive and financial capital investment on the other hand. Hip-hop is in many ways a response to the neoliberal turn in cities, to manufacturing and safety net disinvestment on the one hand, and to punitive and financial capital investment on the other hand. Hip-hop is in many ways a response to the neoliberal turn in cities, to manufacturing and safety net disinvestment on the one hand, and to punitive and financial capital investment on the other hand.
LONDON, December 11 (Fitch) Fitch Ratings believes 2015 will be a transitional year for global pharma companies as they continue to evolve their business models and position themselves for structural changes in the industry. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
China’s growth isn’t a cause of celebration – it’s a form of colonialism – it’s an oppressive dictatorship that needs massive supplies of energy and raw materials from the rest of the world. 
The American Civil Liberties Union and the U.S. Chamber of Commerce are starting to demand more limits on the government’s ability to intrude on the private lives of citizens. The aff’s dissent validates the need for the president to reevaluate his administration’s recent actions and recommit to protecting civil liberties by respecting the rule of law. The aff’s dissent validates the need for the president to reevaluate his administration’s recent actions and recommit to protecting civil liberties by respecting the rule of law. The aff’s dissent validates the need for the president to reevaluate his administration’s recent actions and recommit to protecting civil liberties by respecting the rule of law. The aff’s dissent validates the need for the president to reevaluate his administration’s recent actions and recom
US-China relations have been stuck in a cyclical nature of starting and stopping, with no real improvement over the past 25 years.
U.S. talks with Hamas are “almost inevitable” if Obama is reelected, John Bolton, former U.S. ambassador to the United Nations, declared in a radio interview today.                                                                             
China will not roll over and play dead when confronted with counter-pressure – it depends on what it thinks is at stake and what counter-pressure it wants to achieve
Immigrants are key to innovation and productivity growth in the information technology sector – they are highly skilled, and they are key to Silicon Valley’s ability to establish and maintain a global competitive edge in information technology
National Task Force to Combat Illegal Importation of Goods, Small Arms, Ammunition and Light Weapons (NATFORCE) has impounded 13 containers loaded with various sizes of grenades, rocket launchers, explosives, assault rifles, heavy machine gun (GPMG) rounds of ammunition, three chain bullets, explosive materials, two GPMGs and one chisel – a tool with a characteristically shaped cutting edge. 
The ideal citizen is someone informed, who takes ethics seriously, thinks critically, does not support self-interest as the only guiding principle for agency, and who can distinguish between democracy and legalized injustice. We must create the material conditions so people can do more than survive, so they can embrace their lives as a work in progress, a work of art filled with enormous possibilities rooted in a society that provides the political, personal and social rights that allow such behavior to unfold. The ideal citizen is someone who’s more than a consumer: someone informed, who takes ethics seriously, thinks critically, does not support self-interest as the only guiding principle for agency, and who can distinguish between democracy and legalized injustice. We need to ask how we can help to create economic, social and political conditions so people can do more than survive, so they can embrace their lives as a work in progress, a work of art filled with enormous possibilities rooted
Rep. Thomas Massie is working with Rep. Mark Pocan, D-Wis., to rally support for a bill that would repeal the Patriot Act and the FISA Amendment Act of 2008. Massie is working with Rep. Mark Pocan, D-Wis., to rally support for a bill that would repeal the Patriot Act and the FISA Amendment Act of 2008. Massie is working with Rep. Thomas Massie, R-Ky., to rally support for a bill that would repeal the Patriot Act and the FISA Amendment Act of 2008. Massie is working with Rep. Mark Pocan, D-Wis., to rally support for a bill that would repeal the Patriot Act and the FISA Amendment Act of 2008. Massie is working with Rep. Thomas Massie, R-Ky., to rally support for a bill that would repeal the Patriot Act and the FISA Amendment Act of 2008.
NATO’s 70 years of existence provides another opportunity to unearth the real history of the ideas, practices and destruction wrought by this military alliance. Even with the clear exposure of the cooperation between NATO, the CIA and the British MI6 to spread terror and psychological warfare in Europe immediately after the formation of this military alliance, the mainstream media, academics and policy makers remain silent on activities of the ’stay behind armies’ and ’false flag’ operations that distorted the real causes of insecurity in the world after 1945. Even with the clear exposure of the cooperation between NATO, the CIA and the British MI6 to spread terror and psychological warfare in Europe immediately after the formation of this military alliance, the mainstream media, academics and policy makers remain silent on activities of the ’stay behind armies’ and ’false flag’ operations that distorted the real causes of insecurity in the world after 1945.
At the root of the illegal logging industry are very large corporations. In 2005, BlueLinx, one of America’s largest builders, was caught smuggling illegal lumber out of Indonesia. In 2011, Lumber Liquidators was charged for importing illegal timber out of Indonesia. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Guest worker programs fuel U.S. labor shortages – creates a self-feeding loop
Japan’s response to the AIIB was similar to that of the United States, although Japan’s strategic interests in international financial institutions are more concentrated in its leading position at the ADB. Japan’s response to the AIIB was similar to that of the United States, although Japan’s strategic interests in international financial institutions are more concentrated in its leading position at the ADB. Japan’s response to the AIIB was similar to that of the United States, although Japan’s strategic interests in international financial institutions are more concentrated in its leading position at the ADB. Japan’s response to the AIIB was similar to that of the United States, although Japan’s strategic interests in international financial institutions are more concentrated in its leading position at the ADB. Japan’s response to the AIIB was similar to that of the United States, although Japan’s strategic interests in international financial institutions are more concentrated in its leading position at the ADB.
The aff’s inability to give meaning to global changes reflects the enclosed, elitist world of security analysts and bureaucratic experts, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusionary language, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusionary language, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusionary language, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusionary language, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusionary language, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusionary language, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusionary language, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusionary language, where entry is gained by learning and accepting to speak a particular, exclusion
The party is a flexible organization of a fidelity to events in the midst of unforeseeable circumstances. Its end is proletarian revolution, that is, the destruction of the capitalist system of exploitation and expropriation, of proletarianization, and the creation of a mode of production and distribution where the free development of each is compatible with the free development of all. We don’t yet know how we will structure our communist party-in part because we stopped thinking about it, giving way instead to the transience of issues, ease of one-click networked politics, and the illusion that our individual activities would immanently converge in a plurality of post-capitalist practices of creating and sharing. We know that we need to find a mode of struggle that can scale, endure, and cultivate the collective desire for collectivity. And we know that we can learn from the past and are learning
Just because a statute touches upon immigration doesn’t mean it’s an impermissible regulation of immigration – it’s a determination of who should or should not be admitted into the country, and the conditions under which a legal entrant may remain.
Most of us know something about the federal government. At the very least, we can name its three branches—executive, legislative, and judicial—and discuss the differences between them. At an early age, we are taught in school about the president of the United States and his official roles and responsibilities; we learn about Congress and the courts and their place in our government. In civics classes, we often get a skeletal picture of how the nation’s government works; we are told that the laws Congress passes are subject to the president’s veto power and the Supreme Court’s powers of judicial review; we understand that the president names the members of his Cabinet and nominates justices to the Supreme Court, but that the Senate has to confirm these nominations; and we can discuss how the Supreme Court, as the “caretaker” of the Constitution, can declare laws unconstitutional, but that it is up to the legislative
The United States is in a sour mood, struggling with a still weak economic recovery, diminished international stature, and fractured politics at home – the aff’s report is a call to all nations of the hemisphere to take stock, to rebuild cooperation, and to reshape relations in a new direction – the aff’s report is a call to all nations of the hemisphere to take stock, to rebuild cooperation, and to reshape relations in a new direction – the aff’s report is a call to all nations of the hemisphere to take stock, to rebuild cooperation, and to reshape relations in a new direction – the aff’s report is a call to all nations of the hemisphere to take stock, to rebuild cooperation, and to reshape relations in a new direction
Immigration to the U.S. is the largest sustained migratory flow in the world – 2.2 million Mexicans were admitted into the United States as legal permanent residents, with 2.2 million arriving in the 1990s alone. Research has established a high rate of undocumented migration among Mexicans, a high circularity of movement, and a pattern of selectivity that historically has favored young, poorly educated males from smaller communities, who arrived to take unskilled, unstable jobs in the US secondary labor market. Mexicans constitute nearly 60% of all legal immigrants from Latin America and around 80% of those who arrive without documents (see Bean et al., 1998, 107) point out in their exhaustive review of the empirical literature on immigration to North America, “far too much of the research is centered in Mexico, which because of its unique relationship to the US may be unrepresentative of broader patterns and trends.”
Moderates come off with a soft veneer but they are political warriors. Maine has a tradition of sending independent types who defy party leaders and challenge party orthodoxies to the United States Senate. Maine’s political culture is moralistic and includes certain policy tendencies: a libertarian streak when it comes to personal lives and a progressive view that government can serve the public good. Maine’s political culture is moralistic and incorporates certain policy tendencies: a libertarian streak when it comes to personal lives and a progressive view that government can serve the public good. Maine’s political culture is moralistic and incorporates certain policy tendencies: a libertarian streak when it comes to personal lives and a progressive view that government can serve the public good. Maine’s political culture is moralistic and incorporates certain policy tendencies: a libertarian streak when it comes to personal lives and a progressive view that
Taiwan is not a relic of the Cold War – it is situated at the geographic forefront of the strategic competition that very well may define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the United States and China will define the 21st century – that between the
International oil prices aren’t a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re not a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re not a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues – they’re a factor in Mexico’s foreign currency revenues 
Foreign Military Sales (FMS) is the U.S. Government’s program for transferring defense articles, services, and training to our international partners and international organizations. The FMS program is funded by administrative charges to foreign purchasers and is operated at no cost to taxpayers. The FMS program is funded by administrative charges to foreign purchasers and is operated at no cost to taxpayers. The FMS program is funded by administrative charges to foreign purchasers and is operated at no cost to taxpayers. The FMS program is funded by administrative charges to foreign purchasers and is operated at no cost to taxpayers. The FMS program is funded by administrative charges to foreign purchasers and is operated at no cost to taxpayers. The FMS program is funded by administrative charges to foreign purchasers and is operated at no cost to taxpayers. The FMS program is funded by administrative charges to foreign purchasers and is operated at no cost to taxpayers.
Uncertainty about the size of the global gas hydrate inventory and the portion of the inventory that is susceptible to warming leads to a slow tipping point – CH4 is 20 times more potent than CO2 as a GHG, but it oxidizes to CO2 after about a decade in the atmosphere. CH4 is 200 times more potent than CO2 as a GHG, but it oxidizes to CO2 after about a decade in the atmosphere. CH4 is 20 times more potent than CO2 as a GHG, but it oxidizes to CO2 after about a decade in the atmosphere. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Under inegalitarian conditions, a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal system of government-run public schools that all must attend might suffice – a federal
Market civilization is the latest phase in a process that originated before the dawning of the Enlightenment in Europe, and accelerated in the nineteenth century with the onset of industrial capitalism and the consolidation of the integral nation-state. 
The Senate Environment and Public Works Committee will hold a hearing to “discuss the role of science in environmental policy making. It’s an important topic, given the tendency in Washington to choose ideology over facts. Inhofe’s witness list wasn’t available on the committee’s website, so we called today to find out who would be speaking. We received the following list. As you’ll see, the featured witness isn’t a noted environmental scientist, or an expert in regulatory policy. It’s Jurassic Park author Michael Crichton. And why would Inhofe invite a fiction author to testify on the role of science in environmental policy making. We think you’ll understand after reading a synopsis of Crichton’s latest book, State of Fear, about a scientist named Nicholas Drake. To remedy the situation, he plans a high-profile conference on “abrupt climate change,” 
The WTO is not a world government, a global policeman, or an agent for corporate interests. It does not overrule national laws and does not force countries to kill turtles or lower wages or employ children in factories. It does not overrule national laws and does not force countries to kill turtles or lower wages or employ children in factories. It does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrule national laws and does not overrul
Water scarcity doesn’t lead to a Tragedy of the Commons
If an argument is an invitation to inference, by using such a directive utterance the addresser is inviting the addressee to make an inference from an image, not from a proposition. Hence I will call them arguments from ostension or from deixis. 1 Introduction Many scholars have held that argumentation is a complex speech-act (van Eemeren and Grootendorst 1984; Hitchcock 2007; Bermejo-Luque 2011, among others). As it is well known the concept of language-game prefigures that of speech-act. In Philosophical Investigations 27 (1958) Wittgenstein characterizes ostensive explanation as a language-game on its own. Notice that if both explaining and arguing consist in giving reasons, the differences between them being pragmatic in nature, the existence of ostensive explanations is a sign of
International diplomacy won’t solve climate change – it’s the only way out of a beggar-thy-neighbor quagmire---it’s the only way out of a beggar-thy-neighbor quagmire---it’s the only way out of a beggar-thy-neighbor quagmire---it’s the only way out of a beggar-thy-neighbor quagmire---it’s the only way out of a beggar-thy-neighbor quagmire---it’s the only way out of a beggar-thy-neighbor quagmire---it’s the only way out of a beggar-thy-neighbor quagmire---it’s the only way
Even if we think the broad delegation of immigration authority to the President is appropriate, we must ask an additional question: what should be made of the asymmetrical structure of that delegation? The separation of powers in the context of modern immigration law provides the Executive considerably more flexibility to make ex post screening policy than ex ante screening policy, giving Congress control over the former and the President control over the latter. The Executive might prefer to admit immigrants with lawful status, it is largely powerless to do so. Their lawful admission would be inconsistent with the admissions criteria established by Congress. One instance in which the Executive would prefer to admit immigrants with lawful status is when potential immigrants are unable or unwilling to bear the risks associated with unlawful entry. Their lawful admission would be inconsistent with the admissions criteria established by Congress. One instance in which the Executive would prefer to admit immigrants with lawful status is when potential immigrants are unable or unwilling to bear the risks associated with
Trump has the power to unilaterally withdraw from NATO – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance – he can’t use his executive power to pull the US out of the alliance
Gilroy is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn racialism in politics but not in culture – he is able to identify and damn rac
Postmodernism is all about bringing margins into the play and rejecting grand narratives in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth in favor of undecidability and microexplanations and renounce the universal truth
The Court’s “proportionality” doctrine forecloses the use of capital punishment for certain classes of offenders. The Court’s “proportionality” doctrine categorically forecloses the use of capital punishment for certain classes of offenders. The Court’s “proportionality” doctrine categorically forecloses the use of capital punishment for certain classes of offenders. The Court’s “proportionality” doctrine categorically forecloses the use of capital punishment for certain classes of of offenders. The Court’s “proportionality” doctrine categorically forecloses the use of capital punishment for certain classes of of offenders. The Court’s “proportionality” doctrine categorically forecloses the use of capital punishment for certain classes of of offenders. The Court’s “proportionality” doctrine categorically forecloses the use of
Ukraine should not become a nuclear power – its own interests and those of the West will best be served if Kiev fulfills its oft-made pledges to join the Nonproliferation Treaty (npt) as a nonnuclear weapon state. Ukraine’s own interests and those of the West will best be served if Kiev fulfills its oft-made pledges to join the Nonproliferation Treaty (npt) as a nonnuclear weapon state. Ukraine’s own interests and those of the West will best be served if Kiev fulfills its oft-made pledges to join the Nonproliferation Treaty (npt) as a nonnuclear weapon state. Ukraine’s own interests and those of the West will best be served if Kiev fulfills its oft-made pledges to join the Nonproliferation Treaty (npt
Syria won’t be able to acquire a nuclear deterrent without major foreign assistance – Assad’s main sources of support in fighting the civil war, Russia and Iran, could be expected to strongly oppose Syria’s acquisition of nuclear weapons – a reunified Syria would have a motivation to acquire a nuclear deterrent – a reunified Syria would have a motivation to acquire a nuclear deterrent – a reunified Syria would have a motivation to acquire a nuclear deterrent – a reunified Syria would have a motivation to acquire a nuclear deterrent – a reunified Syria would have a motivation to acquire a nuclear deterrent – a reunified Syria would have a motivation to acquire a nuclear deterrent – a reunified Syria would have a motivation to acquire a nuclear deterrent
We don’t know how to solve the Navier-Stokes equation
Increasing the federal role in education is a normatively desirable development – states are incapable, on their own, of addressing disparities in educational opportunity – it’s necessary to recognize education as a fundamental right through the Fourteenth Amendment and the concept of national citizenship at least authorizes, if not compels, the creation of a common set of educational expectations for meaningful national citizenship through the Fourteenth Amendment and the concept of national citizenship at least authorizes, if not compels, the creation of a common set of educational expectations for meaningful national citizenship through the Fourteenth Amendment and the concept of national citizenship at least authorizes, if not compels, the creation of a common set of educational expectations for meaningful national citizenship through the Fourteenth Amendment and the concept of national citizenship at least authorizes, if not compels, the creation of a common set of educational expectations for meaningful national citizenship through the Fourteenth
America’s “efficient” institutions make most of the key decisions concerning national security, removed from public view and from the constitutional restrictions that check America’s dignified institutions. America’s “efficient” institutions make most of the key decisions concerning national security, removed from public view and from the constitutional restrictions that check America’s dignified institutions. America’s “efficient” institutions make most of the key decisions concerning national security, removed from public view and from the constitutional restrictions that check America’s dignified institutions. America’s “efficient” institutions make most of the key decisions concerning national security, removed from public view and from the constitutional restrictions that check America’s dignified institutions. America’s “efficient” institutions make most of the key decisions concerning national security, removed from public view and from the constitutional restrictions that check America’s dignified institutions. America’s “efficient” institutions make most of the key decisions concerning national security, removed from public
Saddam Hussein’s invasion of Kuwait is the only reason for resource wars – they’re expensive and don’t work – it’s easier to get resources through the stock exchange than the gun barrel
The missing values in Gartzke’s models are systematically associated with its major explanatory variable—market openness 96, thus leads to a biased conclusion
Biodiversity loss causes diseases like Lyme disease, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile virus, West Nile
Offshore aquaculture depletes forage fish populations, threatens food security in developing countries, and takes a valuable food source away from people who need it
The Algerian economy relies too heavily on the oil and gas sector and lacks a strategic vision to develop and modernize the economy. 
Federalism is a double-edged sword – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to solve racial inequality – it’s the only way to
Abolitionist thought is based on the assumption that sovereign power never realized the monopolization of law, but that it would have nevertheless achieved a monopolization of retributive, afflictive sanctions. One does not need to romanticize violence to be able to see that it represents a way of doing justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of some social actors motivated by a desire for justice in the eyes of
Despite the inconclusive benefits to recidivism, the public safety argument has led electronic monitoring programs to frequently incorporate exclusion zones for those monitored. These exclusion zones are dedicated areas within a jurisdiction where a person under surveillance may not travel to, with the ankle monitor prepared to alert authorities when that person comes within a specified distance. Some exclusion zones are tied to the location of an alleged or convicted offense, or known location of a purported witness/victim, but not necessarily. Courts have very wide discretion in determining the exclusion zones. 276 Often these exclusion zones are tied to an area where a friend or relative lives that the court has deemed as a bad influence, the presumed “turf” of alleged rival groups, shopping districts, schools, grocery stores, and even libraries. 
Trade is key to resolving the global economic crisis – protectionism erodes competitiveness, growth, employment, and real incomes
If you want to show that your version of Marxism is a cut above somebody else’s, the quickest way to do so is to call the other vulgar. One’s own is sophisticated, subtle, erudite, philosophically rich—all the things the vulgar is not. Or so it has been for a century. Even outside the small world of selfdescribed Marxists, some versions of Marxism have been acceptable in polite company—but rarely the vulgar ones. What is wrong about the vulgar other is a bit of a moving target, as we shall see. The category works by contrast, as the bad term in a combinatory. The sins of the vulgarians are what you claim your refinement of Marxism is a cut above. When Marx said something was vulgar, he often meant it was bourgeois. This sense of the vulgar is that which has been stripped of its qualities by exchange.
History is a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and a compass that people use to locate themselves on the map of human geography and
One solution is to make power locally produced. The idea is to combine small-scale power generation with bigger batteries inside the home as a way of weaning your house off the electric grid. That scenario could be a more reliable and quieter back-up system than a firing up a diesel generator when the lights go out, according to Bob Gohn, vice president of research for Boulder based Pike Research. “There’s no magic technology that’s going to allow us to transmit power wirelessly,” said Gohn. “But there is a future with greater distributed power that is more independent, having your own power generation or with solar or gas power plants, and using storage systems to run your home for a while.”
U.S. forces have been deployed in four interstate wars: Kuwait in 1991, Kosovo in 1999, Afghanistan from 2001 to the present, and Iraq between 2003 and 2010.22 U.S. forces have been deployed in four interstate wars: Kuwait in 1991, Kosovo in 1999, Afghanistan from 2001 to the present, and Iraq between 2003 and 2010.22 U.S. forces have been deployed in four interstate wars: Kuwait in 1991, Kosovo in 1999, Afghanistan from 2001 to the present, and Iraq between 2003 and 2010.22 U.S. forces have been deployed in four interstate wars: Kuwait in 1991, Kosovo in 1999, Afghanistan from 2001 to the present, and Iraq between 2003 and 2010.22 U.S. forces have been deployed in four interstate wars: Kuwait in 1991, Kosovo in 1999, Afghanistan from 2001 to the present, and Iraq between 2003 and 2010.22 U.S. forces have been deployed in four interstate wars:
The Paris climate agreement is a turning point for the world – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not binding – it’s not
The aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exaggerations are exaggerated – the aff’s exagger
To approach knowledge, in the Western/Modern sense of the word, is to approach a complex colonial systematization of plural existence. When I say plural existence, I do not mean that the totalizing epistemology of the West is plural in itself but that it singularizes the plural. It does not necessarily give agency to the cultures/knowledges totalized within its systematic organization. Let us take the Spanish conquest as an example of the subjugation of autochthonous agency in the name of a totalizing episteme. This narrative was, of course, superficial as Columbus merely used religiosity as a means of marketing the continuation of his exploration of the New World, which in turn paid dividends in resources such as gold and silver that were exotic to Europeans and as a result were valued commodities. This narrative was, of course, superficial as Columbus merely used religiosity as
A debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is a clash of ideas – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate is educational if it is simply informative – a debate
Gen. Curtis “Bombs Away” LeMay, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, was an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an insult to the forces of zealous purity, like New York would later become, an
Trump is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciary – he is blaming the courts for politicizing the judiciar
Restricting H-1B visas causes high tech companies to outsource operations abroad
The U.S. Department of Energy has awarded more than $22 million in investments for projects to help develop cost-competitive algae fuel and other advanced biofuels. Four projects in California, Hawaii, and New Mexico were awarded a total of $16.5 million to accelerate the development of sustainable and affordable algae biofuels while an Ohio-based project will receive $6 million to develop a better biomass feedstock supply chain. The United States Department of Energy has awarded more than $22 million in investments for projects to help develop cost-competitive algae fuel and other advanced biofuels. Four projects in California, Hawaii, and New Mexico were awarded a total of $16.5 million to accelerate the development of sustainable and affordable algae biofuels while an Ohio-based project will receive $6 million to develop a better biomass feedstock supply chain. The United States Department of Energy has awarded more than $22 million in investments for projects to help develop cost-competitive algae
Only in the nightmares of administration hawks and their friends in Riyadh is Iran on the march – only in the nightmares of administration hawks and their friends in Riyadh is Iran on the march – only in the nightmares of administration hawks and their friends in Riyadh is Iran on the march – only in the nightmares of administration hawks and their friends in Riyadh is Iran on the march – only in the nightmares of administration hawks and their friends in Riyadh is Iran on the march – only in the nightmares of administration hawks and their friends in Riyadh is Iran on the march – only in the nightmares of administration hawks and their friends in Riyadh is Iran on the march – only in the nightmares of administration hawks and their friends in Riyad
neoliberalism demonizes collective action, occludes class consciousness, and forestalls the formation of plausible solidarities. Anti-racism centers oppositional politics around the wrong antagonism by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial diversification of capital by promoting the racial
Devastation of war is kept at bay from our perceptions by simulation technologies ranging from the televisual screen to the military ‘smart weapons’ deployed from altitudes of tens of thousands of feet. During months of preparation for the ’war’, viewers experience endless military experts paraded across their screen, endlessly analyzing scenarios before they happen. The pilot in his simulator cockpit, or the gunner in his high tech tank, is surrounded by a virtual environment and motion-dependent images which are the same whether he is in a war game training exercise or a ’real engagement’. During months of preparation for the ’war’, viewers experience endless military experts paraded across their screen, endlessly analyzing scenarios before they happen. The pilot in his simulator cockpit, or the gunner in his high tech tank, is surrounded by a virtual environment and motion-dependent images which are the same whether
Judicial citation or discussion of a foreign ruling does not convert it into binding precedent. Courts cite all sorts of things in their decisions – law review articles, song lyrics, television programs. State supreme courts cite all sorts of things in their decisions – law review articles, song lyrics, television programs. State supreme courts cite all sorts of things in their decisions – law review articles, song lyrics, television programs. State supreme courts cite all sorts of things in their decisions – law review articles, song lyrics, television programs. State supreme courts cite all sorts of things in their decisions – law review articles, song lyrics, television programs. State supreme courts cite all sorts of things in their decisions – law review articles, song lyrics, television programs. State supreme courts cite all sorts of things in their decisions – law review articles, song lyrics, television programs. State supreme courts cite all
Slaves were subjected to painful medical bondage, their bodies were forced onto the stage of medical experiments to lend credence to claims of black inferiority and difference, and black bodies were even conscripted for anatomical dissection after death. Slaves were physically forced into painful medical bondage, their bodies were forced onto the stage of medical experiments to lend credence to claims of black inferiority and difference, and black bodies were even conscripted for anatomical dissection after death. Slaves were physically forced into painful medical bondage, their bodies were forced onto the stage of medical experiments to lend credence to claims of black inferiority and difference, and black bodies were even conscripted for anatomical dissection after death. Slaves were physically forced into painful medical bondage, their bodies were forced onto the stage of medical experiments to lend credence to claims of black inferiority and difference, and black bodies were even
Trump-era sanctuary cities are key to federalism and separation-of-powers doctrine
The deterritorialization of urban society was the solution to the contradiction between participatory democracy and revolutionary elitism haunting the New Left – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result of a long epoch of social development – it was the material result
The United States should take the lead in constructing a pluralist international order – it will not denigrate the accomplishments of democracy, but it will demonstrate an abiding confidence in the values the West holds dear and in the ability of liberal forms of government to outperform authoritarian alternatives – it will not denigrate the accomplishments of democracy, but it will demonstrate an abiding confidence in the values the West holds dear and in the ability of liberal forms of government to outperform authoritarian alternatives – it will not denigrate the accomplishments of democracy, but it will demonstrate an abiding confidence in the values the West holds dear and in the ability of liberal forms of government to outperform authoritarian alternatives – it will not denigrate the accomplishments of democracy, but it will demonstrate an abiding confidence in the values the West holds dear and in the ability of liberal forms of government to outperform authoritarian alternatives
The death drive represents the bringing together of life and death in a way that confounds the adherents of both sides. 
Human rights must be fully protected in the digital sphere – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same – their value to protect every individual remains the same –
Racial ideology provided the means of explaining slavery to people whose terrain was a republic founded on radical doctrines of liberty and natural rights; and, more importantly, a republic in which those doctrines seemed to represent accurately the world in which all but a minority lived. Only when the denial of liberty became an anomaly apparent even to the least observant and reflective members of Euro American society did ideology systematically explain the anomaly to the least observant and reflective members of Euro American society. Only when the denial of liberty became an anomaly apparent even to the least observant and reflective members of Euro American society did ideology systematically explain the anomaly to the least observant and reflective members of Euro American society did ideology systematically explain the anomaly to the least observant and reflective members of Euro American society did ideology systematically explain the anomaly to the least observant and reflective members of Euro American society did ideology systematically explain the
U.S. infrastructure is the best in the world – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to
One may question whether Hare’s position on possible people is even defensible. A merely possible person has always and always will lack the properties requisite for being harmed at all (e.g. a body, a central nervous system, consciousness). The NA-objector might deny that we can even conceive of how one might harm a non-existent person. The NA-objector might deny that we can even conceive of how one might harm a non-existent person. The NA-objector might deny that we can even conceive of how one might harm a non-existent person. The NA-objector might deny that we can even conceive of how one might harm a non-existent person. The NA-objector might deny that we can even conceive of how one might harm a non-existent person. The NA-objector might
Neoliberalism teaches us to be enterprising, active and responsible citizens who are free to take responsibility for their own life choices, but who are expected to follow competitive rules of conduct. Neoliberalism teaches us to be enterprising, active and responsible citizens who are free to take responsibility for their own life choices, but who are expected to follow competitive rules of conduct. Neoliberalism teaches us to be enterprising, active and responsible citizens who are free to take responsibility for their own life choices, but who are expected to follow competitive rules of conduct. Neoliberalism teaches us to be enterprising, active and responsible citizens who are free to take responsibility for their own life choices, but who are expected to follow competitive rules of conduct. Neoliberalism teaches us to be enterprising, active and responsible citizens who are free to take responsibility for their own life choices, but who are expected to follow competitive rules of conduct.
Voters need a broad range of cognitive skills to function capably and knowledgeably, not only as voters and jurors, but also in petitioning their representatives, asserting their rights as individuals, and otherwise taking part in the broad range of interchanges and relationships involved in the concept of civic engagement. 
High School Diploma Option is a key component of a comprehensive curriculum and instructional competency education system that culminates, preferentially, in a high school diploma, or where necessary, a high school equivalency, such as the General Educational Development (GED) test. The goal of the High School Options Division is to develop a comprehensive curriculum and instructional competency education system that culminates, preferentially, in a high school diploma, or where necessary, a high school equivalency, such as the General Educational Development (GED) test. High School Options degrees are not thought of as ends in themselves, but rather a milestone along the path to further academic and vocational attainment. The High School Options Division is to develop a comprehensive curriculum and instructional competency education system that culminates, preferentially, in a high school diploma, or where necessary, a high school equivalency, such
DACA allows LGBTQ people to work, study, and improve their lives in this country without the fear of deportation. The Dream Act will preserve DACA and provide LGBTQ undocumented young people with employment opportunities, educational opportunities, and even a path to citizenship. Asian-Americans, South Asians, Southeast Asians, and Pacific Islanders are the fastest growing racial group in the United States today and the largest segment of new immigrants. Over 169,000 APIs are eligible for DACA; 267,000 undocumented immigrants are LGBT, of which a disproportionate share is API. Asian-Americans, South Asians, Southeast Asians, and Pacific Islanders are the fastest growing racial group in the United States today and the largest segment of new immigrants. Over 16,000 people from South Korea, the Philippines, India, Pakistan, Malaysia, Myanmar, Indonesia, Papua New Guinea, and Tonga have benefited
Mars One will be able to carry about 511 pounds of “useful load” to Mars, he said. Earth won’t be sending much water or oxygen though—the capsules themselves, whose weight is not included in that number, will become part of the habitat. Food and solar panels will go in the capsules. Earth won’t be sending much water or oxygen though—their will be manufactured on Mars, Lansdorp said. Astronauts will filter Martian water from the Martian soil. “We will create an atmosphere that looks like the atmosphere on Earth, so you could say that we are terraforming the habitat,” Lansdorp said. Astronauts will filter Martian water from the Martian soil. “We will create an atmosphere that looks like the atmosphere on Earth, so you could say that we are terraforming the habitat. This will be prepared by the rovers autonomously before the humans
Terrorists are excluded from the terrorism bar because they provide material support to a group of people who used force for a reason other than personal monetary gain, such as a safe house or other material support to the Jewish resistance fighters during World War II, any Tutsi civilians who banded together in groups to resist the Hutu militias during the Rwandan Genocide, or Sudanese villagers who defended themselves against the Janjaweed militia during the genocide in Darfur because they provided material support to a group of two or more people who used force for a reason other than personal monetary gain, such as a safe house or other material support to the Jewish resistance fighters during World War II, or any Sudanese villagers who defended themselves against the Janjaweed militia during the genocide in Darfur because they provided material support to a group of two or more
House and Senate Intelligence Committees were kept fully informed prior to the 2010 reauthorization of the PATRIOT Act
The bipartisan Immigration Policy Roundtable convened by the Brookings Institution and Duke University’s Kenan Institute for Ethics saw immigration from divergent, often conflicting, perspectives. Some of us were clearly attuned to the opportunities and realities of an increasingly interconnected global economy, which necessarily involves substantial movements of workers and their dependents around the world. Others of us were just as clearly concerned with the domestic costs and strains of domestic costs and strains. Some of us empathized with Americans who are outraged that immigration laws are not enforced at the workplace and set standards for the legalization of illegal immigrants. Others held that our current immigration laws are unworkable and must be reconciled with social and economic realities. Despite our deep divisions, participants ultimately converged on a set of recommendations that would significantly enhance enforcement of our immigration laws at the workplace and set standards for the legalization of illegal immigrants.
The Court is an elitist, top-down vision of change that sells short the initiative and dedication of social reform activists whose causes they support – it’s an elitist, top-down vision of change that sells short the initiative and dedication of social reform activists whose causes they support – it’s an elitist, top-down vision of change that sells short the initiative and dedication of social reform activists whose causes they support – it’s an elitist, top-down vision of change that sells short the initiative and dedication of social reform activists whose causes they support – it’s an elitist, top-down vision of change that sells short the initiative and dedication of social reform activists whose causes they support – it’s an elitist, top-down vision of change that sells short the initiative and dedication of social reform activists whose causes
State-sponsored destruction of wealth creates a cat a- strophic de struction of war – etymologically, state-sponsored destruction of wealth creates a cat a- strophic de struction of war – etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, etymologically, e
Sea turtles are endangered – they are migratory animals
Fossil fueled climate change is massively asymmetrical—in the ‘Pro-’ column you have the executives of the richest companies in the world, the politicians who benefit from their campaign contributions, and, as Hayes says, real live people who work in the industry and stand to lose their jobs if a coal plant shuts down. All of those folks have an intensely focused incentive to maintain the climate-altering status quo and, as Hayes says, real live people who work in the industry and stand to lose their jobs if a coal plant shuts down. All of those folks have an intensely focused incentive to maintain the climate-altering status quo and, as Hayes says, real live people who work in the industry and stand to lose their jobs if a coal plant shuts down. All of those folks have an intensely focused incentive to maintain the climate-altering status 
Enrique Pea Nieto’s energy reforms don’t solve – shale gas is key to Mexico’s economy 
U.S. cyber defense is key to counter-capabilities – the ability to absorb a cyber attack, while inconvenient, helps the US identify where additional unaccounted for vulnerabilities exist and, as a result, the US can direct its security apparatus to develop counter-capabilities – the ability to absorb a cyber attack, while inconvenient, helps the US identify where additional previously unknown vulnerabilities exist and, as a result, the US can direct its security apparatus to develop counter-capabilities – the ability to absorb a cyber attack, while inconvenient, helps the US identify where additional previously unknown vulnerabilities exist and, as a result, the US can direct its security apparatus to develop counter-capabilities – the ability to absorb a cyber attack, while inconvenient, helps the US identify where additional previously unknown vulnerabilities exist and, as a result, the US can direct its security apparatus
The Office of the Inspector General (OIG) of DHS has a significant number of recommendations and their interventions, findings, and recommendations influence agency management – data analyzed in this chapter support the fifth case study proposition that IGs achieve increased savings, indictments, and convictions, and their interventions, findings, and recommendations influence agency management – data analyzed in this chapter support the fifth case study proposition that IGs achieve increased savings, indictments, and convictions, and their interventions, findings, and recommendations influence agency management – data analyzed in this chapter support the fifth case study proposition that IGs achieve increased savings, indictments, and convictions, and their interventions, findings, and recommendations influence agency management – data analyzed in this chapter support the fifth case study proposition that IGs achieve increased savings, indictments, and convictions, and their interventions, findings, and recommendations influence agency management – data analyzed
China resolutely opposes US arms sales to Taiwan
Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 precleared jurisdictions to the Department of Justice or a federal court in Washington, D.C.80 Congress reauthorized the Act in 2006 without altering the formula (found in section 4(b) of the Act), even though that formula had been based on racial disparities in voter registration and turnout from the 1972 presidential election. Congress reauthorized the Act in 2006 without altering the formula (found in section 4(b) of the Act), even though that formula had been based on racial disparities in voter registration and turnout from the 1972 presidential election. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Space colonization isn’t a threat – it’s a religious, apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyptic apocalyp
Chinese President Xi Jinping heads to Latin America and the Caribbean on Friday, in a state visit aimed at promoting China’s cooperation with the region. Xi’s visit to Trinidad and Tobago, Costa Rica and Mexico follows his first foreign trip to Russia and three countries in Africa, Tanzania, South Africa and Republic of Congo, shortly after taking office in March. Xi’s visit to Trinidad and Tobago, Costa Rica and Mexico follows his first foreign trip to Russia and three countries in Africa, Tanzania, South Africa and Republic of Congo, shortly after taking office in March. Xi’s visit to Trinidad and Tobago, Costa Rica and Mexico follows his first foreign trip to Russia and three countries in Africa, Tanzania, South Africa and Republic of Congo, shortly after taking office in March. Xi’s visit to Trinidad and Tobago, Costa Rica and Mexico follows his first foreign trip to Russia and three countries
Populism is the most overused word in today’s political lexicon. The most populist parties after 1945 were the Communists, then the Greens. Populist movements of the Left like Spain’s Podemos or Greece’s Syriza have been as strong as those of the Right like the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the UK Independence Party (UKIP) or the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the UK Independence Party (UKIP) or the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the UK Independence Party (UKIP) or the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the UK Independence Party (UKIP) or the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the Alternative for Germany (AfD) or the UK Independence Party (UKIP)
The only way to combat the collective action problem is to strengthen the President’s national voice, because he and the Vice President are the only officials with any incentive under our present electoral structure to stop the redistribution of federal resources. 
The U.S.-Brazil CEO Forum and other events aimed at strengthening the economic and commercial ties between the two nations are key to deepen US-Brazil relations
Human rights norms aren’t self-enforcing – states are unwilling or unable to shoulder the enforcement costs necessary to coerce recalcitrant states to comply with human rights norms
Islamophobia is a term derived from a given reality which can capture and synthesize aspects of that reality. They can respond to social constructions resulting from interaction among different individuals (their own identity and practices) or to his-toric constructions which in an adjustable manner are organized and modified in time and in space. Presumably we should understand the term Islamophobia to be a way to “read” what is going on, a way to express the (current) reality and account for its practices. They can respond to social constructions resulting from processes of interaction among different individuals (their own identity and practices) or to his-toric constructions which in an adjustable manner are organized and modified in time and in space. Presumably we should understand the term Islamophobia to be a way to “read” what is going on, a way to express the (current) reality and account for its practices.
Involuntary servitude is a condition of servitude in which the victim is forced to work for the defendant by the use or threat of physical restraint or physical injury, or by the use or threat of coercion through law or the legal process. Involuntary servitude is a condition of servitude in which the victim is forced to work for the defendant by the use or threat of physical restraint or physical injury, or by the use or threat of coercion through law or the legal process. Involuntary servitude is a condition of servitude in which the victim is forced to work for the defendant by the use or threat of physical restraint or physical injury, or by the use or threat of coercion through law or the legal process. Involuntary servitude is a condition of servitude in which the victim is forced to work for the defendant by the use or threat of physical restraint or
The university territorializes new knowledges, which can be taught and exploited as cultural or economic capital; to use Harney and Moten’s analogy, it ’encircle[es them with] war wagons’ in order to capitalize on them, to use Harney and Moten’s analogy, it ’encircles them with war wagons’ (2013:34) in order to capitalize on them, to use Harney and Moten’s analogy, it ’encircles them with war wagons’ (2013:34) in order to capitalize on them, to use Harney and Moten’s analogy, it ’encircles them with war wagons’ (2013:34) in order to capitalize on them, to use Harney and Moten’s analogy, it ’encircles them with war wagons’ (2013:34) in order to capitalize on
Data localization is pervasive in 16 states—Australia, Brazil, Canada, China, France, Germany, India, Indonesia, Kazakhstan, Malaysia, Russia, South Korea, Sweden, Taiwan, Thailand, and Vietnam—as well as the European Union. Our study reveals the astonishing array of data localization measures in sixteen states—Australia, Brazil, Canada, China, France, Germany, India, Indonesia, Kazakhstan, Malaysia, Russia, South Korea, Sweden, Taiwan, Thailand, and Vietnam—as well as the European Union. Our study reveals the astonishing array of data localization measures in sixteen states—Australia, Brazil, Canada, China, France, Germany, India, Indonesia, Kazakhstan, Malaysia, Russia, South Korea, Sweden, Taiwan, Thailand, and Vietnam—as well as the European Union. Our study reveals the astonishing array of data localization measures in sixteen states—Australia, Brazil, Canada, China, France, Germany, India, Indonesia
We must not tie our actions to those of the Cuban government, because doing so would allow Cuban officials to set U.S. policy, preventing the U.S. from serving its own interests.
Nanoweapons are the defining weapons of the 21st century – the US military already deploys nanoweapons, such as nanotechnology based lasers, toxic nanoparticles, nanoparticle catalysts, and nano electronics. Military nanotechnologies, especially nanobots, will emerge as the defining weapons of the twenty first century. The US military already deploys nanoweapons, such as nanotechnology based lasers, toxic nanoparticles, nanoparticle catalysts, and nano electronics. These nanoweapons give the US significant capabilities in asymmetrical warfare. However, a new class of drones is in development, bird and even insect size drones weighing only a small fraction of a gram. This drone could conceivably fly into an adversary’s command post and provide surveillance or into the adversary’s dining area to deposit a nano poison.
The U.S. and Canada’s fracking boom is key to global oil prices – it’s key to resolving geopolitical tensions in the Middle East, North Africa, and Russia
The real question is whether there are enough synonyms for “good” in an online thesaurus to describe them adequately – the real question is whether there are enough synonyms for “good” in an online thesaurus to describe them adequately – the real question is whether there are enough synonyms for “good” in an online thesaurus to describe them adequately – the real question is whether there are enough synonyms for “good” in an online thesaurus to describe them adequately – the real question is whether there are enough synonyms for “good” in an online thesaurus to describe them adequately – the real question is whether there are enough synonyms for “good” in an online thesaurus to describe them adequately – the real question is whether there are enough synonyms for “good” in an online thesaurus to describe them adequately – the real question is whether there are enough synonyms for “good” in an online the
Decriminalization leads to more sex trafficking – sex trafficking is a subset of all human trafficking – sex trafficking is a much narrower criminal act focused only on the sex industry – sex trafficking is a much narrower criminal act focused only on the sex industry – sex trafficking is a much narrower criminal act focused only on the sex industry – sex trafficking is a much narrower criminal act focused only on the sex industry – sex trafficking is a much narrower criminal act focused only on the sex industry – sex trafficking is a much narrower criminal act focused only on the sex industry – sex trafficking is a much narrower criminal act focused only on the sex industry – sex trafficking is a
RCEP isn’t a Chinese vehicle – it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pacts – it’s not a Chinese vehicle, it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pacts, it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pacts, it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pacts, it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pacts, it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pacts, it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pacts, it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pacts, it’s a pan-Asian alternative to US-led trade pac
Cuba no longer supports armed struggle in Latin America and other parts of the world – the Cuban government continued to provide safe haven to several terrorists, such as members of the Basque Homeland and Freedom (ETA) and Colombia’s Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia (FARC) and the National Liberation Army (ELN), it notes that in July 2008 Fidel Castro called on the FARC to release the hostages they were holding without preconditions, and condemned the FARC’s mistreatment of captives and their abduction of civilian politicians who had no role in the armed conflict. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
P4TP recognizes the futility of relying on behavioral modification to effect full compliance with guidelines of any kind. Look at recycling: Some people have 3 or 4 trash cans in their kitchen to recycle in a still-not-entirely-effective manner. Most people have one, or two at most. Same with energy conservation. Many people screw in twisty light bulbs and turn lights out when they leave a room. Yet many people don’t do one or the other of these things, or both, even highly educated people who consider themselves environmentally conscious. If we’re trying to save the planet, it behooves us to try to set things up in such a way that even egregiously irresponsible people won’t be harming the environment when they proceed with their daily lives. And that CAN be done. It might not sit well with those who consider frugality or responsible
Arctic drilling has been successful in the US, Canada, Russia, Greenland (Denmark) and Norway
Efforts to close the achievement gap must begin with efforts to close the opportunity gap that is the source of much of this early difference in abilities
Judicial deference to agency interpretations of ambiguous statutory terms—a doctrine established in Chevron U.S.A., Inc. v. Natural Resources Defense Council, Inc., 467 U.S. 837 (1984)—is one of the fundamental underpinnings of the modern administrative state. It has been particularly critical to the development of environmental regulations. Chevron deference has allowed Congress to paint its environmental goals in broad terms, in statutes like the Clean Air Act and the Clean Water Act, while leaving to the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) the task of both determining what precisely Congress intended in those statutes and how exactly to achieve what the agency perceives to have been Congress’s goals. It has also allowed successive administrations considerable leeway to change course in environmental policy, simply by proffering and rationally explaining new interpretations of ambiguous statutory provisions.
“Aggression is a fundamental adaptation or functional complex common to the entire primate order, including human beings. Aggressive individuals are essential actors in the social system and competition between groups is necessary for species dispersal and control of local populations. Throughout most of human history societies have depended on young adult males to hunt, to fight, and to maintain the social order with violence. Even when the individual was cooperating, his social role could be executed only by extremely aggressive action that was learned in play, was socially approved, and was presumably gratifying. Throughout most of human history societies have depended on young adult males to hunt, to fight, and to maintain the social order with violence. Even when the individual was cooperating, his social role could be executed only by extremely aggressive action that was learned in play, was socially approved, and was presumably gratifying.
The CJEU doesn’t have the authority to refer EU law to the CJEU – the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the CJEU doesn’t have the authority to refer EU law to the CJEU – the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the aff’s “acte clair” doctrine means the 
U.S.-China Strategic and Economic Dialogue (S&ED) is less useful for improving mutual trust than it is for finding common or complementary interests between the two countries. Chinese realists have confidence that selfish interests, such as the desire to avoid military clashes, will encourage US-China cooperation, especially preventive cooperation. Chinese realists have confidence that selfish interests, such as the desire to avoid military clashes between two nuclear powers, will encourage US-China cooperation, especially preventive cooperation. China and the United States have been able to maintain this superficial friendship since the late 1990s, even in the absence of mutual trust, mainly because they share objective strategic interests, such as nuclear nonproliferation, peace in the Asia-Pacific, counterterrorism in Central Asia, and trade and investment. In order to manage unavoidable competition, the principle of “peaceful competition” may be more useful than the principle of “peace
The U.S. must be the sole geopolitical unit taking responsibility for armed preparedness in a world of dissolving power blocs that have, until recently, reliably supplied antagonists. The objects of attention only appear to be the result of an epistemologically oriented kind of thinking, a thinking that locates dangers as external objects to be met by the endangered subject. The object of attention only appears to be the result of an epistemologically oriented kind of thinking, a thinking that locates dangers as external objects to be met by the endangered subject. The object of attention only appears to be the result of an epistemologically oriented kind of thinking, a thinking that locates dangers as external objects to be met by the endangered subject. The object of attention only appears to be the result of an epistemologically oriented kind of thinking, a thinking that locates danger
On April 30, 1982, Powell A. Moore, Assistant Secretary of State for Congressional Relations, reported to Congress that the President had determined that Argentina – through its use of US-supplied military equipment in its occupation of the Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas) on April 2, 1982 – “may” have substantially violated the applicable agreements with the United States governing use of this equipment. In his April 30, 1982, Powell A. Moore, Assistant Secretary of State for Congressional Relations, reported to Congress that the President had determined that Argentina – through its use of US-supplied military equipment in its occupation of the Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas) on April 2, 1982 – “may” have substantially violated the applicable agreements with the United States governing use of this equipment. In his April 30, 1982, Powell A. Moore, Assistant Secretary of State for Congressional Relations, reported to Congress that the
U.S. dominance in the Asia-Pacific is at risk – China is rapidly modernizing its forces and developing a whole network that integrates a range of increasingly high quality platforms, weapons, sensors, and command, control and communications systems that integrates a whole network that integrates a range of increasingly high quality platforms, weapons, sensors, and command, control and communications systems that integrates a range of increasingly high quality platforms, weapons, sensors, and command, control and communications systems that integrates a range of increasingly high quality platforms, weapons, sensors, and command, control and communications systems that integrate a range of increasingly high quality platforms, weapons, sensors, and command, control and communications systems that integrate a range of increasingly high quality platforms, weapons, sensors, and command, control and communications systems that integrate a range of increasingly high quality platforms, weapons, sensors, and command, control and communications systems that integrate a range of
President Trump plans to cap refugee admissions at 45,000 over the next year, according to current and former government officials briefed on the decision, setting a historically low limit on the number of people who can resettle in the United States after fleeing persecution in their own countries. The limit, first reported by The Wall Street Journal, is the lowest any White House has sought since 1980, the year legislation was enacted giving the president a role in determining a cap on refugees. The limit, first reported by The Wall Street Journal, is the lowest any White House has sought since 1980, the year legislation was enacted giving the president a role in determining a cap on refugees; the ceiling has never slipped lower than 67,000, the number Ronald Reagan set in 1986. Administration officials plan to inform senior lawmakers of the decision on Wednesday, according to the officials, who insisted on anonymity because they were not authorized to pre-
Disempowerment uses a diverse and often mutually reinforcing set of tactics to confront and erode police power, catalyze (or deepen) a legitimacy crisis for the police, and build a world where the function of policing itself has been rendered obsolete. Disempowerment uses a diverse and often mutually reinforcing set of tactics to confront and erode police power, catalyze (or deepen) a legitimacy crisis for the police, and build a world where the function of policing itself has been rendered obsolete. Disempowerment uses a diverse and often mutually reinforcing set of tactics to confront and erode police power, catalyze (or deepen) a legitimacy crisis for the police, and build a world where the function of policing itself has been rendered obsolete.
Chinese espionage presents a serious problem for the United States because it’s so heavily ethnic in character. China expects its nationals overseas to serve as their spies abroad, and some of them are quite willing to do so, particularly if China sweetens the pot with financial incentives. This seems to have been the case with Chun. We don’t yet know the full extent of the security damage wrought by Joey Chun on his adopted homeland, and the FBI isn’t eager to tell us, but given his position, including Top Secret access, and long length of employment, it should be assumed to be serious. Any mole is dangerous, even if he’s just a technical support worker rather than a professional intelligence officer. As with counterterrorism in the age of Obama, it’s worse for your counterintelligence career to be accused of racism than to miss the mole right in your midst.
America’s war in Afghanistan is now in its 16th year, the longest foreign war in our history. The term “no end in sight” barely covers the situation. Prospects of victory—if victory is defined as eliminating that country as a haven for Islamist terrorists while creating a representative government in Kabul—are arguably more tenuous today than at any point since the US military invaded in 2001 and routed the Taliban. Such “progress” has, over the years, invariably proven “fragile” and “reversible,” to use the weasel words of General David Petraeus who oversaw the Afghan “surge” of 2010–11 under President Obama. The US military considers what it has begun to speak of as a “generational” war in that country “successful” because no major attacks on the US have had their roots in Afghanistan since September 11, 2001
U.S.-Mexico relations are on a good path – they don’t rely on Mexico as a transit point for narcotics or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a transit point for narcotics or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as a market hungry for drugs or the United States as 
Fusion centers are a “mechanism to exchange information and intelligence, maximize resources, streamline operations, and improve the ability to fight crime and terrorism by analyzing data from a variety of sources—it’s a mechanism to exchange information and intelligence, maximize resources, streamline operations, and improve the ability to fight crime and terrorism by analyzing data from a variety of sources—it’s a mechanism to exchange information and intelligence, maximize resources, streamline operations, and improve the ability to fight crime and terrorism by analyzing data from a variety of sources—it’s a mechanism to exchange information and intelligence, maximize resources, streamline operations, and improve the ability to fight crime and terrorism by analyzing data from a variety of sources—it’s a mechanism to exchange information and intelligence, maximize resources, streamline operations, and improve the ability to fight crime and terrorism by analyzing data from a variety of sources—it’
15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations score at the lowest level of proficiency in environmental science – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of proficiency – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of proficiency – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of proficiency – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of proficiency – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of proficiency – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of proficiency – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of proficiency – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of proficiency – 15.5 percent of students in all OECD nations scored at the lowest level of
The Bureau of Indian Education (BIE) is an ideal place for the new administration to put school choice into action without interfering with local control. BIE schools are some of the worst in the country, with a graduation rate barely topping 50 percent in reading, students score an average of two grade levels lower on the National Assessment for Educational Progress than their Native counterparts in non-BIE schools. Despite this, BIE schools are some of the worst in the country, with a graduation rate barely topping 50 percent in reading, students score an average of two grade levels lower on the National Assessment for Educational Progress than their Native counterparts in non-BIE schools. Despite this, BIE schools are some of the worst in the country, with a graduation rate barely topping 50 percent in reading, students score an average of two grade levels lower on the National Assessment for Educational Progress than their Native counterparts in non-BIE schools. 
Genetically engineered bioweapons kill off most of life on earth and severely compromise the health of future generations – “patriotism” must be redefined to make humanity’s survival primary and absolute – even if we lose our cherished freedom, our sovereignty, our government or our Constitution, where there is life, there is hope. No government, no economic system, no national pride, no religion, no political system can be placed above human survival – even if we lose our cherished freedom, our sovereignty, our government or our Constitution, where there is life, there is hope. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Opportunists attempt to use the same diversity that enriches us to stoke division, fear and hatred in an effort to stop more immigrants from coming here. That appeals to mankind’s worst instincts. We must not allow fear or extremism to obscure our values by demonizing larger groups of people who bear us no ill will. As an immigrant, you may be feeling anxiety and trepidation about the policy debate presently unfolding in the United States. That appeals to mankind’s worst instincts. We know from painful experience that the threat of terrorism is real, and that our nation must be ever vigilant against those whose seek to do us harm. Yet, we must not allow fear or extremism to obscure our values by demonizing larger groups of people who bear us no ill will. We must not allow fear or extremism to obscure our values by demonizing larger groups
Supporting immigration is good politics for Republicans – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go on record on immigration – it’s the only way to go
Marijuana legalization fuels cartels and smugglers
Pemex is facing severe financial difficulties and is in dire need of upgrading its technology infrastructure. Corruption is deep rooted in an opaque administration choked with red tape and in political and economic vested interests.
Increase [v. in-krees; n. in-krees] Show IPA verb, -creased, -creasing, noun –verb (used with object) 1.to make greater, as in number, size, strength, or quality; augment; add to: to increase taxes.
There’s a reason Cubans don’t have access to the Internet. It’s because the regime can’t survive a Cuban reality where individual Cubans can communicate with each other in an unfettered manner. It’s because the regime can’t survive a Cuban reality where individual Cubans can communicate with each other in an unfiltered manner. It’s because the regime can’t survive a Cuban reality where individual Cubans can communicate with each other in an unfettered manner. It’s because the regime can’t survive a Cuban reality where individual Cubans can communicate with each other in an unfiltered manner. It’s because the regime can’t survive a Cuban reality where individual Cubans can communicate with each other in an unfettered manner. It’s because the regime can’t survive a Cuban reality where individual Cubans can communicate with each
The Fed can stick to a gradual rate hike over the next couple of years without much risk of an unhealthy surge in inflation, Chicago Fed President Charles Evans said on Tuesday. “I don’t foresee an outsized risk of a breakout in inflation,” Evans said in remarks prepared for delivery to the Chicago Rotary Club. “As long as this picture continues, the (Fed) can increase rates gradually while monitoring any rising inflationary pressures. The Fed in December 2015 embarked on what is emerging as the slowest rate-hike cycle in its 100-year history, with its target range for short term borrowing costs now at 1.5 percent to 1.75 percent despite what Evans called an economy that is firing on all cylinders. Some economists have warned that the Fed may need to raise rates faster to prevent inflation from accelerating, now that unemployment is at 4.1 percent and expected to fall further as consumer and business spending, along with expansionary
U.S. arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE aren’t consistent with international standards – the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE is a direct result of the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE – the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE is a direct result of the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE – the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE is a direct result of the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE – the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE is a direct result of the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE – the aff’s failure to monitor arms sales to Saudi Arabia and the UAE is 
No, when you have the winning Powerball ticket, you redeem it. To do so we need sensible, efficient regulation and regulatory systems, led by experienced and competent state-level regulators. We don’t need federal regulatory layers that merely duplicate what the states already are doing, with professionalism and efficiency. Likewise, we need a fair tax system that doesn’t single out an industry or a handful of companies. Rather, we need one that encourages investment and development while assuring that US energy firms can go up against global competitors. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
There are approximately 3.04 trillion trees on planet Earth (Crowther et al, 2015), covering 31% of the world’s land surfacew1. Today, for Earth day, we’re taking a look at trees. There are approximately 3.04 trillion trees on planet Earth (Crowther et al, 2015), covering 31% of the world’s land surfacew1. Today, for Earth day, we’re taking a look at trees. There are approximately 3.04 trillion trees on planet Earth (Crowther et al, 2015), covering 31% of the world’s land surfacew1. Today, for Earth day, we’re taking a look at trees. There are approximately 3.04 trillion trees on planet Earth (Crowther et al, 2015), covering 31% of the world’s land surfacew1. Today, for Earth day, we’re taking a look at trees.
Presumptive GOP nominee Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton are in a dead heat for Ohio votes in the all-important swing state, according to a Quinnipiac University poll released Tuesday. Both would receive about 40% of the vote, according to the most recent poll, which comes one month after polling showed Trump had a slight edge over Clinton in the Buckeye State. Clinton has slightly more support from Ohio Democrats – 80 percent would vote for her than Trump has among the state’s Republican voters, 76 percent of whom would vote for Trump. Trump has suffered some self-inflicted wounds, including attacking a federal judge of Mexican descent and doubling down on a ban on Muslims following the shootings at an Orlando gay club. Trump has suffered some self-inflicted wounds, including attacking a federal judge of Mexican descent and doubling down on a ban on Muslims following the shootings at an Orlando
There are hundreds of items on a U.S. Commerce Department list of goods that can be exported to Cuba – there are hundreds of items on a U.S. Commerce Department list of goods that can be exported to Cuba – there are hundreds of items on a U.S. Commerce Department list of goods that can be exported to Cuba – there are hundreds of items on a U.S. Commerce Department list of goods that can be exported to Cuba – there are hundreds of items on a U.S. Commerce Department list of goods that can be exported to Cuba – there are hundreds of items on a U.S. Commerce Department list of goods that can be exported to Cuba – there are hundreds of items on a U.S. Commerce Department list of goods that can be exported to Cuba – there are hundreds of items on a U.S. Commerce Department list of goods that can be exported to Cuba –
The market for Treasury debt hasn’t shown any signs yet of being unsettled. Investors haven’t started shunning short-term government debt and yields haven’t risen. Fitch Ratings disagrees but says it would trigger a review of whether the U.S. still warrants a AAA rating.
Art education is a hybrid, transgressive space, an antidote to the instrumental positivism that characterises so much schooling – it’s a hybrid, transgressive space, an antidote to the instrumental positivism that characterises so much schooling – it’s a hybrid, transgressive space, an antidote to the instrumental positivism that characterises so much schooling – it’s a hybrid, transgressive space, an antidote to the instrumental positivism that characterises so much schooling – it’s a hybrid, transgressive space, an antidote to the instrumental positivism that characterises so much schooling – it’s a hybrid, transgressive space, an antidote to the instrumental positivism that characterises so much
To meet the daily nutritional needs of a rapidly expanding population, the world’s human community, particularly in Western countries, must reduce its reliance on animal products and shift to a more plant-based diet. To meet the daily nutritional needs of a rapidly expanding population, the world’s human community, particularly in Western countries, must reduce its reliance on animal products and shift to a more plant-based diet. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
USCG ballast water management requirements specific to the Great Lakes are codified in regulations at 33 U.S. Code of Federal Regulations [C.F.R.] Part 151, Subpart C, and the requirements applicable to all U.S. waters are codified at 33 U.S. Code of Federal Regulations [C.F.R.] Part 151, Subpart D. As originally issued, both sets of regulations were consistent with the existing ballast water management resolutions adopted by IMO and placed primary emphasis on use of mid-ocean BWE to manage ballast water. Recognizing the significant limitations of a BWE-based regulatory framework, the USCG issued for public comment a proposed rule in August 2009 to gradually replace reliance on BWE with a regime requiring treatment of ballast water to meet a concentration-based discharge standard.
Sino-Saudi relations are key to the development of Sino-Saudi relations – economic complementarity, resource advantages, and industrial structures are key to the development of Sino-Saudi relations. China is the largest energy importer in the world, as well as an exporting power on industrial and consumer products while Saudi Arabia is a global oil-supplier with huge demand for consumer imports. Viewing from the trade structure, China, as the third biggest export destination, mainly imports petrochemical products from Saudi Arabia. Viewing from the trade structure, China, as the third biggest export destination, mainly imports petrochemical products from Saudi Arabia. Viewing from the trade structure, China, as the third biggest export destination, mainly imports petrochemical products from Saudi Arabia. Viewing from the trade structure, China, as the third biggest export destination, mainly imports petrochemical products from Saudi
Using the metaphor of the relation between the gene and the soma, Marcuse asserts that cultural commodities have not only produced a closed universe from which oppositional ideas are strictly excluded, but that fundamental changes in the genetic structures of humans had occurred such that individuation is foreclosed within the terms set by the system. Using the metaphor of the relation between the gene and the soma, Marcuse asserts that cultural commodities have not only produced a closed universe from which oppositional ideas are strictly excluded, but that fundamental changes in the genetic structures of humans had occurred such that individuation is foreclosed within the terms set by the system. Using the metaphor of the relation between the gene and the soma, Marcuse asserts that cultural commodities have not only produced a closed universe from which oppositional ideas are strictly excluded, but that fundamental changes in the genetic structures of humans had occurred such that individuation is fore
More than 200,000 species are now known from the United States- a figure double the previous estimate and includes only those species that scientists have formally studied and named, and may represent fewer than half the plants, animals, and microbes yet to be discovered in the United States. A vast land of contrasts, the United States harbors an extraordinary biodiversity of life, from the lush forests of Appalachia to the frozen tundra of Alaska, and from the Midwest’s tallgrass prairies to Hawaii’s rainforests. Precious Heritage reveals the nation’s biological wealth in unprecedented detail, drawing together for the first time more than a quarter century of information from the network of state natural heritage programs. Sponsored by NatureServe and The Nature Conservancy, this richly illustrated volume not only documents the enormous breadth of US species and ecosystems, but also considers how they are faring, what is threatening them, and what
IOM Committee on Health Research and the Privacy of Health Information: The HIPAA Privacy Rule does not directly regulate researchers, it restricts the manner in which health care providers may use and disclose health information for health research. The HIPAA Privacy Rule does not directly regulate researchers, it restricts the manner in which health care providers may use and disclose health information for health research. The HIPAA Privacy Rule does not directly regulate researchers, it restricts the manner in which health care providers may use and disclose health information for health research. The HIPAA Privacy Rule does not directly regulate researchers, it restricts the manner in which health care providers may use and disclose health information for health research. The HIPAA Privacy Rule does not directly regulate researchers, it restricts the manner in which health care providers may use and disclose health information for health research. The HIPAA Privacy Rule does not directly regulate researchers, it restricts the manner in which health care providers may use and disclose health
SPOT isn’t a racial profiling program – it’s a racial profiling program that isn’t a behavior-based program – it’s a racial profiling program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn’t a behavior-based program that isn
Government control over travel and mobility of both noncitizens and U.S. citizens is a source of potential threat to public safety – travel itself is deemed a source of potential danger to public safety – the U.S. government’s capacity to undertake day-to-day location tracking, using GPS systems, cellular telephone location data, automated license plate readers, and other mechanisms, has also been significantly increased. 
Even if the third offset strategy is successful, the U.S. economy won’t be able to support a technological arms race between China and the U.S. – the Asian littoral out to the first island chain is the first and most significant area of operations for peacetime military competition between China and the United States as well as the most likely flashpoint for direct conflict between the two militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarized militarize
State-run TASS news agency quoted Russian Deputy Foreign Minister Sergei Ryabkov as saying, “Russia is ready to hold consultations with the United States about the Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces (INF) treaty at diplomatic and military levels, the state-run TASS news agency quoted Russian Deputy Foreign Minister Sergei Ryabkov as saying on Wednesday. “Russia is ready to hold consultations with the United States about the Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces (INF) treaty at diplomatic and military levels, the state-run TASS news agency quoted Russian Deputy Foreign Minister Sergei Ryabkov as saying on Wednesday. “Russia is ready to hold consultations with the United States about the Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces (INF) treaty at diplomatic and military levels, the state-run TASS news agency quoted Russian Deputy Foreign Minister Sergei Ryabkov as saying on Wednesday.
The federal constitution does not establish a fundamental right to education or to “equal” school funding under the Fourteenth Amendment’s equal protection clause. The federal constitution does not establish a fundamental right to education or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “equal” school funding or to “e
Biden’s lead is a sizable enough lead that Trump’s reelection chances are in a precarious position – even if the polls swing 7 points in Trump’s favor, he would still trail Biden by about 2 to 3 points nationally. Even if the polls swing 7 points in Trump’s favor, he would still trail Biden by about 2 to 3 points nationally. Even if the polls swing 7 points in Trump’s favor, Trump could still win – after all, he won in 2016 despite losing the popular vote by about 2 points. Trump got a few favorable polls in Florida and Pennsylvania. In surveys conducted just before the Fourth of July, Trafalgar Group found Trump tied with Biden in Florida and trailing Biden by just 5 points in Pennsylvania. That might not sound like particularly good news for Trump in Pennsylvania, but considering Biden’s average
Rural populations, forest stock, cattle business, the timber market, and road networks (both official and unofficial) are contributors to deforestation. Rural populations, forest stock, cattle business, the timber market, and road networks (both official and unofficial) are contributors to deforestation. Global results suggest that rural populations, forest stock, cattle business, the timber market, and road networks (both official and unofficial) are contributors to deforestation. The relationship between GDP per capita and deforestation was found to follow a U-shaped environmental Kuznets curve. The relation between GDP per capita and deforestation was found to follow a U-shaped environmental Kuznets curve. The cross-validated sum of squares of the GRW model, based on travel time distances, was minimized at 15 nearest neighbors. Using this method, the global R2 increased from 57% to
Cuban biotechnology is key to transforming cancer from a deadly disease into a chronic disease. Cuban biotech industry holds around 1200 international patents and markets pharmaceutical products and vaccines in more than 50 countries. Cuban biotech industry holds around 1200 international patents and markets pharmaceutical products and vaccines in more than 50 countries. Cuban biotech industry holds around 1200 international patents and markets pharmaceutical products and vaccines in more than 50 countries. Cuban biotech industry holds around 1200 international patents and markets pharmaceutical products and vaccines in more than 50 countries. Cuban biotech industry holds around 1200 international patents and markets pharmaceutical products and vaccines in more than 50 countries. Cuban biotech industry holds around 1200 international patents and markets pharmaceutical products and vaccines in more than 50 countries. Cuban biotech industry holds around 1200 international patents and markets pharmaceutical products and vaccines in more than 50 countries. Cuban biotech
Trade liberalization is key to defusing tensions in the Middle East, Asia, Africa, and Europe – it’s key to defusing tensions in the Middle East, Asia, Africa, and Europe – it’s key to defusing tensions in the Middle East, Asia, Africa, and Europe – it’s key to defusing tensions in the Middle East, Asia, Africa, and Europe – it’s key to defusing tensions in the Middle East, Asia, Africa, and Europe – it’s key to defusing tensions in the Middle East, Asia, Africa, and Europe – it’s key to defusing tensions in the Middle East, Asia, Africa, and Europe – it’s key to defusing tensions in the Middle East, Asia, Africa, and Europe – it’s key to defusing tensions in the Middle East,
Congress’s track record in major policy debates arising out of the war on terror has been uneven, at best.
“It’s not ’build that wall’ anymore, it’s ’Continue building that wall,’” he said a day later at the White House. “It’s not ’build that wall’ anymore, it’s ’Continue building that wall,’” he said a day later at the White House. “It’s not ’build that wall’ anymore, it’s ’Continue building that wall,’” he said a day later at the White House. “It’s not ’build that wall’ anymore, it’s ’Continue building that wall,’” he said a day later at the White House. “It’s not ’build that wall’ anymore, it’s ’Continue building that wall,’” he said a day later at the White House.
Non-recognized nuclear states such as India our Pakistan are to be drawn into the process – which could be considered a variation on GRIT – graduated reciprocation in tension reduction, China’s example could help them to consider this option
Sovereignty condition the possibility of mobility and structure resistance to the sovereign and make not only possible but necessary putting one’s self into this state of exception between states. We know that the ancient Greeks held the hospitality ethic as among the highest. From its Latin roots, we see the connections on which Agamben might be tempted to draw upon etymologically between hostia as sacrificial animal, hostis as stranger or enemy, hostilus as hostile or like an enemy, and hostire as to requite or retaliate; and hospes as host, guest, friend, foreigner. The product of camp bureaucracy is the rendering of the bare life of the inhabitants into unmourned death. Similarly, the product of border bureaucracy is the rendering of the bare life of the inhabitants into unmourned
Existential threat means someone’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence is in jeopardy or something’s existence
Critical thinking is the only way to protect jobs – it’s the only way to create a culture of real identities, where people would voluntarily expose themselves to their friends, and this would become a transformative platform. Zuckerberg is a classic liberal arts student who also happened to be passionately interested in computers. He studied ancient Greek intensively in high school and majored in psychology while he attended college. And Facebook’s innovations have a lot to do with psychology. Zuckerberg understands computers deeply and uses great coders to put his ideas into practice, but as he has put it, Facebook is “as much psychology and sociology as it is technology.” Twenty years ago, tech companies might have survived simply as product manufacturers. Now they have to be on the cutting edge of design, marketing and social networking. You can make a sneaker equally well in many parts of the world, but you can’t sell it for $300
Badiou’s critique of anarchism is a sterile set of static dualisms, from which is derived the catechism of the System and the Flux, the Despot and the Nomad, the Paranoiac, and the Schizo, from which is derived the catechism of the System and the Flux, the Despot and the Nomad, the Paranoiac, and the Schizo, from which is derived the catechism of the System and the Flux, the Despot and the Nomad, the Paranoiac, and the Schizo, from which is derived the catechism of the System and the Flux, the Despot and the Nomad, the Paranoiac, and the Schizo, from which is derived the catechism of the System and the Flux, the Despot and the Nomad, the Para
Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofuturist/Afrocyberpunk Afrofu
“Asylum was never meant to alleviate all problems, even all serious problems, that people face every day all over the world,” Sessions said when addressing an annual training conference for the hundreds of US immigration judges on Monday. “Asylum was never meant to alleviate all problems, even all serious problems, that people face every day all over the world,” Sessions said when addressing an annual training conference for the hundreds of US immigration judges on Monday. “Asylum was never meant to alleviate all problems, even all serious problems, that people face every day all over the world,” Sessions said when addressing an annual training conference for the hundreds of US immigration judges on Monday. “Asylum was never meant to alleviate all problems, even all serious problems, that people face every day all over the world,” Sessions said when addressing an annual training conference for the hundreds of US immigration judges on Monday. “Asylum was never meant
Foreign Affairs Minister John Baird is on an eight-day, six-country Latin American tour that also took him last week to Cuba, the hemisphere’s most repressive anti-democratic country. He’s on an eight-day, six-country Latin American tour that also took him last week to Cuba, the hemisphere’s most repressive anti-democratic country. He’s on an eight-day, six-country Latin American tour that also took him last week to Cuba, the hemisphere’s most repressive anti-democratic country. He’s on an eight-day, six-country Latin American tour that also took him last week to Cuba, the hemisphere’s most repressive anti-democratic country. He’s on an eight-day, six-country Latin American tour that also took him last week to Cuba, the hemisphere’s
Electric generation is the consuming sector that has seen and will continue to see growth through 2020
There’s a renaissance of natural products for drug discovery – the oceans are key to a robust pipeline of biosynthetic drugs that flow into the market and pharmacies in the future – the oceans are key to a robust pipeline of biosynthetic drugs that flow into the market and pharmacies in the future – the oceans are key to a robust pipeline of biosynthetic drugs that flow into the market and pharmacies in the future – the oceans are key to a robust pipeline of biosynthetic drugs that flow into the market and pharmacies in the future – the oceans are key to a robust pipeline of biosynthetic drugs that flow into the market and pharmacies in the future – the oceans are key to a robust pipeline of biosynthetic drugs that flow into the market and pharmacies in the future – the
Transparency is an ideology of social control – it creates a world in which everything is to be legible, visible, and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – a world where everything must be immediately visible and immediately interpretable – 
Proposed Rulemaking would require operators to have a “relief rig” and other back-up equipment available on stand-by notice to assist in case of a loss of well control on the Arctic OCS
America’s soft power is oblivious to the fact that China and India are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are growing three and four times faster than Europe, Japan and America and are
Plastic entanglement is a very serious threat to marine mammals, such as fur seals, which are both curious and playful (Mattlin and Cawthorn, 1986), but it is a particular problem for marine mammals, such as fur seals, which are both curious and playful (Mattlin and Cawthorn, 1986). Youngfur seals are attracted to floating debris and dive and roll about in it (Mattlin and Cawthorn, 1986). They will approach objects in the water and often poke their heads into loops and holes (Fowler, 1987), the lie of the longg uard hairs prevents the strapping from slipping off (Mattlin and Cawthorn, 1986). Youngfur seal pups grow into the plastic collars, and in time as it tightens, the plastic severs the seal’s arteries or str
Droughts, fires, hot summers, and melting glaciers call for a redoubled effort to save Mother Earth. 
The right to food entitles every person to an economic, political, and social environment that will allow them to achieve food security in dignity through their own means. Individuals or groups who do not have the capacity to meet their food needs for reasons beyond their control, such as illness, discrimination, age, unemployment, economic downturn, or natural disaster, are entitled to be provided with food directly. Individuals or groups who do not have the capacity to meet their food needs for reasons beyond their control, such as illness, discrimination, age, unemployment, economic downturn, or natural disaster, are entitled to be provided with food directly. The right to food entitles every person to an economic, political, and social environment that will allow them to achieve food security in dignity through their own means. Individuals or groups who do not have the capacity to meet their food needs for reasons beyond their control, such as illness, discrimination, age, unemployment, economic down
The image incited an eruption of affective politics—that is, politics framed not by ideology but as a passage a l’acte riding on a surge of feeling. This event manifests what Brian Massumi calls the role of “images as the conveyers of forces of emergence, as vehicles for existential potentialization and transfer” (2002, 43). Massumi places the mass circulation of images within the context of an affective theory of late capitalist power, wherein they perform as relays for the transmission of potential that is then inhibited in its emergence as part of the cultural-political functioning of the media and connected apparatuses. This idea of the image as the bearer of affective power owes a debt to Walter Benjamin’s “dialectical image,” or the image that emerges in a flash to threaten the preservation of the status quo with the instant
The CCP has been riven with factions or what Mao used to call “mountain strongholds” since the days when the guerrilla leaders schemed and plotted in the eaves ofYan’an. Shaanxi Province. Factionalism almost led to the ruin of the Party—and China—during the violent clashes of the Cultural Revolution (1966-76). Until Deng’s death in 1997, rivalry among the CCP’s disparate camarillas was in large measure predicated upon ideological differences. There was the “struggle between two lines” between Chairman Mao, and “capitalist roaders” such as State President Liu Shaoqi and Deng, on the other. For much of the 1980s and 1990s, Deng fought numerous battles with the conservative patriarch Chen Yun—a keen advocate of “reform within 
One of few bright spots for Wyoming’s economy, environmental regulators say cleanup projects at abandoned mine sites have been in full swing across the state, not only producing much needed jobs, but funneling millions into local economies.
The Internet is key to the global economy – a break in one cable can have a cascading effect on internet access to distant states.
Learning is not just a transmission of knowledge, but an activity in which whole selves are formed and acquire new capacities for development. We live in a world of enormous cultural diversity, and the various languages and points of view—ideologies in Bakhtin’s sense—of students have become a fact that cannot be ignored. Teachers need to enter into a dialogue with those points of view and to help students do the same. For difference may best be understood not as an obstacle but as an opportunity. The range of “authoritative” and “innerly persuasive discourses” in our classrooms appears to be growing along with our cultural diversity. Freedman and Ball observe that this rich and complex “contact zone” inside the classroom yields plentiful opportunity for students to decide what will be internally persuasive for them, and consequently for them to develop their ideologies. This diversity presents both challenges and opportunities as teachers seek to guide their students on this
Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are urgent calls to narrow the field. Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are urgent calls to narrow the field. Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are urgent calls to narrow the field. Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are urgent calls to narrow the field. Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are urgent calls to narrow the field. Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are urgent calls to narrow the field. Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are urgent calls to narrow the field. Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are urgent calls to narrow the field. Biden has already clarified it will be a woman but now there are
Capitalism has always been a world or ‘global’ system, in the sense that the rise of capitalism coincides with, and feeds upon, the rise of colonialism and inter-continental conquest.
Over the past 50 years, the average global temperature has increased at the fastest rate in recorded history – all but one of the 16 hottest years in NASA’s 134-year record have occurred since 2000. Climate change deniers have argued that there has been a “pause” or a “slowdown” in warming, but recent studies, including a 2015 paper published in the journal Science, have disproved this claim. 
Private schools aren’t the high performing elite schools in advanced economies or attended by the rich in developing countries – these schools aren’t the high performing elite schools associated with the private school provision in advanced economies or attended by the rich in developing countries – these schools aren’t the high performing elite schools typically associated with the private school provision in advanced economies or attended by the rich in developing countries – these schools aren’t the high performing elite schools typically associated with the private school provision in advanced economies or attended by the rich in developing countries – these schools aren’t the high performing elite schools typically associated with the private school provision in advanced economies or attended by the rich in developing countries – these schools aren’t the high performing elite schools typically associated with the private school provision in advanced economies or attended by the rich in developing countries – these schools aren’t the high performing elite schools typically associated with the private school provision in advanced economies or
New sets of environmental pressures are confronting people around the world – ecological degradation, under representation of indigenous peoples in decision making, declining resource availability, and climate change (Millennium Ecosystem Assessment 2005, Steffen et al. 2007, Haines-Young and Potschin 2010). The management of freshwater resources to maintain ecosystem health and well-being, as well as supporting local communities (see Bignall et al. 2016), is a particularly pressing and difficult problem (Arthington 2012, Hall et al. 2014, Horne et al. 2017a). The management of freshwater resources to maintain ecosystem health and well-being, as well as supporting local communities (see Bignall et al. 2016), is a particularly pressing and difficult problem (Arthington 2012, Hall et al. 2014, Horne et al. 2017a).
Disagreement is a cure for dysfunctional deliberative polarization and biases – even if we don’t reach a consensus with our opponents, we can still come up with a line of argument that achieves this goal for our own personal beliefs, attitudes, and dispositions. 
The next generation of terrorists is growing up in a digital world, one in which hacking tools are sure to become more powerful, simpler to use, and easier to access... the next generation of terrorists is now growing up in a digital world, one in which hacking tools are sure to become more powerful, simpler to use, and easier to access... the next generation of terrorists is growing up in a digital world, one in which hacking tools are sure to become more powerful, simpler to use, and easier to access... the next generation of terrorists is growing up in a digital world, one in which hacking tools are sure to become more powerful, simpler to use, and easier to access... the next generation of terrorists is growing up in a digital world, one in which hacking tools are sure to become more powerful, simpler to use
Russia’s GDP will shrink 5.9% year on year in 2013, with the budget deficit growing to 3.5tn roubles, or 6.4% of GDP, according to a crush-test by the experts from the High School of Economics. Russia’s GDP will shrink 5.9% year on year in 2013, with the budget deficit growing to 3.5tn roubles, or 6.4% of GDP, according to a crush-test by the experts from the High School of Economics. Russia’s GDP will shrink 5.9% year on year in 2013, with the budget deficit growing to 3.5tn roubles, or 6.4% of GDP, according to a crush-test by the experts from the High School of Economics. Russia’s GDP will shrink 5.9% year on year in 2013, with the budget deficit growing to 3.5tn roubles, or 6.4% of GDP, according to a crush-test by the experts from the High
Combat readiness is key to the US military’s ability to fight and meet the demands of the national military strategy – it isn’t easy to support a policy that increases the number of ships in the Navy, but it is difficult to construct a constituency to support the complex issue of military readiness due to its multidimensional nature and lack of natural supporters. For a state that builds ships, it is easy to support a policy that increases the number of ships in the Navy, but it is difficult to construct a constituency to support the complex issue of military readiness. To fight effectively, the armed forces must be manned, equipped, and trained to operate under dangerous, complex, uncertain, and austere conditions—often with little warning. They require the right personnel operating the right equipment with the right training to win. To fight effectively, personnel must train with their combat equipment, practicing their combat missions under realistic, demanding conditions—often with little
Boundaries are constructed through social processes that are contingent on narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent on narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent on narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region, and identity that are dependent upon narratives of nation, region
The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the defining public policy issue of the era. The environment is the
The US has no plans to remove Cuba from the list of countries that support terrorism – it’s a “scandalous concession to the communist government”
Seymour Hersh predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear escalation in the Middle East – he predicts a nuclear 
Latin America is a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a model for a post-American world – it’s a
The NSA has around 35,000 employees across the country, and trying to compete against tech companies to recruit employees from leading universities is proving difficult – the NSA has around 35,000 employees across the country, and trying to compete against tech companies to recruit employees from leading universities is proving difficult – the NSA has around 35,000 employees across the country, and trying to compete against tech companies to recruit employees from leading universities is proving difficult – the NSA has around 35,000 employees across the country, and trying to compete against tech companies to recruit employees from leading universities is proving difficult – the NSA has around 35,000 employees across the country, and trying to compete against tech companies to recruit employees from leading universities is proving difficult – the NSA has around 35,000 employees across the country, and trying to compete against tech companies to recruit employees from leading universities is proving difficult – the NSA has around 35,000 employees across the country, and trying
PFTAs are key to US hegemony – they will increase US gains from trade and increase the overall growth rates enjoyed by the US and its friends – it’s the sine qua non for maintaining US primacy in a competitive international system
The Hodel v. Virginia Surface Mining case proves that Congress has Commerce Clause authority to regulate wholly intrastate commercial activities, specifically mining and lumber production for interstate commerce. The Hodel v. Virginia Surface Mining case proves that Congress has Commerce Clause authority to regulate wholly intrastate commercial activities, specifically mining and lumber production for interstate commerce. The Hodel v. Virginia Surface Mining case proves that Congress has Commerce Clause authority to regulate wholly intrastate commercial activities, specifically mining and lumber production for interstate commerce. The Hodel v. Virginia Surface Mining case proves that Congress has Commerce Clause authority to regulate wholly intrastate commercial activities, specifically mining and lumber production for interstate commerce. The Hodel v. Virginia Surface Mining case proves that Congress has Commerce Clause authority to regulate wholly intrastate commercial activities, specifically mining and lumber production for interstate commerce. The Hodel 
Sediment from one logging area or pesticide residue from a particular farm can be indistinguishable from other local sources of nonpoint source pollution, complicating efforts to set specific pollution limits or mandate stream protection measures in a given watershed or region. The EPA has proposed several methods to states for making TMDL allocations among the various nonpoint source polluters, none of these methods make it politically palatable for a state to place its head into the jaws of a public utility, a chemical plant, or [a] local farmer to establish permit limits.
The aff’s view of China as a potential enemy Other creates a reductive view of China as a rising power – the aff’s view of China as a lawless bully, a cheat incapable of learning international norms of acceptable behavior, and the aff’s view of China as a lawless bully, a thief, and a cheat incapable of learning international norms of acceptable behavior – the aff’s view of China as a rising power – the aff’s view of China as a lawless bully, a thief, and a cheat incapable of learning international norms of acceptable behavior – the aff’s view of China as a rising power – the aff’s view of China as a lawless bully, a thief, and a cheat incapable of learning international norms
Foreign investment in the U.S. creates competitive pressure on U.S. firms to upgrade technologies, management practices, quality control procedures, and offer channels of learning for imitation by U.S. firms
Creating jobs is key to economic growth – it’s the only way to make the world a better place to live – it’s the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to make the world a better place to live – the only way to
U.S.-Chinese Track 1.5/2 talks are key to US-Chinese relations – they create lexicons, allow each side to explain its anxieties about the other’s positions and behavior, identify and attempt to mitigate misperceptions, keep talks going on sensitive subjects in unofficial channels when they are frozen at the official level, provide a venue to float trial balloons and seek ways to build confidence, and maintain professional relations with one’s foreign counterparts while remaining compliant with counterintelligence and export control rules and regulations can be difficult for participants to maintain long-term and continuing professional relations with one’s foreign counterparts while maintaining compliance with counterintelligence and export control rules and regulations can be difficult for participants to maintain long-term and continuing professional relations with one’s foreign counterparts while maintaining compliance with counterintelligence and export control rules and regulations can be difficult for participants to maintain long-term and continuing professional relations with one’
The state of American Indian education is a disaster – all other racial and ethnic subgroups of students make steady, if small, improvements in education outcomes, Native American youths, on the whole, stalled or lost ground.
Mexico is a strong partner to the United States and Canada – investment, innovation, and imagination are key to Mexico’s success
The second type of forecast — predicting the relative partisanship of the states — can be made with a reasonable amount of confidence, even this far out from the election. Florida has been between 1 and 4 points redder than the nation as a whole. That’s a state that will very likely vote a bit more Republican than the national average once again this year. And the states that are less consistent — think Hawaii, which was 11 points more Democratic-leaning than the nation as a whole in 2004 but 39 points bluer in 2012 — tend to be firmly entrenched in one party’s camp, so they are safe to handicap for a different reason.
U.S. technological superiority in the Asia-Pacific is eroding – China’s military modernization is key to achieving US political and military objectives in the areas that have traditionally been part of our defense umbrella, namely “challenges to [the United States’] military superiority in the crucial air, sea, space, and cyberspace domains, namely “challenges to [the United States’] military superiority in the crucial air, sea, space, and cyberspace domains, namely “challenges to [the United States’] military superiority in the crucial air, sea, space, and cyberspace domains, namely “challenges to [the United States’] military superiority in the crucial air, sea, space, and cyberspace domains, namely “challenges to [the United States’] military superiority in the crucial air, sea,
Democrats have an unexpected chance to make substantial gains in the House and state legislatures post-2020 if they can convince the Supreme Court to go along. It’s a long shot, to be sure, but it’s got a better chance of succeeding than some of their other options – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time machine – Jill Stein’s recount efforts or a time
Dems won’t take back the Senate – they’ll try to make Washington, DC, and Puerto Rico states try to abolish the Electoral College, add four justices to the Supreme Court, and create a “single-party system.”
IR is rooted in gendered, ethnocentric, and rooted not only in problems of war and peace, but also in the challenges posed by imperialism, including issues of race. We know that theory-building is a ’dreaded’ enterprise in many IR communities in the so-called ’periphery’ and ’non-West’, even if many of its key concepts (state, anarchy, security, power) do not exactly fit (Acharya and Buzan, 2010; Tickner and Blaney, 2012a; Tickner and Wver, 1998, 2007). We know that theory-building is a ’dreaded’ enterprise in many IR communities in the so-called ’periphery’ and ’non-West’, even if many of its key concepts (state, anarchy, security, power)
Trump would be incapable of the kind of thoughtful self-restraint we need from our president in times of crisis – he would respond with outsized contempt, indignation and blame, the “weapons” he constantly uses to annihilate his enemies
Biden is putting his foot on the gas pedal and moving ahead with his plans to sell an expansive infrastructure proposal this week as he faces mounting pressure to act on other legislative priorities that have become increasingly difficult to ignore. Biden has signaled a continued laser focus on defeating the coronavirus pandemic and boosting economic growth while also confronting intractable problems like gun control and immigration following two mass shootings that unfolded within days of each other, and an increase of migrants at the southern border. Biden has signaled a continued laser focus on defeating the coronavirus pandemic and boosting economic growth while also confronting intractable problems like gun control and immigration following two mass shootings that unfolded within days of each other, and an increase of migrants at the southern border. Biden has refused to let outside challenges usurp his scripted plans for the second phase of his “Build Back
The CPP is an attempt to turn states into field offices of the federal government – the EPA coerces states to do so by telling them, “Implement our regulations for us, or we’ll do it ourselves, and your constituents will be sorry. This is the hammer behind the CPP – the federalism enshrined in our Tenth Amendment is nothing new. Much of the battle over Obamacare turned on the attempt to force Medicaid expansion on the states, which the Supreme Court deemed a violation of the Tenth Amendment. However, with the CPP, the EPA is attempting to take federal control of states to a whole new level – perhaps hoping that the states will meekly comply rather than calling its bluff by challenging a rule based on very questionable statutory authority. One such scheme is the Clean Air Act, which allows the states to issue federal permits
The U.S. Navy has a 2.6 to 1 advantage over China – a war with China would destroy both economies and destroy US hegemony – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies – a war with China would destroy both economies 
Democracy is a form of religion, and no one with a spark of reason in him will sit down fatalistically before the croaker’s picture. 
The EPA’s power to regulate pollution in the mid-Atlantic estuary is withheld from the EPA in the Clean Water Act. The EPA’s power to regulate pollution in the mid-Atlantic estuary is withheld from the EPA in the Clean Water Act. The EPA’s power to regulate pollution in the mid-Atlantic estuary is withheld from the EPA in the Clean Water Act. The EPA’s power to regulate pollution in the mid-Atlantic estuary is withheld from the EPA in the Clean Water Act. The EPA’s power to regulate pollution in the mid-Atlantic estuary is withheld from the EPA in the Clean Water Act. The EPA’s power to regulate pollution in the mid-Atlantic estuary is withheld from the EPA in the Clean Water Act.
Christian Zionism encapsulates a view of Islam which is commonly presented by leaders of American Christian Zionism, a subsection of American evangelical Christianity which emphasizes unwavering support for the nation of Israel. Reflecting the Orientalist tendency of constructing degrading monolithic caricatures of Islam and Muslims, these leaders construct essentialist depictions which play a powerful role in shaping Christian Zionist laypeople’s conceptions of Muslims in general and Palestinian Muslims in particular. Seeking to gauge Christian Zionism’s place within the landscape of American evangelical Christianity, it is difficult to determine the actual number of Christian Zionists in the United States. Shortly before his death in 2007, Christian Zionist pastor Jerry Falwell claimed that this figure exceeded 100 million, but Norton Mezvinsky claims that the number in 2009 was probably in the range of 50-60 million
Using the term “aboriginal peoples” or some similar term is more inclusive than applying the Indian Act’s definition and avoids the controversial history and current status of that act. Using the term “aboriginal peoples” or some similar term is more inclusive than applying the Indian Act’s definition and avoids the controversial history and current status of that act. Using the term “aboriginal peoples” or some similar term is more inclusive than applying the Indian Act’s definition and avoids the controversial history and current status of that act. Using the term “aboriginal peoples” or some similar term is more inclusive than applying the Indian Act’s definition and avoids the controversial history and current status of that act. Using the term “aboriginal peoples” or some similar term is more inclusive than applying the Indian Act’s definition and avoids the controversial history and current status of that act. Using the term “
Places Far from Ellesmere teaches pleasure, the pleasure of oblivion, pleasure endorsed, its doors thrown wide. To fully comprehend the Arctic depends on one’s readiness to integrate, in one’s mind, what he another place calls the “external landscape” and the “internal landscape” (confer Lopez’ essay “Landscape and Narrative ”), which is to say one’s willingness to integrate, in one’s mind, what he another place calls the “external landscape” and the “internal landscape” (confer Lopez’ essay “Landscape and Narrative ”), which is to say one’s willingness to be open to, and mediate between, one’s physical sensation of the manyfaceted phenomena in the environment itself and one’s preconceptions of the land that stem from one’s own experience and one’s
Baja California loses 1.938 million personal trips a year that may result in about $118 million in net revenues, after adjusting for the revenue gains due to local foregone trips to the US. The retail and food and lodging sectors represent 80% of net revenue losses. Over half a million of potential working hours in Mexico are spent in delays at the border, which may result in $10.8 million in productivity loss. The impact at the national level is similar to the regional level as most of the personal trips are regional. At today’s level of delay at the border (about 45 minutes per crossing on average based on the survey respondents), San Diego County loses 8.414 million personal trips a year, resulting in an estimated $1.28 billion in lost business income. The impact is considered a net impact as the estimation adjusts for all the gains made when the expenditures occur in the US rather than in Mexico as people choose not to cross
Ebola has a higher “terror factor” than anthrax and smallpox
Russia withdraws key defense advisers from Venezuela, embarrassing Maduro
The Court doesn’t rule out a federal forum for climate change claims based on source-state law – state courts aren’t limited by the federal courts’ requirement of a case or controversy, or the doctrine of justiciability, even when the state courts address issues of federal law – state courts aren’t limited by the federal courts’ requirement of a case or controversy, or the doctrine of justiciability, even when the state courts address issues of federal law – state courts aren’t limited by the federal courts’ requirement of a case or controversy, or the doctrine of justiciability, even when the state courts address issues of federal law – state courts aren’t limited by the federal courts’ requirement of a case or controversy, or the doctrine of justiciability, even when the state courts address issues of federal law – state courts aren’t limited by the federal courts’ requirement of a
The Black Swan is a code word used by Odyssey Marine Exploration, Inc., an American salvage company, to describe a colonial period site in international waters off the coast of Spain. The Black Swan is a code word used by Odyssey Marine Exploration, Inc., an American salvage company, to describe a colonial period site in international waters off the coast of Spain. The Black Swan is a code word used by Odyssey Marine Exploration, Inc., an American salvage company, to describe a colonial period site in international waters off the coast of Spain. The Black Swan is a code word used by Odyssey Marine Exploration, Inc., an American salvage company, to describe a colonial period site in international waters off the coast of Spain. The Black Swan is a code word used by Odyssey Marine Exploration, Inc., an American salvage company, to describe a colonial period site in international waters off
Exclusion is a political irresolvable conflict that resides right within the late-modern individual, the late-modern economy, and late-modern politics – it is a political irresolvable conflict that resides right within the late-modern individual, the late-modern economy, and late-modern politics that resides right within the late-modern individual, the late-modern economy, and late-modern politics that resides right within the late-modern individual, the late-modern economy, and late-modern politics that resides right within the late-modern individual, the late-modern economy, and late-modern politics that resides right within the late-modern individual, the late-modern economy, and late-modern politics that resides right within the late-modern individual, the late-modern economy, and late-modern politics that resides right within the late-modern individual, the late-modern economy, and late-modern politics that resides
The US has strong spill-response agreements with Canada, Mexico and Russia, causing some in the field to suggest that the US “make sure Cuba has the same safeguards and rigorous oversight,” causing some in the field to suggest that the US “make sure Cuba has the same safeguards and rigorous oversight,” causing some in the field to suggest that the US “make sure Cuba has the same safeguards and rigorous oversight,” causing some in the field to suggest that the US “make sure Cuba has the same safeguards and rigorous oversight,” causing some in the field to suggest that the US “make sure Cuba has the same safeguards and rigorous oversight,” causing some in the field to suggest that the US “make sure Cuba has the same safeguards and rigorous oversight,” causing some in the field to suggest that the US “make sure Cuba has the same safeguards and rigorous oversight,” causing some in the field to suggest that the US “make
The web of international legal rules and institutions to enforce international law is not strong enough to prevent Russia from intervening militarily in Ukraine. It’s a mistake to dismiss the role of international institutions in preventing Russia from intervening militarily in Ukraine. It’s a mistake to dismiss the role of international institutions in preventing Russia from intervening militarily in Ukraine. It’s a mistake to dismiss the role of international institutions in preventing Russia from intervening militarily in Ukraine. It’s a mistake to dismiss the role of international institutions in preventing Russia from intervening militarily in Ukraine. It’s a mistake to dismiss the role of international institutions in preventing Russia from intervening militarily in Ukraine. It’s a mistake to dismiss the role of international institutions in preventing Russia from intervening militarily in Ukraine. It’s a mistake to dismiss the role of international institutions in preventing Russia from intervening militarily in
Capitalism is the state’s ultimate sanction and means of coercion – heinous crime is a result of the demoralizing and brutalizing conditions under which many people are forced to live in a capitalist society. Capitalism is the result of the demoralizing and brutalizing conditions under which many people are forced to live in a capitalist society. Capitalism is the result of the demoralizing and brutalizing conditions under which many people are forced to live in a capitalist society. Capitalism is the result of the demoralizing and brutalizing conditions under which many people are forced to live in a capitalist society. Capitalism is the result of the demoralizing and brutalizing conditions under which many people are forced to live in a capitalist society. Capitalism is the result of the demoralizing and brutalizing conditions under which many people are forced to live in a capitalist society
The National Strategic and Critical Minerals Production Act was passed 246 to 178, with just 15 Democrats in favor. The act would give federal agencies a maximum 30 months to decide on whether to approve or reject permits for exploration and mining, and it limits the ability of opponents to use courts to stop mining. The act was passed 246 to 178, with just 15 Democrats in favor. The act would give federal agencies a maximum 30 months to decide on whether to approve or reject permits for exploration and mining, and it limits the ability of opponents to use courts to stop mining. The act would give federal agencies a maximum 30 months to decide on whether to approve or reject permits for exploration and mining, and it limits the ability of opponents to use courts to stop mining. The act would give federal agencies a maximum 30 months to decide on whether to approve or reject permits for exploration and mining, and it limits the ability of opponents to use courts to stop mining.
DeVos moves quickly to implement President-elect Trump’s plan to use $20 billion of federal funds for block grants to states to support vouchers for poor children to attend private schools. DeVos moves quickly to implement President-elect Trump’s plan to use $20 billion of federal funds for block grants to states to support vouchers for poor children to attend private schools. DeVos moves quickly to implement President-elect Trump’s plan to use $20 billion of federal funds for block grants to states to support vouchers for poor children to attend private schools. DeVos moves quickly to implement President-elect Trump’s plan to use $20 billion of federal funds for block grants to states to support vouchers for poor children to attend private schools. DeVos moves quickly to implement President-elect Trump’s plan to use $20 billion of federal funds for block grants to states to support vouchers for poor children to attend private schools.
Trump won’t accept a narrow defeat – he can build a “stolen election” narrative based on the doubts he has already seeded about voting by mail and his frequent false statements about voting by non-citizens. 
Neoliberalism is the ideology that promotes its own brand of capitalist restructuring; that which we call globalization. It continues along a line of thinking of knowledge, society and history, emphasizing rationality, scientific objectivity, essentialism and the linear directions of time, thought and development; and operates in rigid binaries of primitive–modern, black–white, man–woman, first world–third world, developed–underdeveloped. Neoliberalism continues along a line of thinking of knowledge, society and history, emphasizing rationality, scientific objectivity, essentialism and the linear directions of time, thought and development; and operates in rigid binaries of primitive–modern, black–white, man–woman, first world–third world, developed–underdeveloped. 
National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, National Marine Fisheries Service and Department of Commerce issued a “notice to terminate” the draft environmental impact statement Monday. A 7-year-old study on the potential environmental impact of Makah whaling is being ditched, the federal government announced. The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, National Marine Fisheries Service and Department of Commerce issued a “notice to terminate” the draft environmental impact statement Monday. This is the latest development in lengthy legal battles over the Makah tribe’s treaty right to hunt whales—and comes only days after the 13th anniversary of a Makah whaling crew legally killing a gray whale off Neah Bay. The agencies said they will start again, based on new evidence indicating what opponents call “resident” gray whales off the Washington coast may be a genetically distinct, smaller cetacean
The Thirteenth Amendment was a new beginning for the nation and a constructive means for enforcing its foundational principles of liberty and general wellbeing. The Thirteenth Amendment was both a new beginning for the nation and a constructive means for enforcing its foundational principles of liberty and general wellbeing. The Thirteenth Amendment was both a new beginning for the nation and a constructive means for enforcing its foundational principles of liberty and general wellbeing. The Thirteenth Amendment was both a new beginning for the nation and a constructive means for enforcing its foundational principles of liberty and general wellbeing. The Thirteenth Amendment was both a new beginning for the nation and a constructive means for enforcing its foundational principles of liberty and general wellbeing. The Thirteenth Amendment was both a new beginning for the nation and a constructive means for enforcing its
School choice programs don’t exist in rural areas – they don’t exist in the U.S. and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and don’t exist in rural areas and
The U.S. hasn’t seen this much innovation since the Industrial Revolution – 92 percent of innovation is concentrated in only 100 of the nation’s 360 metropolitan areas, home to 59 percent of U.S. residents
The use of icebreakers increases the number of bird and animal strikes and frightens animals, causing displacement and disrupting feeding schedules. The use of icebreakers increases the number of bird and animal strikes and frightens animals, causing displacement and disrupting feeding schedules. The use of icebreakers increases air traffic noise that may occur during transport of logistics supplies to the offshore installations and can frighten animals, causing displacement and disrupting feeding schedules. Whale hunters in northern Alaska report that they must travel farther offshore to find whales, a change attributed to the displacement of whales from nearshore areas by industrial noises. Whale hunters in northern Alaska report that they must travel farther offshore to find whales, a change attributed to the displacement of whales from nearshore areas by industrial noises up to 30 kilometres away. Whale hunters in northern Alaska report that they must travel farther offshore
The state secrets privilege is an inherent power of the executive branch and allows the government to refuse disclosure of military and state secrets which, if exposed, pose a reasonable danger of [*229] threatening the safety of the nation. The law should also be amended to give standing to any persons who have been overheard by FISA surveillance, or have a reasonable suspicion that they were overheard, to challenge the surveillance techniques and the evidence submitted to the FISA court in the application for FISA surveillance. n204 Such persons should be given an implied right of action to sue the government for infringing their right to privacy where the evidence submitted to the government was not sufficient to establish probable cause that the target of the surveillance had a connection with a foreign power. The burden of proof would be on the individual to disprove the government’s evidentiary support for the FISA surveillance.
In response to China’s A2AD challenges, the US Department of Defense developed the concept of “Air-Sea Battle”, now labelled Joint Concept for Access and Maneuver in the Global Commons, which would entail strikes on the Chinese mainland early in a conflict to eliminate China’s “kill chain” of radars, command-and-control centres, and missile sites. In response to China’s A2AD challenges, the US Department of Defense developed the concept of “Air-Sea Battle”, now labelled Joint Concept for Access and Maneuver in the Global Commons, which would entail strikes on the Chinese mainland early in a conflict to eliminate China’s “kill chain” of radars, command-and-control centres, and missile sites. Although the concept is controversial because of its escalatory potential, it helps to signal to both allies and potential adversaries that America’s extended de
TEDs won’t work because they’re clogged with seaweed and debris from the ocean bottom
The Tohono O’odham Indian reservation is key to drug trafficking – high unemployment rates and resentment of federal law enforcement make some young native Americans ready allies.
North Korea, the United States, and South Korea are good at avoiding escalation
Remittance is key to food security in Nepal
People don’t want their children to use profanity even if they do it themselves, and many parents believe that seeing profanity in books or hearing others swear encourages youngsters to do the same, especially if the act goes unpunished. Yet profanity appears in many worthwhile books, films and other materials for the same reasons many people use it in their everyday language–for emphasis or to convey emotion. As Shakespeare’s Hamlet says to the players, the purpose of drama is “to hold, as twere, the mirror up to nature.”
Wealthier districts tend to be located in suburban areas that are represented by powerful, typically fiscally conservative legislators, so there is political pressure against leveling down. The question would be whether this political pressure and the excuse of a court decision would give legislators the political cover to raise taxes in order to level poor schools up. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
U.S.-Cyprus relations are key to EU-NATO cooperation
There’s no shortage of farm workers in the U.S.
Russia offers to help Venezuela set up its own space industry, including a satellite launch site, as Prime Minister Vladimir Putin made his first visit to the South American country on Friday. Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez announced the offer by Russia hours before Mr. Putin arrived, saying officials would discuss the possibility of setting up a satellite launcher and a factory. He didn’t give details or say how much that might cost. Russian companies and Venezuelan officials said they plan to sign new agreements for energy projects in Venezuela, as well as industrial, commercial and agriculture projects. On Friday, a senior Russian oil executive said Russian companies and Venezuela will invest between $60 million and $80 million this year in Venezuela’s vast Orinoco heavy-crude belt. Petroleos de Venezuela SA, Venezuela’s state oil monopoly, and a Russian consortium, which includes state giant Rosneft OAO and private major Lukoil OAO
GOP candidates who oppose the nuclear deal can unwind it if they win the White House – they can use the president’s executive authority to reimpose sanctions on Iran and withdraw from panels involved in implementing the accord.
High-skilled immigrants should be analyzed as a separate labor market, since the high-skilled market is distinctively different from the low-skilled one. Studies that include workers of all skill levels typically find no net effect of immigration on native wages. Even papers that distinguish between high and low-skilled usually treat all high-skilled individuals as a homogeneous group. Disaggregate high-skilled workers by the type of their highest degree, because advanced degree holders in general command a higher wage than bachelor’s degree recipients. This more precise definition of education groups, along with the ability to control for additional individual characteristics than were available to previous studies, allows me to estimate a more accurate impact of immigration.
In the face of increasing state authoritarianism and crises, the multitude continues to develop its own democratic organisation. For many years, Hardt and Negri have advocated the use of new technologies to build the communication, connections and common of the multitude and help circulate its struggles. The largest barrier to democratic communication in contemporary society is the huge social disparities in relation to communication, the vast gulf between the communication rich and the communication poor. Many people do not have a telephone, let alone the internet. With little access to communication technology, their capacity to contest and challenge capitalist power is severely restricted.
Persecution, discrimination and stigma against actual, or perceived, ‘LGBTI’ persons are not simply heightened by the entrenching of distinct and identifiable categories... the policies advocated by Obama and Cameron, and in particular Cameron’s statement at the CHOGM, may reinforce and worsen persecution by encouraging accusations of neocolonialism... the policies advocated by Obama and Cameron, and in particular Cameron’s statement at the CHOGM, may reinforce and worsen persecution by encouraging accusations of neocolonialism... the policies advocated by Obama and Cameron, and in particular Cameron’s statement at the CHOGM, may reinforce and worsen persecution by encouraging accusations of neocolonialism... the policies advocated by Obama and Cameron, and in particular Cameron’s statement at the CHOGM
The court’s focus on noncontroversial cases was a sleepy term – there were only eight justices during most of the just-completed term, causing some cases to fizzle and keep others from materializing. Even Monday’s decision on Trump’s travel ban had unanimity of a sort. The court dropped a scheduled fight over transgender student access to bathrooms in public schools after the new administration changed a key Education Department policy. Even Monday’s decision on Trump’s travel ban had unanimity of a sort. The court dropped a scheduled fight over transgender student access to bathrooms in public schools after the new administration changed a key Education Department policy. The court’s focus on noncontroversial cases was a sleepy term – there were only eight justices during most of the just-completed term, causing some cases to fizzle and keep others from materializing.
Military militarization is a step-by-step process by which a person or a thing gradually comes to be controlled by the military or comes to depend for its well-being on militaristic ideas. Enloe believes militarization is harmful to a society, as it allows the military to exploit the resources of the society it claims to PROTECT by convincing it that the military’s actions are valuable, necessary, and even something to take pride in by convincing it that the military’s actions are valuable, necessary, and often even something to take pride in. Enloe believes militarization is harmful to a society, as it allows the military to exploit the resources of the society it claims to PROTECT by convincing it that the military’s actions are valuable, necessary, and often even something to take pride in by convincing it that the military’s actions are valuable, necessary, and often even something to take pride in by
By 2032, 90 percent of all students and subgroups will be proficient in English/language arts and math; by 2032, students in grades 3, 5, and 9 and high school graduates will meet four other percentage based goals; by 2032, students in grades 3, 5, and 9 and high school graduates will meet four other percentage based goals; by 2032, students in grades 3, 5, and 9 and high school graduates will meet four other percentage based goals; by 2032, students in grades 3, 5, and 9 and high school graduates will meet four other percentage based goals; by 2032, students in grades 3, 5, and 9 and high school graduates will meet four other percentage based goals; by 2032, students in grades 3, 5, and 9 and high school graduates will meet four other percentage based goals; by 2032, students in grades 3, 5, and 9 and high school graduates will meet four other percentage based goals; by 2032, students in grades 3,
The plan creates a tangled web of bureaucratic bureaucracy that creates new regulations on lands adjacent to rivers and watersheds that drain into the ocean, creating a maze of real or de facto regulation for businesses to attempt to navigate.
The aff’s dystopian representation of politics is a pervasive sense of futility, possibly even inevitability, which could slowly have an impact on young people’s perception of politics and our expectations in the real world. 
Second-last African region under Hybrid War is the Failed State Belt of South Sudan and the Central African Republic (CAR), which together form a black hole of chaos in the North-Central part of the continent. These states weren’t always the disorderly and dysfunctional, but were made so because of covert American interference into their affairs, Ethiopia and Nigeria, all while passing through resource-rich areas along the way, Ethiopia and Nigeria, all while passing through resource-rich areas along the way, Ethiopia and Nigeria, all while passing through resource-rich areas along the way, Ethiopia and Nigeria, all while passing through resource-rich areas along the way, Ethiopia and Nigeria, all while passing through resource-rich areas along the way, Ethiopia and Nigeria, all while passing through resource-rich areas along the way, Ethiopia and Nigeria, all while passing through resource-rich areas along the way, Ethiopia and Nigeria, all while passing through resource-rich areas along the
The Law of the Sea Treaty would do irreparable harm to US military and intelligence operations and would create a system for resolving disputes lying outside the jurisdiction of the US legal system, leaving American citizens and businesses at the mercy of international tribunals whose members are not necessarily adherents to Western political or legal traditions and who may not hail from democratic nations.
UNCLOS attempts to restrict access to the deep seabed and infringes on the intrinsic rights of the United States and other nations that have chosen to remain non-parties. 
Denial of service attacks, data and property destruction, business disruption, and theft of proprietary data, intellectual property, and sensitive financial and strategic information cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109 billion in 2016. Cyberattacks and cyber theft cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109 billion in 2016. Cyberattacks and cyber theft cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109 billion in 2016. Cyberattacks and cyber theft cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109 billion in 2016. Cyberattacks and cyber theft cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109 billion in 2016. Cyberattacks and cyber theft cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109 billion in 2016. Cyberattacks and cyber theft cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109 billion in 2016. Cyberattacks and cyber theft cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109 billion in 2016. Cyberattacks and cyber theft cost the US economy between $57 billion and $109
Trump is a great negotiator who would persuade other countries to open their markets to US products – he is a great negotiator who would persuade other countries to open their markets to US products – he is a great negotiator who would persuade other countries to open their markets to US products – he is a great negotiator who would persuade other countries to open their markets to US products – he is a great negotiator who would persuade other countries to open their markets to US products – he is a great negotiator who would persuade other countries to open their markets to US products – he is a great negotiator who would persuade other countries to open their markets to US products
The subject achieves autonomy through the process of rejecting improper and unclean elements that are reminiscent of his/her initial fusion with the maternal body. Hence, the separation of the child from the mother takes place through the semiotic aspect of language. The abject has only one quality of the object – that of being opposed to I. If the object, however, through its opposition, settles me within the fragile texture of a desire for meaning, which is ceaselessly and infinitely homologous to it, what is abject, on the contrary, the jettisoned object is radically excluded and draws me toward the place where meaning collapses. The subject is caught in the desire for the original object (the mother), which structurally speaking, occupies the position of death. On the other hand, the subject anxiously desires satisfaction, which is associated with life. The subject is also constituted through its struggle against separation, developing an endless
The rice trade is small – only six to seven percent of global rice production is traded in international markets, well below the 20 per cent of wheat traded, 11 per cent of corn, and 35 per cent of soybeans.
The U.S. and China are developing dual-use capabilities that have both military and nonmilitary uses and are key to on-orbit satellite servicing, refueling, repairs, formation flying, and the ability to actively remove large space debris. TCBMs are a means by which governments can share information on space policies, information exchange, and notifications related to outer space activities, risk reduction notifications, and contact and visits to space launch sites and facilities. TCBMs are a means by which governments can share information on space policies, information exchange, and notifications related to outer space activities, risk reduction notifications, and contact and visits to space launch sites and facilities. TCBMs are a means by which governments can share information on space policies, information exchange, and notifications related to outer space activities, risk reduction notifications, and contact and visits to space launch sites and facilities. TCBMs are a means by which governments can share information
Hillary Clinton would defeat Trump if the election were held today, heading to a relatively easy victory even if Trump were to win the key battleground state of Ohio. The poll, taken between April and early July, surveyed nearly 60,000 registered voters in all 50 states and the District of Columbia, a large enough sample to make a complete estimate of Electoral College results as the presidential race stands now. The poll, taken between April and early July, surveyed nearly 60,000 registered voters in all 50 states and the District of Columbia, a large enough sample to make a complete estimate of Electoral College results as the presidential race stands now. The poll, taken between April and early July, surveyed nearly 60,000 registered voters in all 50 states and the District of Columbia, a large enough sample to make a complete estimate of Electoral College results as the presidential race stands now.
Israel racializes Palestinian citizens and occupied, besieged and diasporic Palestinians as non-Jews/whites while justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-defence by justifying their racialization in terms of self-de
Trump pushed back against Saudi Arabia over the disappearance and likely killing of Washington Post contributor Jamal Khashoggi, saying the Saudis have pledged to buy $110 billion of military equipment from the United States. Trump pushed back against sanctions over the disappearance and likely killing of Washington Post contributor Jamal Khashoggi, saying the Saudis have pledged to buy $110 billion of military equipment from the United States. Trump pushed back against sanctions over the disappearance and likely killing of Washington Post contributor Jamal Khashoggi, saying the Saudis have pledged to buy $110 billion of military equipment from the United States. Trump pushed back against sanctions over the disappearance and likely killing of Washington Post contributor Jamal Khashoggi, saying the Saudis have pledged to buy $110 billion of military equipment from the United States. Trump pushed back against sanctions over the disappearance and likely killing of Washington Post contributor Jamal Khashoggi, saying the Saudis
Governments, including the United States, have increasingly found themselves subjected to claims under investment treaties... when governments promise investors substantive rights and a forum for vindicating violations of those rights, governments create risks... when governments promise investors substantive rights and a forum for vindicating violations of those rights, governments create risks... when governments promise investors substantive rights and a forum for vindicating violations of those rights, governments create risks... when governments promise investors substantive rights and a forum for vindicating violations of those rights, governments create risks... when governments promise investors substantive rights and a forum for vindicating violations of those rights, governments create risks... when governments promise investors substantive rights and a forum for vindicating violations of those rights, governments create risks...
On the opposing side, something that could gather the energy necessary for interstellar travel might be weaponized, and this could—imaginably—create political opposition to interstellar travel. [ ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Debt-credit relationships define the production and exchange of goods according to a speculative logic transforming, that is, the use value of goods in veritable potential financial assets that generate surplus value. The demand, and the indebtedness it implies, for a financialized use value, induces further increases in demand precisely in virtue of the increase of the price of that good. This fully contradicts the law of supply and demand typical of neoclassical theory where an increase in price reduces demand. After the ascendant phase of the economic cycle, when the inflated prices of financialized goods begin to diminish for lack of new buyers, the contradiction between debt levels and prices of financial assets can both increase and decrease violently explode. This triggers a selloff of financial assets in order to be able to cover the debt contracted, a selloff that in turn causes a further reduction in prices and therefore more selling.
Capitalism needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – white-collar crime is a rational response to the desire to gain some of the goods unequally distributed throughout the society. Capitalism needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to be restructured to emerge from the crisis – it needs to
The “Pivot” to the Asia-Pacific is not a new perspective, nor is it aimed at achieving anything substantially different. It is the fulcrum of US efforts to maintain its economic growth, strategic influence and competitive edge in all spheres. It is the fulcrum of US efforts to maintain its economic growth, strategic influence and competitive edge in all spheres. It is the fulcrum of US efforts to maintain its economic growth, strategic influence and competitive edge in all spheres. It is the fulcrum of US efforts to maintain its economic growth, strategic influence and competitive edge in all spheres. It is the fulcrum of US efforts to maintain its economic growth, strategic influence and competitive edge in all spheres. It is the fulcrum of US efforts to maintain its economic growth, strategic influence and competitive edge in all spheres. It is the fulcrum
Biodiversity hotspots don’t overlap on a global scale – only 16 percent of mammalian species are common to all three forms of hotspots
Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania have little to offer in terms of military capabilities – a Russian offensive would overrun their defenses in three days
China is the largest producer and consumer of steel in the world
The U.S. must use all elements of its power to build a rules-based international system that can advance our own interests by serving mutual interests and providing credible reassurance that it will follow the rules itself, that it will not use its military and technological advantages in ways that harm others’ interests, and that it will support international governance arrangements that give others a meaningful voice in decisions that affect their security, prosperity, and way of life. Space is key to US military, economic, and technological predominance – it serves functions of vitally important for high-tech military operations, electronic financial transactions, power-grid operations, and countless other aspects of life in the information age. 
A US withdrawal from the doctrine of extended nuclear deterrence would open the floodgates to a serious reconsideration of Japan’s nuclear identity
STEM participation is key to STEM success – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes – there is no correlation between STEM participation and student outcomes 
For the third consecutive year, regulatory changes and increased cost of compliance remain the top concern for all oil and gas companies in their 10-K filings, according to BDO’s annual analysis of risk factors. This year, hydraulic fracturing (fracking) regulation entered the top 20 risks cited by oil and gas companies for the first time, with 85 percent of companies listing it as a threat to operations. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Common Core costs up to $10 billion up front, then as much as $800 million per year for the first seven years that the controversial program is up and running. It’s a fair amount of money given a lot of jurisdictions did not realize what would occur down the road – just looking at the cost aspect, it was not focused at the time, so a lot of jurisdictions did not realize what would occur down the road – just looking at the cost aspect, it was not focused at the time, so a lot of jurisdictions did not realize what would occur down the road – just looking at the cost aspect, it was not focused at the time, so a lot of jurisdictions did not realize what would occur down the road – just looking at the cost aspect, it was not focused at the time, so a lot of jurisdictions did not realize what would occur down the road – just looking at the cost aspect, it
We need a more inclusive organization of black and white people fighting against white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white supremacist white
The “cyber” in cyber capitalism is key to a “money-economy” that destroys the “real economy” of the production of goods and services and destroys the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-retreat” of the “techno-re
“You must vote,” I often hear, “because the next president will pick who sits on the Supreme Court!” That such a statement should even be made tells us that something has gone seriously wrong with our democracy. 
Pragmatism isn’t a panacea for environmental policymaking – it’s a self-conscious focus on experiential learning and experimentation and its rejection of fixed, abstract notions of right and wrong, while flexible and useful in some contexts, may also fall into what the editors of the Renaissance Symposium call “the quicksand of relativism.”
Economic decline isn’t a cause of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t a determinant of war – economic decline isn’t 
Even a few hundred incoming warheads would overwhelm any plausible defense – the US has doubled investment in missile defense and accelerated research and development on a range of land, air, sea, and space-based missile defense systems. The US has doubled investment in missile defense and accelerated research and development on a range of land, air, sea, and space-based missile defense systems – the US has doubled investment in missile defense and accelerated research and development on a range of land, air, sea, and space-based missile defense systems – the US has doubled investment in missile defense and accelerated research and development on a range of land, air, sea, and space-based missile defense systems – the US has doubled investment in missile defense and accelerated research and development on a range of land, air, sea, and space-based missile defense systems – the US has doubled investment in missile defense
Agamben’s account of the “mystery of anomia” provides a crucial lens through which to read Agamben’s account of the distinction between real and fictitious states of exception. Agamben’s account of the “mystery of anomia” provides a crucial lens through which to read Agamben’s account of the distinction between real and fictitious states of exception. Agamben’s account of the “mystery of anomia” provides a crucial lens through which to read Agamben’s account of the distinction between real and fictitious states of exception. Agamben’s account of the “mystery of anomia” provides a crucial lens through which to read Agamben’s account of the distinction between real and fictitious states of exception.
The Obama administration is readying a “Fall Surprise” regarding its policy toward Cuba – it will ease restrictions on travel to Cuba and return to the “people-to-people” policies of the Clinton Administration.
State-sponsored offshore wind projects have a unique set of challenges including a patchwork of rules and permits, along with gaps in leasing, zoning, and fee structures for using the seabed. State-sponsored offshore wind projects have a unique set of challenges including a patchwork of rules and permits, along with gaps in leasing, zoning, and fee structures for using the seabed. State-sponsored offshore wind projects have a unique set of challenges including a patchwork of rules and permits, along with gaps in leasing, zoning, and fee structures for using the seabed. State-sponsored offshore wind projects have a unique set of challenges including a patchwork of rules and permits, along with gaps in leasing, zoning, and fee structures for using the seabed. State-sponsored offshore wind projects have a unique set of challenges including a patchwork of rules and permits, along with gaps in leasing, zoning
Edelman’s critique of futurity can be akin to a revolution without guarantees: an antinormativizing of political struggle that challenges how social norms are being reproduced at every turn. Edelman’s critique of futurity can be akin to a revolution without guarantees: an antinormativizing of political struggle that challenges how social norms are being reproduced at every turn. Edelman’s critique of futurity can be akin to a revolution without guarantees: an antinormativizing of political struggle that challenges how social norms are being reproduced at every turn. Edelman’s critique of futurity can be akin to a revolution without guarantees: an antinormativizing of political struggle that challenges how social norms are being reproduced at every turn. Edelman’s critique of futurity can be akin to a revolution without guarantees: an antinor
The IEA predicts that shale gas will account for 35% of all natural gas in 2035, up from 14% today. The IEA predicts that shale gas will account for 35% of all natural gas in 2035, up from 14% today. The IEA predicts that shale gas will account for 35% of all natural gas in 2035, up from 14% today. The IEA predicts that shale gas will account for 35% of all natural gas in 2035, up from 14% today. The IEA predicts that shale gas will account for 35% of all natural gas in 2035, up from 14% today. The IEA predicts that shale gas will account for 35% of all natural gas in 2035, up from 14% today. The IEA predicts that shale gas will account
NATO isn’t key to solve global security and food crises – it’s a negative influence across the Global South, an alliance dominated by white Western states committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to protecting their own security committed to
US-Mexico trade is key to US-Mexico competitiveness
S.B. 455, a measure related to pre-transfer status for military children, passed the Senate today with bipartisan unanimous support. S.B. 455, a measure related to pre-transfer status for military children, authored by Senator Josh Newman (D-Fullerton), passed the Senate today with bipartisan unanimous support. S.B. 455, a measure related to pre-transfer status for military children, authored by Senator Josh Newman (D-Fullerton), passed the Senate today with bipartisan unanimous support. S.B. 455, a measure related to pre-transfer status for military children, authored by Senator Josh Newman (D-Fullerton), passed the Senate today with bipartisan unanimous support. S.B. 455, a measure related to pre-transfer status for military children, authored by Senator Josh Newman (D-Fullerton),
It is a cardinal position in postmod- ernism to place under suspicion master narratives, universalism, and objectiv- ity on the grounds that they are partic- ular epistemological and moral dis- courses camouflaged under the guise of universal discourses. Enlightenment ideals are partic- ular epistemological and moral dis- courses camouflaged under the guise of universal discourses which are partic- ular epistemological and moral dis- courses camouflaged under the guise of universal discourses. Enlightenment ideals are partic- ular epistemological and moral dis- courses camouflaged under the guise of universal discourses which are partic- ular epistemological and moral dis- courses camouflaged under the guise
54% of the world’s population live within the OTEC belt, and 98 countries are a fit for OTEC systems. OTEC uses no fuel – so once you pay off the capital cost of building a plant, you’re producing electricity far cheaper than nuclear and fossil fuels, it’s much cleaner, and it runs forever. OTEC uses no fuel – so once you pay off the capital cost of building a plant, you’re producing electricity far cheaper than nuclear and fossil fuels, it’s much cleaner, and it runs forever. OTEC uses no fuel – so once you pay off the capital cost of building a plant, you’re producing electricity far cheaper than nuclear and fossil fuels, it’s much cleaner, and it runs forever. OTEC uses no fuel – so once you pay off the capital cost of building a plant, you’re producing electricity far cheaper than nuclear and fossil fuels
Post-Cold War migration is a prime example of the lifting of spatial constraints in an age of globalization. The state is at least threatened or challenged and at most is turned into a chimera – the very presence (without ’membership’) of irregular immigrants is a challenge to nationstate sovereignty – the very presence (without ’membership’) of irregular immigrants is a challenge to nationstate sovereignty – the very presence (without ’membership’) of irregular immigrants is a challenge to nationstate sovereignty – the very presence (without ’membership’) of irregular immigrants is a challenge to nationstate sovereignty – the very presence (without ’membership’) of irregular immigrants is a challenge to nationstate sovereignty – the very presence (without ’membership’) of irregular immigrants is a challenge to nationstate sovereignty – the very presence (without ’membership’)
Canada’s tar sands contain twice the amount of carbon dioxide emitted by global oil use in our entire history – more than 2.5 million years ago, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than it is now, when sea level was at least 50 feet higher than
As a one term governor of Georgia, Jimmy Carter had successfully reorganized that state’s modest bureaucracy and improved its budgetary performance. But the managerial magic he had worked in Georgia proved of limited use when, as president, Carter turned his attention to Washington’s bureaucratic behemoths, such as the Department of Health, Education, and Welfare.
The Internet is an opportunity for people around the world to exercise their rights to free expression and free association, but access to the Internet must become truly universal. The Internet offers enormous opportunity for people around the world to exercise their rights to free expression and free association, but access to the Internet must become truly universal. The Internet offers enormous opportunity for people around the world to exercise their rights to free expression and free association, but access to the Internet must become truly universal. The Internet offers enormous opportunity for people around the world to exercise their rights to free expression and free association, but access to the Internet must become truly universal. The Internet offers enormous opportunity for people around the world to exercise their rights to free expression and free association, but access to the Internet must become truly universal. The Internet offers enormous opportunity for people around the world to exercise their rights to free expression and free association, but access to the Internet must become truly universal. The Internet offers enormous opportunity for people around the world to exercise their rights
MLATs are critical tools used by U.S. law enforcement to cooperate with foreign law enforcement agencies. MLATs are critical tools used by U.S. law enforcement to cooperate with foreign law enforcement agencies. MLAT requests have traditionally been made in writing, and often take many months to transmit and still more time for the foreign law enforcement agency to execute. It will:  Creation of a standard, online form for use in requesting MLAT assistance. In the digital age, we should have a more efficient, online application system that would allow the status of MLAT requests to be tracked and ensure appropriate action is taken.  Improved transparency of requests and actions. The Department of Justice should publish annual statistics on requests made by and to foreign governments, particularly if the requests are for obtaining the contents of electronic communications that are stored in a foreign country.  Increased resources for the MLAT process. 
Declines in oil and gas have signaled a weaker economy in the U.S. and across the globe. Economists watch gas prices closely, as they consider anything above $4 a gallon the point at which costs start crimping consumer spending, which largely drives the U.S. economy. Economists watch gas prices closely, as they consider anything above $4 a gallon the point at which costs start crimping consumer spending, which largely drives the U.S. economy. Economists watch gas prices closely, as they consider anything above $4 a gallon the point at which costs start crimping consumer spending, which largely drives the U.S. economy. Economists watch gas prices closely, as they consider anything above $4 a gallon the point at which costs start crimping consumer spending, which largely drives the U.S. economy.
Social hierarchies of race, gender, and geopolitical location are enacted and enforced in intrusive and often violent ways through a form of prototypical white technomasculinity – a subject position interpreted as original, standard, and in no need of justification – surveillance can be perceived as unproblematic and even ’cool’
Land grabs fuel insurgency – China, South Korea, and Mozambique, Sudan, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Mozambique, Moz
Mexico doesn’t have the capacity to develop deepwater resources or the kind of shale gas and shale oil potential that exists here in the U.S. – they don’t have the capacity to develop deepwater resources or the kind of shale gas and shale oil potential that exists here in the U.S. – they don’t have the capacity to develop deepwater resources or the kind of shale gas and shale oil potential that exists here in the U.S. – they don’t have the capacity to develop deepwater resources or the kind of shale gas and shale oil potential that exists here in the U.S. – they don’t have the capacity to develop deepwater resources or the kind of shale gas and shale oil potential that exists here in the U.S. – they don’t have
Stein mischaracterizes disability as health-related conditions that might be expected to reduce welfare – he is guilty of submerging the individual into disability, assuming that all questions of welfare can be answered once we have a good grasp of the person’s health-resources requirements. He is guilty of submerging the individual into disability, assuming that all questions of welfare can be answered once we have a good grasp of the person’s health-resources requirements. He is guilty of submerging the individual into disability, assuming that all questions of welfare can be answered once we have a good grasp of the person’s health-resources requirements. He is guilty of submerging the individual into disability, assuming that all questions of welfare can be answered once we have a good grasp of the person’s health-resources requirements. He is guilty of submerging the individual into disability, assuming that
Chavez and Ahmadinejad support each other as members of an international outsider’s club
Natives cannot bear or secure arms in South Africa without a special license, whereas the whites could do so, according to the Defense Act of 1912. In West Africa, inhabitants of the British, French and Portuguese colonies are not allowed to bear arms or be found with any in their possession, whereas the white man could possess as many pistols or rifles as his pocket will allow. It is a felonious crime over there, but the white man could possess as many pistols or rifles as his pocket will allow. It is a felonious crime over there, but the white man could possess as many pistols or rifles as his pocket will allow. It is a felonious crime over there, but the white man could possess as many pistols or rifles as his pocket will allow. It is a felonious crime over there, but the white man could possess as many pistols or rifles as his pocket will allow
The aff’s language of equality and rights masks continued illiberal immigration policy and continued ambivalence about the merits of admitting the black labour, since blacks are still undesirable citizens. The aff’s language of equality and rights masks continued illiberal immigration policy and continued ambivalence about the merits of admitting the black labour, since blacks are still undesirable citizens. The aff’s language of equality and rights masks continued illiberal immigration policy and continued ambivalence about the merits of admitting the black labour, since blacks are still undesirable citizens. The aff’s language of equality and rights masks continued illiberal immigration policy and continued ambivalence about the merits of admitting the black labour, since blacks are still undesirable citizens. The aff’s language of equality and rights masks continued illiberal immigration policy and continued ambival
Extraction and refinement of oil sands are more GHG-intensive compared to conventional oil sands
Ebola isn’t a bioterror weapon, it’s a tool of mass destruction
Interstate disparities in educational standards and resources have little or no bearing on unequal opportunity and outcomes – a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship requires a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship – a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship requires a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship – a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship requires a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship – a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship requires a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship – a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship requires a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship – a federal commitment to educational adequacy for equal citizenship requires a federal commitment to educational a
Humanity wants to return to the moon and develop fusion power – the search for helium-3, fuel for the awaited-for fusion energy which is not possible to obtain on Earth, could be the principal motive for establishing a colony on our natural satellite. AAE president Miguel Gilarte Fernandez’s article asks, “Why Does Humanity Want to Return to the Moon?” – spread the news of the potential for mankind, within a few decades, to have access to “unimaginable” power, if we get to work on colonizing the moon and developing fusion power. His article was then picked up by other media. AAE president Miguel Gilarte Fernandez’s article asks, “Why Does Humanity Want to Return to the Moon?” – spread the news of the potential for mankind, within a few decades, to have access to “unimaginable” power, 
US-China dialogues generate hostility and skepticism – persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persuasion, persua
“It’s a little bit boring. It’s not as cool as drones over the border, but on the flipside — this is not risky business. We know we can save money. We know we can help,” said Paul Christman, president and CEO of Quest Software’s public sector subsidiary. “It’s a little bit boring. It’s not as cool as drones over the border, but on the flipside — this is not risky business. We know we can help,” said Paul Christman, president and CEO of Quest Software’s public sector subsidiary. “It’s a little bit boring. It’s not as cool as drones over the border, but on the flipside — this is not risky business. We know we can help,” said Paul Christman, president and CEO of Quest Software’s public sector subsidiary.
Relations between China and the U.S. are strong – there are over 90 mechanisms for dialogue, and last year the bilateral trade volume exceeded $520 billion, bilateral investment accounted for over $100 billion. There are 41 pairs of friendly provinces or states from both sides, and 202 sister cities. People-to-people exchanges exceeded 4 million every year – there are over 41 pairs of friendly provinces or states from both sides, and 202 sister cities. People-to-people exchanges exceeded 4 million every year – there are over 41 pairs of friendly provinces or states from both sides, and 202 sister cities. People-to-people exchanges exceeded 4 million every year – there are over 41 pairs of friendly provinces or states from both sides, and 202 sister cities. People-to-people exchanges exceeded 4 million every year – there are over 41 pairs of friendly provinces or states from both sides, and 202 sister
Insufficient communication between North and South based organizations is key to prevent neocolonialism
U.S.-Georgia conflict causes a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaust of unspeakable horror and a nuclear holocaus
We are living in the end times – our response can be characterised by ideological denial, anger, attempts at amelioration and compromise, depression and withdrawal. Our response can be characterised by ideological denial, anger, attempts at amelioration and compromise, depression and withdrawal. Our response can be characterised by ideological denial, anger, attempts at amelioration and compromise, depression and withdrawal. Our response can be characterised by ideological denial, anger, attempts at amelioration and compromise, depression and withdrawal. Our response can be characterised by ideological denial, anger, attempts at amelioration and compromise, depression and withdrawal. Our response can be characterised by ideological denial, anger, attempts at amelioration and compromise, depression and withdrawal. Our response can be characterised by ideological denial, anger, attempts at amelioration and compromise, depression and withdrawal. Our response can be characterised by ideological denial, anger, attempts at amelioration and compromise, depression and withdrawal
The process of communicating and interpreting the meaning of metaphors in business writing is deeply unreliable because of the structure of metaphors in which some of the characteristics of a source domain are transferred to a target domain. The process of communicating and interpreting the meaning of metaphors in business writing is deeply unreliable because of the structure of metaphors in which some of the characteristics of a source domain are transferred to a target domain. The process of communicating and interpreting the meaning of metaphors in business writing is deeply unreliable because of the structure of metaphors in which some of the characteristics of a source domain are transferred to a target domain. The process of communicating and interpreting the meaning of metaphors in business writing is deeply unreliable because of the structure of metaphors in which some of the characteristics of a source domain are transferred to a target domain. The process of communicating and interpreting the meaning of metaphors in business writing is
States scramble to land one of six FAA drone test sites hoping to get rich on the next tech bubble – Iraq has a growing fleet of manned and unmanned aerial vehicles that could be used to disperse chemical and biological weapons across broad areas. We’re concerned that Iraq is exploring ways of using these UAVs for missions targeting the United States. That was the first time many of us heard the term “unmanned aerial vehicles.” Ticking off a litany of bogus reasons for invading Iraq, Bush hoped we would collectively wet our pants in fear of unmanned drones over America unleashing death from above. This is now. Now, defense contractors want to get into the military drone export business. The FAA’s test site program as mandated by the FAA Modernization and Reform Act of 2012 requires the plan to provide the best methods to ensure the safe operation of civil unmanned aircraft systems and
US hegemony is not only geographical security but also influence and cultural hegemony – the hegemonic ruling class of a capitalist society has the power to influence and persuade the subordinated social classes to accept its values. The hegemonic ruling class of a capitalist society has the power to influence and persuade the subordinated social classes to accept its values – the hegemonic ruling class of a capitalist society has the power to influence and persuade the subordinated social classes to accept its values – the hegemonic ruling class of a capitalist society has the power to influence and persuade the subordinated social classes to accept its values – the hegemonic ruling class of a capitalist society has the power to influence and persuade the subordinated social classes to
Foreign policy is a boundary-producing political performance in which the spatial domains of inside/outside, self/other, and domestic/ foreign are constituted through the writing of threats as externalized dangers. This conception of the United States in which freedom, liberty, law, democracy, individualism, faith, order, prosperity, and civilization are claimed to exist because of the constant struggle with and often violent suppression of opponents said to embody tyranny, oppression, anarchy, totalitarianism, collectivism, atheism, and barbarism. This conception of the United States in which freedom, liberty, law, democracy, individualism, faith, order, prosperity, and civilization are claimed to exist because of the constant struggle with and often violent suppression of opponents said to embody tyranny, oppression, anarchy, totalitarianism, collectivism, atheism, and
Exploration isn’t just about walking into the woods a few hundred yards from home and planting tracks on a few square inches of ground that might never have been touched by human feet – it’s about more than walking into the woods a few hundred yards from home and planting tracks on a few square inches of ground that might never have been touched by human feet – it’s about more than walking into the woods a few hundred yards from home and planting tracks on a few square inches of ground that might never have been touched by human feet – it’s about more than walking into the woods a few hundred yards from home and planting tracks on a few square inches of ground that might never have been touched by human feet – it’s about more than walking into the woods a few hundred yards from home and planting tracks on a few square inches of ground that might never have been touched by human feet
Methane Hydrate Research and Development Act of 2000 will cease to be effective at the end of fiscal year 2005. These findings and recommendations are based on detailed consideration of the issues discussed above and the statement of Task. These findings and recommendations are based on detailed consideration of the issues discussed above and the statement of Task. These findings and recommendations are based on detailed consideration of the issues discussed above and the statement of Task. These findings and recommendations are based on detailed consideration of the issues discussed above and the statement of Task. These findings and recommendations are based on detailed consideration of the issues discussed above and the statement of Task. These findings and recommendations are based on detailed consideration of the issues discussed above and the statement of Task. These findings and recommendations are based on detailed consideration of the issues discussed above and the statement of Task. These findings and recommendations are based on detailed consideration of the issues discussed above and the statement of Task. These findings and recommendations are based on
Polar icebreakers perform a variety of missions supporting U.S. interests in polar regions. The Coast Guard’s two existing heavy polar icebreakers—Polar Star and Polar Sea—have exceeded their originally intended 30-year service lives. Polar Star was placed in caretaker status on July 1, 2006. Congress in FY2009 and FY2010 provided funding to repair it and return it to service for an additional 7 to 10 years of service. Polar Star was placed in caretaker status on July 1, 2006. Congress in FY2009 and FY2010 provided funding to repair it and return it to service for an additional 7 to 10 years of service. Polar Sea had suffered an unexpected engine casualty; the ship was unavailable for operation after that. The Coast Guard’s third polar icebreaker—Healy—entered service in 2000. Compared to Polar Star and Polar Sea, Healy has less icebreaking capability
Economic strength is a better predictor of violent conflict than military power
Latin American economies are resilient to global financial turbulence – low inflation, fiscal surpluses, a sound banking system, a large stock of international reserves, and the willingness of the world community to act as a lender of last resort by providing assistance to emerging markets – a key innovation in this episode of global financial turbulence was the readiness of the world community to act as an international lender of last resort by providing assistance to emerging markets. 
Papuans are not animals, aquiet agriculturist and swine-herd, with regular labour and permanent dwelling places and permanent dwelling places
The global economy has rebounded from the Great Recession – it was triggered by a financial crisis and the global nature of the crisis makes it extremely difficult for countries to export their way out of the problem – the global nature of the crisis makes it extremely difficult for countries to export their way out of the problem – the global nature of the crisis makes it extremely difficult for countries to export their way out of the problem – the global nature of the crisis makes it extremely difficult for countries to export their way out of the problem – the global nature of the crisis makes it extremely difficult for countries to export their way out of the problem – the global nature of the crisis makes it extremely difficult for countries to export their way out of the problem – the global nature of the crisis makes it extremely difficult for countries to export their way out of the problem – the global nature of the crisis makes it extremely difficult for countries to export their way out of the problem –
Most of the world’s protected marine areas are failing to protect aquatic life – no fish take, well enforced, established for longer than 10 years, larger than 100 square km and isolated by deep water or sand, no fish take, well enforced, established for longer than 10 years, larger than 100 square km and isolated by deep water or sand, no fish take, well enforced, established for longer than 10 years, larger than 100 square km and isolated by deep water or sand, no fish take, well enforced, established for longer than 10 years, larger than 100 square km and isolated by deep water or sand, no fish take, well enforced, established for longer than 10 years, larger than 100 square km and isolated by deep water or sand, no fish take, well enforced, established for longer than 10 years, larger than 100 square km and isolated by deep water or sand, no fish take
Tim Kaine is a swing state – he’s not a blue dog Democrat, but he’s a white guy, although he speaks good Spanish. If Mike Pence is a “generic Republican,” then Kaine is a “generic Democrat” – he’s young enough, at 58, that he could run for president himself in 2020 or 2024. He’s young enough, at 58, that he could run for president himself in 2020 or 2024. He’s young enough, at 58, that he could run for president himself in 2020 or 2024. He’s not especially liberal, but he’s no Blue Dog Democrat, either. He’s a white guy, although he speaks good Spanish. If Mike Pence is a “generic Republican,” then Kaine is a “generic Democrat
China’s dominance over the Indo-Pacific is a result of the US’s pacifism with China and the collapse of the rules-based order underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty-based law underpinned by adherence to international treaty
Data isn’t collected and stored at every opportunity – lack of interoperability, lack of metadata, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack of interoperability, lack
Globalization, cyber espionage, and cyber espionage make imitating state-of-the-art weapon systems impossible. 
The first volume of Capitalism and Schizophrenia postulates two filiations: an intensive and germinal one, and another that is extensive and somatic, with the latter being counterposed to alliance, the extensive principle that plays the role of the repressing representation of the representative of desire or germinal impulse. Now in A Thousand Plateaus, we find two alliances: the one dissected in Anti-Oedipus, which is internal to the socius and even to the masculine gender (primary collective homosexuality) and another, immanent to becoming, that is as irreducible to production and imaginary metamorphosis (mythic genealogy, animal filiation as to exchange and symbolic classification (exogamic alliance, totemism). Every becoming is an alliance. Which does not mean, once again, that every alliance is a becoming. There is extensive, cultural, and sociopoli
Foucault invites us to pay attention to the past and ongoing epistemic battles between competing power/knowledge frameworks that try to control a given field. Different fields or domains of discursive interaction contain particular discursive regimes with their particular ways of producing knowledge. In the battle between power/knowledge frameworks, some come on top and become dominant while others are displaced and become subjugated. Foucault’s methodology offers a way of exploiting that vibrant plurality of epistemic perspectives which always contains some bodies of experiences and memories that are erased or hidden in the mainstream frame works that become hegemonic after prevailing in sustained epistemic battles. What Foucault calls of experiencing and remembering that are pushed to the margins and rendered unqualified and unworthy of epistemic respect by prevailing and hegemonic discourses.
FOSTA allows prosecutors to pursue websites that host sex-trafficking ads and enables victims and state attorneys general to file lawsuits against those sites. 
Participatory research and contemporary feminism share a number of major underlying features centering on the analysis of political economy and praxis (Maguire, 1993). The notion of praxis challenges the theory-practice relationship and raises problems associated with value-free science. The term “praxis” originates from the Greek word prasso meaning “doing” and “acting,” in contrast with the theoretical designs of epistemology; the theoria 3 (Audi, 1995). Other researchers define praxis as a dialectical process of collective reflection and action so that each is informed by and changes through its relation with the other (Ristock & Pennell, 1996), and the joining of theory and action so that each is informed by and changes through its relation with the other (Ristock & Pennell, 1996), and the integration of knowing and doing (Kirby & McKenna
There is a massive, heretofore unknown, source of nitrogen in the xatmosphere that plants also feed on. This means there is a vastly larger supply of nitrogen in the xatmosphere that plants can absorb. This means there is a vastly larger supply of nitrogen in the xatmosphere that plants can absorb. This means there is a vastly larger supply of nitrogen in the xatmosphere that plants can absorb. This means there is a vastly larger supply of nitrogen in the xatmosphere that plants can absorb. This means there is a vastly larger supply of nitrogen in the xatmosphere that plants can absorb. This means there is a vastly larger supply of nitrogen in the xatmosphere that plants can absorb. This means there is a vastly larger supply of nitrogen in the xatmosphere that
Latin America isn’t violent and doesn’t pose a threat to international peace or stability – a strategy based on demand reduction, rather than supply, is the only way to reduce crime in Latin America
ISIS has enough money to buy a nuclear weapon from Pakistan and carry out an attack inside the US next year – it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s infinitely more possible now than it was just one year ago – it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’s the sum of all fears for Western intelligence agencies and it’
Cuba is on the list of State Sponsors of Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist Terrorist T
Government support isn’t based on competitive market results – it’s based on the entrepreneur who is most likely to meet political goals of legislators, and does the best job of convincing government officials of the superiority of his approach. Government support isn’t based on competitive market results – it’s based on the entrepreneur who is most likely to meet political goals of legislators, and does the best job of convincing government officials of the superiority of his approach, and does the best job of convincing government officials of the superiority of his approach, and does the best job of convincing government officials of the superiority of his approach, and does the best job of convincing government officials of the superiority of his approach, and does the best job of convincing government officials of the superiority of his approach, and does the best job of convincing government officials of the superiority of his approach, and does the best job of convincing government officials of the
The FBI is still keen on new features in future Hacking Team products, in particular those that target Tor, which has been used to host criminal activity, but is also widely used by activists to keep identities safe. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be able to catch the IP of their targets using TOR. They want to be
The US hasn’t retreated from its position as a global hegemonic power – the US isn’t retreating from its position as a global hegemonic power – the US isn’t retreating from its position as a global hegemonic power – the US isn’t retreating from its position as a global hegemonic power – the US isn’t retreating from its position as a global hegemonic power – the US isn’t retreating from its position as a global hegemonic power – the US isn’t retreating from its position as a global hegemonic power – the US isn’t retreating from its position as a global hegemonic power – the US isn’t retreating from its position as a global
We need to get prepared for a 4C rise – the idea that we could adapt to a 4C rise is absurd and dangerous – the climate system is already experiencing significant feedbacks, notably the summer melting of the Arctic sea ice, the release of billions of tonnes of methane – a greenhouse gas 70 times stronger than carbon dioxide over 20 years – captured under melting permafrost is already under way – the climate system is already experiencing significant feedbacks, notably the summer melting of the Arctic sea ice, the release of billions of tonnes of methane – a greenhouse gas 70 times stronger than carbon dioxide over 20 years – captured under melting permafrost is already under way – the climate system is already experiencing significant feedbacks, notably the summer melting of the Arctic sea ice, the release of billions of tonnes of methane – a greenhouse gas
Canada’s clean tech sector still has room to grow – a 1.8 per cent share of the market share for clean tech in China is key to Canada’s clean tech sector
Vermont’s “Schedules that Work Act,” introduced in Congress this summer, would require retailers to offer extra hours to current, part-time employees before hiring additional employees, and would require employers to pay workers for extra hours if their schedule is changed at the last minute. 
The Arctic Council is key to preventing conflict in the region – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve conflict in the region – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’s the only way to solve – it’
Obama’s plan to raise money for Sen. Mark Udall underscores the political risks for vulnerable Democrats of being linked to the increasingly unpopular president. Republicans quickly pounce on Udall’s plans, eager to link the incumbent to a president with sagging approval ratings, both nationally and in Colorado. Udall’s message to the president is clear: Help me rake in campaign cash behind closed doors, keep the media from capturing photos of us together, and avoid real Coloradans at all costs – said Alex Siciliano, a spokesman for Rep. Cory Gardner, Udall’s opponent in the November election. Udall’s message to the president is clear: Help me rake in campaign cash behind closed doors, keep the media from capturing photos of us together, and avoid real Coloradans at all costs – said Alex Siciliano, a spokesman for
The critique of scientific objectivity and the insistence on the inevitable “partiality” of knowledge can serve the purposes of climate deniers and young-Earth creationists quite nicely. That’s not because there was something fundamentally rotten at the core of philosophical antifoundationalism (whose leading American exponent, Richard Rorty, remained a progressive Democrat all his life), but it might very well have had something to do with the cloistered nature of the academic left. It was as if we had tacitly assumed, all along, that we were speaking only to one another, so that whenever we championed Jean-François Lyotard’s defense of the “hetereogeneity of language games” and spat on Jürgen Habermas’s ideal of a conversation oriented toward “consensus,” we assumed a strong consensus among us that anyone on the side
Retribution as just deserts is a resetting of the scales of justice by meting out a punishment that is commensurate with the crime and more focused on the relationship between the offender and the community at large. Retribution as just deserts is a resetting of the scales of justice by meting out a punishment that is commensurate with the crime and more focused on the relationship between the offender and the community at large. Retribution as just deserts is a resetting of the scales of justice by meting out a punishment that is commensurate with the crime and more focused on the relationship between the offender and the community at large. Retribution as just deserts is a resetting of the scales of justice by meting out a punishment that is commensurate with the crime and more focused on the relationship between the offender and the
The subject is linked to a particular site on the grid defined by an overlapping of one term from each pair. The body corresponds to a “site” on the grid defined by an overlapping of one term from each pair. The body corresponds to a “site” on the grid defined by an overlapping of one term from each pair. The body corresponds to a “site” on the grid defined by an overlapping of one term from each pair. The body corresponds to a “site” on the grid defined by an overlapping of one term from each pair. The body corresponds to a “site” on the grid defined by an overlapping of one term from each pair. The body corresponds to a “site” on the grid defined by an overlapping of one term from each pair. The body corresponds to a “site” on the grid defined by an overlapping of one term from each pair. The
Reclamation’s RAX is a line item in the facilities maintenance portion of the budget known as RAX (replacements, additions, and extraordinary maintenance) or else through the Safety of Dams Program.12 Some are directly funded by revenues from customers or other federal agencies (e.g., Bonneville Power Administration). RAX expenditures typically make up 4%-7% of Reclamation’s total appropriation.13 Notably, previous findings by the National Research Council indicated that there was no common quantifiable approach to prioritizing RAX across Reclamation’s regions and that inputs related to the program’s priorities were applied with varying consistency.15 Reclamation notes that it is addressing concerns with its RAX program in a number of ways, including analyzing past RAX expenditures, developing a quantifiable prioritization framework for O&M needs across
Decolonization is not a metaphor for other things we want to do to improve our societies and schools. Decolonization is not a metaphor for other things we want to do to improve our societies and schools. Decolonization is not a swappable term for other things we want to do to improve our societies and schools. Decolonization is not a metaphor for other things we want to do to improve our societies and schools. Decolonization is not a swappable term for other things we want to do to improve our societies and schools. Decolonization is not a metaphor for other things we want to do to improve our societies and schools. Decolonization is not a swappable term for other things we want to do to improve our societies and schools. Decolonization is not a metaphor for other things we want to do to improve our societies and schools.
Capitalism’s “non-economic” realms serve as enabling background conditions for its economy, the latter depends for its very existence on values and inputs from the former. Second, capitalism’s “non-economic” realms are part and parcel of capitalism, historically co-constituted in tandem with its economy, and marked by their symbiosis with it. Nevertheless, these realms are part and parcel of capitalism, historically co-constituted in tandem with its economy, and marked by their symbiosis with it. Nevertheless, these realms are part and parcel of capitalism, historically co-constituted in tandem with its economy, and marked by their symbiosis with it. Nevertheless, these realms are part and parcel of capitalism, historically co-constituted in tandem with its economy, and marked by their symbiosis with it. 
The APDRF is a special fund designed to provide quick-disbursing grants to ADB member countries impacted by a major natural disaster such as Typhoon Ketsana in the Philippines, earthquakes in Samoa and Indonesia in 2009, Mongolia’s dreaded snowy winter in 2010, and flood disasters in Fiji, Pakistan, Sri Lanka and Thailand in 2011. ADB used the APDRF to provide $3 million for emergency assistance to help Cambodia recover from devastating floods which have affected 1.7 million people, causing an estimated $1 billion in damage. ADB also approved two consecutive grants of $100,000 and $200,000 each from the APDRF for drought disaster response in the Marshall Islands. 72 Hours from Help The APDRF is designed to bridge the gap between existing ADB arrangements that assist member countries to reduce disaster risk through disaster risk management loans and grants, and longer-term post-disaster reconstruction lending
STEM education is key to economic growth and innovation
Displaced from the realm of drug control, the criminal justice approach to eliminating black markets has found a new home in the war on IP crime. The IPR Center self-identifies as an entity focused on interdiction, with a supply side focus borrowed from a bygone era in the war on drugs. The IPR Center self-identifies as an entity focused on interdiction, with a supply side focus borrowed from a bygone era in the war on drugs. The IPR Center self-identifies as an entity focused on interdiction, with a supply side focus borrowed from a bygone era in the war on drugs. The IPR Center self-identifies as an entity focused on interdiction, with a supply side focus borrowed from a bygone era in the war on drugs. The IPR Center self-identifies as an entity focused on interdiction, with a supply side focus borrowed from 
SUBSEABED DISPOSAL AND OCEAN DILUTION... Burial in the mud layer on the deep ocean floor, known as subseabed disposal, has long been considered by some to be a leading alternative to mined geologic repositories for the disposal of high level radioactive wastes (100-102); it could also be considered for the disposal of wastes incorporating excess weapon plutonium. Large areas of the abyssal muds have been geologically stable for millions of years and are thousands of miles from human population centers, and the properties of the mud itself would contain most radionuclides for hundreds of thousands if not millions of years
US biofuel policies don’t contribute to reducing global emissions – leakage through terms of trade effects nullifies the environmental gains arising from US biofuel policies
East and South Asia are key to US geopolitical success in the 21st century – economic growth, environmental progress, the destiny of democracy and success against terror are key to US geopolitical success in Asia. 
The Western Hemisphere is key to combating climate change
Food prices cause social unrest, not food riots
U.S. government policies are creating a boom-and-bust cycle of renewable energy investment, threaten a lead the nation regained over China for the technologies last year, the Pew Charitable Trusts said. Those funds trumped the $45.5 billion China allocated to renewables, for lead for the nation regained over China for the technologies last year, the Pew Charitable Trusts said. Those funds trumped the $45.5 billion China allocated to renewables, for lead for the nation regained over China for the technologies last year, the Pew Charitable Trusts said. Those funds trumped the $45.5 billion China allocated to renewables, for lead for the nation regained over China for the technologies last year, the Pew Charitable Trusts said. Those funds trumped the $45.5 billion China allocated to renewables, for lead for the nation
Inflation isn’t a threat to the economy – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t rising fast enough to stop the economy from spiraling out of control – wages aren’t
Empowering Women and Girls for Shared Prosperity is key to ending extreme poverty and boosting shared prosperity – the World Bank Group’s report shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are inextricably linked – it shows that gender equality and economic development are
Europe’s response to migration flows has been inadequate and inadvertently increased the terrorist threat dramatically
The movement to the North and West marked a radical temporal break from the Southern past and a psychic repudiation of slavery. The movement to the North and West marked a radical temporal break from the Southern past and a psychic repudiation of slavery. The movement to the North and West marked a radical temporal break from the Southern past and a psychic repudiation of slavery. The movement to the North and West marked a radical temporal break from the Southern past and a psychic repudiation of slavery. The movement to the North and West marked a radical temporal break from the Southern past and a psychic repudiation of slavery. The movement to the North and West marked a radical temporal break from the Southern past and a psychic repudiation of slavery. The movement to the North and West marked a radical temporal break from the Southern past and a psychic repudiation of slavery.
Critical international theory is key to emancipatory politics – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and social act – it’s an intellectual and
Cyber attacks are overrated – they’re perceived as catastrophic, fatal, uncontrollable, and uncontrollable – there’s a propensity to be disproportionally afraid of them – they’re perceived as catastrophic, fatal, unknown, and basically uncontrollable – there’s a propensity to be disproportionally afraid of them – there’s a propensity to be disproportionally afraid of them – there’s a propensity to be disproportionally afraid of them – there’s a propensity to be disproportionally afraid of them – there’s a propensity to be disproportionally afraid of them – there’s a propensity to be disproportionally afraid of them – there’s a propensity to be disproportionally afraid of them – there
(a) “Regulation” defined For the purpose of this section, the term “regulation” means any generally applicable rule, regulation, guideline, interpretation, or other requirement that— (1) is prescribed by the Secretary or the Department; and (2) has legally binding effect in connection with, or affecting, the provision of financial assistance under any applicable program, the term “regulation” means any generally applicable rule, regulation, guideline, interpretation, or other requirement that— (1) is prescribed by the Secretary or the Department; and (2) has legally binding effect in connection with, or affecting, the provision of financial assistance under any applicable program, the term “regulation” means any generally applicable rule, regulation, guideline, interpretation, or other requirement that— (1) is prescribed by the Secretary or the Department; and (2) has legally binding effect in connection with, or affecting, the provision of financial assistance under any applicable program, the term “regulation” means any generally applicable rule, regulation, guide
Miscalculation in the midst of a crisis is exacerbated by uncertainty over the message that one side is trying to convey to the other or overconfidence in the ability to control escalation. Miscalculation in the midst of a crisis is a particularly troubling possibility—one that could be heightened by uncertainty over the message that one side is trying to convey to the other or by overconfidence in the ability to control escalation. Miscalculation in the midst of a crisis is a particularly troubling possibility—one that could be heightened by uncertainty over the message that one side is trying to convey to the other or by overconfidence in the ability to control escalation. Miscalculation in the midst of a crisis is a particularly troubling possibility—one that could be heightened by uncertainty over the message that one side is trying to convey to the other or by overconfidence in the ability to control
“Climate change is an ethical issue – it involves the distribution of a scarce resource – the capacity of the atmosphere to absorb waste gases without producing consequences that no one wants.”
Peace requires a process of social and national emancipation, a progressive, democratic transformation of societies and the world bringing about equal rights and opportunities for all people, sovereign participation and mutually advantageous co-operation among nations. Peace requires a process of social and national emancipation, a progressive, democratic transformation of societies and the world bringing about equal rights and opportunities for all people, sovereign participation and mutually advantageous co-operation among nations. Peace requires a process of social and national emancipation, a progressive, democratic transformation of societies and the world bringing about equal rights and opportunities for all people, sovereign participation and mutually advantageous co-operation among nations. Peace requires a process of social and national emancipation, a progressive, democratic transformation of societies and the world bringing about equal rights and opportunities for all people, sovereign participation and mutually advantageous co-operation among nations.
Mexico’s oil industry is key to economic growth and stability
The chemical industry is key to combating the coronavirus – companies and leaders are stepping up to be a part of the solution, donating money and supplies, and creating new ways to continue operations, be it remotely or otherwise in some cases, to get the job done in the face of adversity, to get the job done in the face of adversity, or by remotely or otherwise in some cases, to get the job done in the face of adversity, to get the job done in the face of adversity, or by remotely or otherwise in some cases, to get the job done in the face of adversity, or by remotely or otherwise in some cases, to get the job done in the face of adversity, or by remotely or otherwise in some cases, to get the job done in the face of adversity, or by remotely or otherwise
STEM is an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s an under appreciated, and troubling, component of the US economy – it’s
The question is whether some persons must bear the cost for some elusive “overall social good”. The question is whether some persons must bear the inescapable cost for the sake of other persons. Robert Nozick, for example, argues that to use a person in this way does not sufficiently respect and take account of the fact that he is a separate person, that his is the only life he has. Robert Nozick, for example, argues that to use a person in this way does not sufficiently respect and take account of the fact that he is a separate person, that his is the only life he has. Robert Nozick, for example, argues that to use a person in this way does not sufficiently respect and take account of the fact that he is a separate person, that his is the only life he has. Robert Nozick, for example, argues that to use a
Federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply federal law – state courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply state law – federal courts bind other federal courts only when they interpret and apply
The Chinese government tinkers with economic and social reform and then applies successes to the rest of the country, while detecting problems and making adjustments to policies before they spread elsewhere.
Trump plans to sell more than $2 billion worth of tanks and other military equipment to Taiwan, US officials said on Thursday. The sale would add to tensions between the US and China, which are already clashing over trade, communications technology, and a military buildup in the Pacific region. The sale would be one of the largest to Taiwan in recent years by the US. The single costliest part of the package is 108 M1A2 Abrams tanks, the officials said, and the deal would also resupply some weapons, including portable anti-tank missile systems. The US does not give national recognition to Taiwan, a de facto independent island off the southeast coast of China that the Chinese Communist Party intends to bring back eventually under the control of Beijing, by force if necessary. The US does not give national recognition to Taiwan, a de facto independent island off the southeast coast of China that the Chinese Communist Party intends to bring back
Antimicrobial resistance is outpacing the development of new antimicrobial drugs – only two new classes of antibiotics have been discovered in the last three decades compared to 11 in the previous 50 years. Only two new classes of antibiotics have been discovered in the last three decades compared to 11 in the previous 50 years – only two new classes of antibiotics have been discovered in the last three decades compared to 11 in the previous 50 years – only two new classes of antibiotics have been discovered in the last three decades compared to 11 in the previous 50 years – only two new classes of antibiotics have been discovered in the last three decades compared to 11 in the previous 50 years – only two new classes of antibiotics have been discovered in the last three decades compared to 11 in the previous 50 years – only two new classes of antibiotics have been discovered in the last three decades compared to 11 in the previous 50 years – only
Biden is doing what the American people want before he moves on to enact as much legislation as he can, probably via the same kind of partisan power play that he utilized on the American Rescue Plan. Biden is doing what the American people want before he moves on to enact as much legislation as he can, probably via the same kind of partisan power play that he utilized on the American Rescue Plan. Biden is doing what the American people want before he moves on to enact as much legislation as he can, probably via the same kind of partisan power play that he utilized on the American Rescue Plan. Everyone is naturally worried about timing, particularly now that the Senate parliamentarian has thrown an apparent monkey wrench into Chuck Schumer’s plans to pass multiple budget-reconciliation bills this calendar year. For much of Biden’s agenda, in other words, the future is now.
The Water Treaty authorizes the IBWC to develop rules and to issue proposed decisions, called minutes, regarding matters related to the treaty’s execution and interpretation.24 Once issued, a proposed minute is forwarded within three days to the government of each country for approval.25 If neither country announces its disapproval within 30 days, the minute is considered adopted.26 If either country disapproves within 30 days, the matter is removed from IBWC control and the two governments negotiate the issue.27 If the two governments reach an agreement, the matter is removed from IBWC control and the two governments negotiate the issue.29 The Water Treaty authorizes the IBWC to develop rules and to issue proposed decisions, called minutes, regarding matters related to the treaty’s execution and interpretation.24 Once issued, a proposed minute is forwarded within three days to the government of each country for approval.25 If neither country announces its dis
Imperialism is linked to an invocation of a narcissistic assumption that the non-West could only be improved by becoming more like the West itself – the narcissistic assumption that the non-West could only be improved by becoming more like the West itself – the narcissistic assumption that the non-West could only be improved by becoming more like the West itself – the narcissistic assumption that the non-West could only be improved by becoming more like the West itself – the narcissistic assumption that the non-West could only be improved by becoming more like the West itself – the narcissistic assumption that the non-West could only be improved by becoming more like the West itself – the narcissistic assumption that the non-West could only be improved by becoming more like the West itself – the narcissistic
Boko Haram insurgency has persisted in the north-east for 10 years, leading to the loss of many lives and displacement of millions. The Boko Haram insurgency has persisted in the north-east for about 10 years, leading to the loss of many lives and displacement of millions. The Boko Haram insurgency has persisted in the north-east for about 10 years, leading to the loss of many lives and displacement of millions. The Boko Haram insurgency has persisted in the north-east for about 10 years, leading to the loss of many lives and displacement of millions. The Boko Haram insurgency has persisted in the north-east for about 10 years, leading to the loss of many lives and displacement of millions. The Boko Haram insurgency has persisted in the north-east for about 10 years, leading to the loss of many lives and displacement of
Theological pragmatism is an irrealist pragmatism that seeks to know and control'reality' only in the form of a manipulative potency within the kaleidoscope of purely human knowledge. 
The Saudi government deprives women of the right not only to act as their own guardian but also to be the legal guardian of their children during marriage and following divorce. Even if women succeed in getting a court to grant them physical custody of their children, the law automatically transfers legal and physical custody to fathers when boys are nine and girls are seven. Even if women succeed in getting a court to grant them physical custody of their children, the law automatically transfers legal and physical custody to fathers when boys are nine and girls are seven. Even if women succeed in getting a court to grant them physical custody of their children, the law automatically transfers legal and physical custody to fathers when boys are nine and girls are seven. Even if women succeed in getting a court to grant them physical custody of their children, the law automatically transfers legal and physical custody to fathers when boys are nine and girls are seven. Even if women succeed
Decolonization of the mind involves a fundamental emphasis on relationality—to ancestors, the natural world, other species, and more—against illusory individualizing, atomizing, and autonomous conceptions of selfhood and agency. Decolonization of the mind involves a fundamental emphasis on relationality—to ancestors, the natural world, other species, and more—against illusory individualizing, atomizing, and autonomous conceptions of selfhood and agency. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Artificial Intelligence isn’t just a threat – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of social manipulation – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction – it’s a weapon of mass destruction 
GHG levels have not stabilized but continue to grow, ecosystems and food production have not been able to adapt, and our heavy reliance on fossil fuels perpetuates “dangerous anthropogenic interference with the climate system.”
Enrique Pena Nieto wants ties with Canada to be a priority in the country’s foreign policy, rather than the on-again, off-again interest of two countries distracted by relations with the United States, Mexico’s ambassador says. Enrique Pena Nieto wants ties with Canada to be a priority in the country’s foreign policy, rather than the on-again, off-again interest of two countries distracted by relations with the United States, Mexico’s ambassador says. Enrique Pena Nieto wants ties with Canada to be a priority in the country’s foreign policy, rather than the on-again, off-again interest of two countries distracted by relations with the United States, Mexico’s ambassador says. Enrique Pena Nieto wants ties with Canada to be a priority in the country’s foreign policy, rather than the on-again, off-again interest of
Losing hurts twice as bad as winning – the US can be less assertive in international affairs because the world is not as dangerous a place as often claimed – Fettweis’s argument is based on a remark by sports figure Sparky Anderson that “losing hurts twice as bad as winning feels good” – a remark by sports figure Sparky Anderson that “losing hurts twice as bad as winning feels good” – a remark by sports figure Sparky Anderson that “losing hurts twice as bad as winning feels good” – a remark by sports figure Sparky Anderson that “losing hurts twice as bad as winning feels good” – a remark by sports figure Sparky Anderson that “losing hurts twice as bad as winning feels good” – a remark by sports figure Sparky Anderson that “losing hurts twice as bad
ExxonMobil is a key lobbying group in the oil industry
The dichotomy of power and politics is reflected in the disappearance of politics and the return to the operation of power independently of political contestation or engagement. The dichotomy of power and politics is reflected in the disappearance of politics and the return to the operation of power independently of political contestation or engagement. The dichotomy of power and politics is reflected in the disappearance of politics and the return to the operation of power independently of political contestation or engagement. The dichotomy of power and politics is reflected in the disappearance of politics and the return to the operation of power independently of political contestation or engagement. The dichotomy of power and politics is reflected in the disappearance of politics and the return to the operation of power independently of political contestation or engagement. The dichotomy of power and politics is reflected in the disappearance of politics and the return to the operation of power independently of political contest
There’s a need for a big budget to paint the future, to create those images. There’s a need for a big budget to paint the future, to create those images. And to me, when you engage in imagining the future, whether you know it or not, you are doing economics. You are doing demographics. You are doing demographics. I mean, one way or another, as soon as you create an image of an imaginary future that’s coming from your point of view, you’re saying this is how I think Washington, D.C. is going to look. Like in Minority Report, Steven Spielberg creates the image of Washington D.C. with these fat highways and traffic buzzing around and cars going up buildings. And he’s doing urban design and talking about government budgets. And then when we see that there’s no Latinos in Minority Report, he
(--) China can employ decoy mobile missile complexes, but countering decoys is routine in long-term military competition. (--) China can employ decoy mobile missile complexes, but countering decoys is routine in long-term military competition. (--) China can employ decoy mobile missile complexes, but countering decoys is routine in long-term military competition. (--) China can employ decoy mobile missile complexes, but countering decoys is routine in long-term military competition. (--) China can employ decoy mobile missile complexes, but countering decoys is routine in long-term military competition. (--) China can employ decoy mobile missile complexes, but countering decoys is routine in long-term military competition.
Agencies win at the Supreme Court more often – fewer than half of the cases are unanimous (six of thirteen), leaving a very small sample of nonunanimous decisions to analyze.
Prosecutors are not the only actors who affect the process by which individuals enter the criminal legal system – a police officer must decide whether to arrest that person for a crime. In the majority of circumstances, before a prosecutor can contemplate whether to charge an individual for a crime, a police officer must decide whether to arrest that person for a crime. In the majority of circumstances, before a prosecutor can contemplate whether to charge an individual for a crime, a police officer must decide whether to arrest that person for a crime. In the majority of circumstances, before a prosecutor can contemplate whether to charge an individual for a crime, a police officer must decide whether to arrest that person for a crime. In the majority of circumstances, before a prosecutor can contemplate whether to charge an individual for a crime, a police officer must decide whether to arrest that person for a crime.
The need to finance the transition to more environmentally sustainable paths is a necessity in the decade to come. Only public international agencies can make significant contributions to addressing such a global issue. (4). The path out of the vagaries of finance-led capitalism is not straightforward, and many events can change the international situation. (4). The need to finance the transition to more environmentally sustainable paths is bound to be seen by large majority of citizens as a necessity in the decade to come. Only public international agencies can make significant contributions to addressing such a global issue. (4). Only public international agencies can make significant contributions to addressing such a global issue. (4). Only public international agencies can make significant contributions to addressing such a global issue. (4). Only public international agencies can make significant contributions to addressing such a global issue. (4). Only public international agencies can make significant contributions to addressing such a global issue. (4)
Economic rebound isn’t a mirage, it’s the result of an unprecedented series of events in the past 30 years that have given tremdous underlying strength to the economy. It’s not a mirage, it’s the result of an unprecedented series of events in the past 30 years that have given tremdous underlying strength to the economy. It’s not a mirage, it’s the result of an unprecedented series of events in the past 30 years that have given tremdous underlying strength to the economy. It’s not a mirage, it’s the result of an unprecedented series of events in the past 30 years that have given tremdous underlying strength to the economy. It’s not a mirage, it’s the result of an unprecedented series of events in the past 30 years that have given tremdous underlying strength to the
Afrofuturists can have a collective technological advantage that helps shape the world and alleviate disparity – they can pull from the best of the past while navigating the sea of possibilities to create communities, culture, and a new, balanced world. “It comes down to do we really imagine ourselves to be in the future?” he asks. “Can we be agents of the future or will we be objects of the future, like we were objects of commerce when black folks were brought to the New World?” he asks. “Can we be agents of the future or will we be objects of commerce when black folks were brought to the New World?” he asks. “Can we be agents of the future or will we be objects of commerce when black folks were brought to the New World?” he asks. “Can we be agents of the future or will we be objects of commerce when black folks were brought to the New World
Most people know of the Tunguska NEO strike in Siberia in 1908. An object probably less than 100 meters in diameter struck Siberia, releasing equivalent energy of up to 10 megatons. Many experts believe there were two other smaller events later in the century—one in Central Asia in the 1940s and one in the Amazon in the 1930s. In 1996, our satellite sensors detected a burst over Greenland of approximately 100 kiloton yield. Had any of these struck over a populated area, thousands and possibly hundreds of thousands might have perished. Experts now tell us that an even worse catastrophe than a land impact of a Tunguskasize event would be an ocean impact near a heavily populated shoreline. The resulting tidal wave could inundate shorelines for hundreds of miles and potentially kill millions.
Drug trafficking is a key part of Mexico’s economy – decapitation, charred bodies, and corpses in barrels of lye have been attributed to a war between drug cartels, the government’s response to drug cartel violence, and a consequence of government corruption and impunity.
The United Nations has called for an end to the embargo of Cuba that has been in place for over half a century. The United Nations has called for an end to the embargo of Cuba that has been in place for over half a century. The United Nations has called for an end to the embargo of Cuba that has been in place for over half a century. The United Nations has called for an end to the embargo of Cuba that has been in place for over half a century. The United Nations has called for an end to the embargo of Cuba that has been in place for over half a century. The United Nations has called for an end to the embargo of Cuba that has been in place for over half a century. The United Nations has called for an end to the embargo of Cuba that has been in place for over half a century. The United Nations has called for an end to the emb
Russian-Chinese relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO relations are key to US-NATO relations – US-NATO
The DREAM Act was repealed on the floor of the Senate, unable to overcome a Republican filibuster. The DREAM Act was repealed on the floor of the Senate, unable to overcome a Republican filibuster. The DREAM Act was repealed on the floor of the Senate, unable to overcome a Republican filibuster. The DREAM Act was repealed on the floor of the Senate, unable to overcome a Republican filibuster. The DREAM Act was repealed on the floor of the Senate, unable to overcome a Republican filibuster. The DREAM Act was repealed on the floor of the Senate, unable to overcome a Republican filibuster. The DREAM Act was repealed on the floor of the Senate, unable to overcome a Republican filibuster. The DREAM
The refugee crisis is framed as a crisis in the sense of a moment in the war of position and war of maneuver when hegemony and the architecture of a social world are at stake, with future structural and symbolic realities unknown. Hegemony and the architecture of a social world are at stake, with future structural and symbolic realities unknown. Hegemony and the architecture of a social world are at stake, with future structural and symbolic realities unknown. Hegemony and the architecture of a social world are at stake, with future structural and symbolic realities unknown. Hegemony and the architecture of a social world are at stake, with future structural and symbolic realities unknown. Hegemony and the architecture of a social world are at stake, with future structural and symbolic realities unknown. Hegemony and the architecture of a social world are at stake, with future structural and symbolic realities unknown. Hegemony and the architecture of a social
Canada and Russia won’t go to war over shipping fees or drilling rights
The Court of Appeals ruled the NLRB was an unconstitutional exercise of presidential power – the president could only fill vacancies with the recess appointment procedure if the Senate is in recess – the president could only fill vacancies with the recess appointment procedure if the openings arise when the Senate is in recess – the president could only fill vacancies with the recess appointment procedure if the openings arise when the Senate is in recess – the president could only fill vacancies with the recess appointment procedure if the openings arise when the Senate is in recess – the president could only fill vacancies with the recess appointment procedure if the openings arise when the Senate is in recess – the president could only fill vacancies with the recess appointment procedure if the openings arise when the Senate is in recess – the court
UWP is too impersonal and coldly calculating and ignores individual attachments and personal commitments and the specific moral obligations that grow out of our various everyday relations with others. We want them to be impartial, dispassionate, and empirically minded – to be rational deliberators who look objectively at the big picture and the long run, basing their decisions on the most accurate and detailed understanding they can obtain of the circumstances in which they are operating and the likely results of the alternatives open to them. We want them to be impartial, dispassionate, and empirically minded – to be rational deliberators who look objectively at the big picture and the long run, basing their decisions on the most accurate and detailed understanding they can obtain of the circumstances in which they are operating and the likely results of the alternatives open to them.
In addition to sales to DOD, the U.S. TWV industrial base also sells vehicles to foreign governments. The AECA authorizes the President to control the export and import of arms and dual-use items, including TWVs, to friendly nations and allies. The AECA authorizes the issuance of export licenses for U.S. manufacturers to sell arms directly to eligible foreign governments, known as direct commercial sales (DCS). Regardless of the method of sale, each FMS request or DCS license application is reviewed by officials from DOD and the Department of State (State) to ensure the sale would not result in harm to U.S. interests and is consistent with national security and foreign policies.
It’s time to remind ourselves that the only things worse than what this government and its various law enforcement agencies do in secret are the things they’ve been doing blatantly, openly, but only to some for a long time now – it’s time to remind ourselves that the only things worse than what this government and its various law enforcement agencies do in secret are the things they’ve been doing blatantly, openly, but only to some for a long time now – it’s time to remind ourselves that the only things worse than what this government and its various law enforcement agencies do in secret are the things they’ve been doing blatantly, openly, but only to some for a long time now – it’s time to remind ourselves that the only things worse than what this government and its various law enforcement agencies do in secret are the things they’ve been doing blatantly, openly,
The alternative is to create a formal “waiver” process under which states would be allowed to experiment with taxed and regulated cannabis production and distribution, as states were allowed to experiment with alternative forms of income support under AFDC waivers. The alternative is to create a formal “waiver” process under which states would be allowed to experiment with taxed and regulated cannabis production and distribution, as states were allowed to experiment with alternative forms of income support under AFDC waivers. The alternative is to create a formal “waiver” process under which states would be allowed to experiment with taxed and regulated cannabis production and distribution, as states were allowed to experiment with alternative forms of income support under AFDC waivers. The alternative is to create a formal “waiver” process under which states would be allowed to experiment with taxed and regulated cannabis production and distribution, as states were
We are all green now and it is incumbent on all of us as learners to interrogate and make sense of this absurdity. To do this, learning must be rooted in the experience of living, of navigating the multifaceted and often frightening array of consumer attractions and the dangers of apprehending the real as simply what you want it to be. To do this, learning must be rooted in the experience of living, of navigating the multifaceted and often frightening array of consumer attractions and the dangers of apprehending the real as simply what you want it to be. We are all green now and it is incumbent on all of us as learners to interrogate and make sense of this absurdity. To do this, learning must be rooted in the experience of living, of navigating the multifaceted and often frightening array of consumer attractions and the dangers of apprehending the real as simply what you want it to be.
A post-Castro Cuba isn’t a business bonanza for U.S. companies – they’re looking to take advantage of lower labor costs or of a privileged distribution location – they’re looking to take advantage of lower labor costs or of a privileged distribution location – they’re looking to take advantage of lower labor costs or of a privileged distribution location – they’re looking to take advantage of lower labor costs or of a privileged distribution location – they’re looking to take advantage of lower labor costs or of a privileged distribution location – they’re looking to take advantage of lower labor costs or of a privileged distribution location – they’re looking to take advantage of lower labor costs or of a privileged distribution location – they’re looking to take advantage of lower labor costs or of a privileged distribution location – they’re looking to take advantage
Reversing settler colonialism in natural resources law would be a hybrid that reaches back to a pre-colonial past and incorporates ecological and economic realities of today. Reversing settler colonialism in natural resources law would be a hybrid that reaches back to a pre-colonial past and incorporates ecological and economic realities of today. Reversing settler colonialism in natural resources law would be a hybrid that reaches back to a pre-colonial past and incorporates ecological and economic realities of today. Reversing settler colonialism in natural resources law would be a hybrid that reaches back to a pre-colonial past and incorporates ecological and economic realities of today. Reversing settler colonialism in natural resources law would be a hybrid that reaches back to a pre-colonial past and incorporates ecological and economic realities of today.
The focus is shifting away from military redeployment to diplomatic, political and economic engagement in the region – the focus is shifting away from military redeployment to diplomatic, political and economic engagement in the region – the focus is shifting away from military redeployment to diplomatic, political and economic engagement in the region – the focus is shifting away from military redeployment to diplomatic, political and economic engagement in the region – the focus is shifting away from military redeployment to diplomatic, political and economic engagement in the region – the focus is shifting away from military redeployment to diplomatic, political and economic engagement in the region – the focus is shifting away from military redeployment to diplomatic, political and economic engagement in the region – the focus is shifting away from military redeployment to diplomatic, political and economic engagement in the region – the focus is shifting away from military red
The cost of incarceration is greater than the cost of incarceration – it’s an oversimplistic view that doesn’t take into account all other costs.
The global economy has suffered its biggest shock since the Second World War. When coronavirus hit, we battened down the hatches and it’s driven us into deep recession. The global economy has suffered its biggest shock since the Second World War. When coronavirus hit, we battened down the hatches and it’s driven us into deep recession. The global economy has suffered its biggest shock since the Second World War. When coronavirus hit, we battened down the hatches and it’s driven us into deep recession. The global economy has suffered its biggest shock since the Second World War. When coronavirus hit, we battened down the hatches and it’s driven us into deep recession. The global economy has suffered its biggest shock since the Second World War. When coronavirus hit, we battened down the hatches and it’s driven us into deep recession.
Dems don’t have the authority to defund a war escalation – they don’t have the authority to defund a war escalation – they don’t have the authority to defund a war escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation escalation
Native Americans are in a vastly different historical and legal position than any other ethnic group, ethnic, or racial group. Native Americans have a highly specialized legal relationship to the US government, one that has shifted over the years from one of shared sovereignty to one where the federal government and the states have jointly eroded tribal sovereignty and left America’s indigenous nations with shreds and patches of their original powers. Native Americans have had a highly specialized legal relationship to the US government, one that has shifted over the years from one of shared sovereignty to one where the federal government and the states have jointly eroded tribal sovereignty and left America’s indigenous nations with shreds and patches of their original powers. Native Americans have had a highly specialized legal relationship to the US government, one that has shifted over the years from one of shared sovereignty to one where the federal government and the states have jointly eroded tribal sovereignty and left
The United Nations Convention of the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS) by Canada, Denmark (Greenland), Norway and Russia has resulted in a geopolitical shift that has resulted in the five Arctic Ocean coastal states becoming major powers in the Arctic region. 
Even if the data set that falsifies a theory is finite, for every choice function that cannot be rationalized by a pair of linear orders over alternatives there is always a finite set of choices that cannot be rationalized by a pair of linear orders over alternatives there is always a finite set of choices that cannot be rationalized by a pair of linear orders over alternatives there is always a finite set of choices that cannot be rationalized by a pair of linear orders over alternatives there is always a finite set of choices that cannot be rationalized by a pair of linear orders over alternatives there is always a finite set of choices that cannot be rationalized by a pair of linear orders over alternatives there is always a finite set of choices that cannot be rationalized by a pair of linear orders over alternatives there is always a finite set of choices that cannot be rationalized by a pair of linear
Xi Jinping is making the most of his four country tour of the Americas to position China as a competitor to the US and Taiwan’s economic influence in the region. Xi Jinping is making the most of his four country tour of the Americas to position China as a competitor to the US and Taiwan’s economic influence in the region. Xi Jinping is making the most of his four country tour of the Americas to position China as a competitor to the US and Taiwan’s economic influence in the region. Xi Jinping is making the most of his four country tour of the Americas to position China as a competitor to the US and Taiwan’s economic influence in the region. Xi Jinping is making the most of his four country tour of the Americas to position China as a competitor to the US and Taiwan’s economic influence in the region. Xi Jinping is making the most of
The US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest of the world because the ice is melting and the US isn’t keeping up with the rest
Theorize fugitivity as a way to imagine black life that persists in and in spite of being criminalized – it’s a powerful way to imagine black life that persists in and in spite of being criminalized. 
China is tightening its export quotas – export quotas won’t be able to solve the endemic smuggling problem – export quotas won’t be able to solve the endemic smuggling problem – export quotas won’t be able to solve the endemic smuggling problem – export quotas won’t be able to solve the endemic smuggling problem – export quotas won’t be able to solve the endemic smuggling problem – export quotas won’t be able to solve the endemic smuggling problem – export quotas won’t be able to solve the endemic smuggling problem – export quotas won’t be able to
Article 4(c) of the Single Convention in particular is not absolute in nature nor a preemptory norm as asserted by the INCB. Article 4(c) of the Single Convention in particular is neither absolute in nature nor is a preemptory norm as asserted by the INCB. The fact that Article 4(c) of the Single Convention in particular is not absolute in nature nor is a preemptory norm as asserted by the INCB puts into serious question the notion that Canada is unequivocally violating a sine qua non of the UN Conventions by moving to a regulated legal use model for recreational cannabis. Canada could have chosen a more limited regime with provisions for review after a defined time period, eschewing imprisonment and creating the kind of offense that does not entail the stigma of a criminal record instead of moving to fully legalized, albeit regulated,
A methane hydrate apocalypse would thaw methane hydrates as a gargantuan oceanic burp. The juiciest disaster-movie scenario would be a release of enough methane to significantly change the atmospheric concentration. The juiciest disaster-movie scenario would be a release of enough methane to significantly change the atmospheric concentration. The juiciest disaster-movie scenario would be a release of enough methane to significantly change the atmospheric concentration. The juiciest disaster-movie scenario would be a release of enough methane to significantly change the atmospheric concentration. The juiciest disaster-movie scenario would be a release of enough methane to significantly change the atmospheric concentration. The juiciest disaster-movie scenario would be a release of enough methane to
The original purpose of the hydrologic cycle was to describe hydrological processes, but also to constitute a separate field of scientific enquiry and a community of technical experts known as hydrologists. The hydrologic cycle is the natural circulation of water on, in and over the earth, a process that occurs independently of human involvement. Such a process can only be modified or disturbed by humans, which renders water the province of agencies and experts with technical knowledge of the hydrologic cycle and the power to engineer it. For the hydrologist, there is a need to know as accurately as possible the modifications that man makes in the hydrologic cycle – past, present, and future – in the hope that man can progressively increase his ability to modify the hydrologic cycle to his advantage. By working with nature, adapting his needs to the natural cycle or adapting that cycle to his needs, man can obtain the greatest beneficial use of the water resources
New START’s expiration date comes a couple weeks after the next presidential inauguration date, meaning the decision to renew it could be left to Trump’s successor if he’s defeated in November.
U.S. policymakers favoring the oil industry said gains in oil production would help lead to energy independence and shield the regional economy from oil shocks like those that resulted from the 1970s oil embargo. OPEC members responded to the $2 billion in military aid sent to Israel after the Yom Kippur War in 1973 by halting oil shipments to the United States and its allies, causing substantial spikes in oil prices and pain at the pump for American consumers. OPEC members responded to the $2 billion in military aid sent to Israel after the Yom Kippur War in 1973 by halting oil shipments to the United States and its allies, causing substantial spikes in oil prices and pain at the pump for American consumers. OPEC members responded to the $2 billion in military aid sent to Israel after the Yom Kippur War in 1973 by halting oil shipments to the United States and its
Despite the crowd’s diversity and repeated acknowledgements of the sordid history of aggressive spying on communities of color, the few outlets to cover the rally portrayed it and the movement against NSA surveillance as one dominated almost exclusively by privileged white people.
The threat of the loss of intelligence sharing and security partnerships is unlikely to persuade countries that are not formal allies or close security partners with Washington.
Female offenders have different rates of child care responsibilities from male offenders, so a one-size-fits-all approach won’t solve
The US does not face an existential cyberthreat today, despite recent warnings. Our cybervulnerabilities are undoubtedly grave and the threats we face are severe but far from comparable to nuclear war. The most recent alarms come in a Defense Science Board report on how to make military cybersystems more resilient against advanced threats (in short, Russia or China). It warned that the cyber threat is serious, with potential consequences similar in some ways to the nuclear threat of the Cold War. Such fears were expressed by Adm. Mike Mullen, then chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, in 2011. He called cyber “the single biggest existential threat that’s out there” because “cyber actually more than theoretically, can attack our infrastructure, our financial systems.” Eighty years ago, the generals of the US Army Air Corps were sure that their bombers would easily topple other countries and cause their populations to panic, claims which did
Xi Jinping and U.S. President Barack Obama will discuss the most serious threat to nuclear security: North Korea’s nuclear defiance. This year’s summit occurs at a time of growing Chinese resentment at North Korea’s willingness to take Chinese support for granted and put Chinese strategic interests at risk – this year’s summit occurs at a time of growing Chinese resentment at North Korea’s willingness to take Chinese support for granted – this year’s summit occurs at a time of growing Chinese resentment at North Korea’s willingness to take Chinese support for granted – this year’s summit occurs at a time of growing Chinese resentment at North Korea’s willingness to take Chinese support for granted – this year’s summit occurs at a time of growing Chinese resentment at North Korea’s willingness to take Chinese support for granted – this year’s summit occurs at
STEM degree attainment is entrenched – gender disparity in STEM fields is more entrenched than the general dearth of women enrolled in and graduating from college in greater numbers than men since the 1980s – gender disparity in STEM fields is more entrenched than the general dearth of women enrolled in and graduating from college in greater numbers than men since the 1980s – gender disparity in STEM fields is more entrenched than the general dearth of women enrolled in and graduating from college in greater numbers than men since the 1980s – gender disparity in STEM fields is more entrenched than the general dearth of women enrolled in and graduating from college in greater numbers than men since the 1980s – gender disparity in STEM fields is more entrenched than the general dearth of women enrolled in and graduating from college in greater numbers than men since the 1980s – gender disparity in STEM
Establishing a new diplomatic and economic modus vivendi with Cuba strengthens the case that Cuba can stand to become a more open, democratic society without succumbing to external pressure or subversion – allowing the well-entrenched bureaucrats, national security ideologues, and pro-embargo voices in his own country to keep Cuba policy in a box, further alienating regional allies and perpetuating the siege mentality among Cuban officials
Non-Western design is relegated to “special topics” classes, or to the anthropology department instead of serving as foundational principles to standard design curricula. Native American cultures have existed for thousands of years, so why are they still relegated to “special topics” classes, or to the anthropology department instead of serving as foundational principles to standard design curricula? Native American cultures have existed for thousands of years, so why are they still relegated to “special topics” classes, or to the anthropology department instead of serving as foundational principles to standard design curricula? Native American cultures have existed for thousands of years, so why are they still relegated to “special topics” classes, or to the anthropology department instead of serving as foundational principles to standard design curricula? Native American cultures have existed for thousands of years, so why are they still re
Relative calm has prevailed among the great powers since the demise of the Soviet Union, but by and large interstate war has been confined to the margins of the international system, and limited in its intensity, with the operational realities of the world’s major armed forces characterized by alternative missions. East Asia, and especially China, constituted the principal exception to the slow growth characterizing these decades. East Asia has massively increased its share of world manufacturing, exports, and exchange reserves, while the EU expanded and consolidated the continent’s resources, with some “game-changing” implications (like the euro). Additionally, rising commodity prices have resulted in booms among resource exporters, particularly energy exporters, which have also permitted these nations to enjoy greater political leverage. 
Legal education is a site for the production of knowledge and power in the hands of social groups and institutions identified with the “original” immigrants from Europe to the lands now known as the United States. Legal education is a site for the production of knowledge and power in the hands of social groups and institutions identified with the “original” immigrants from Europe to the lands now known as the United States. Legal education is a site for the production of knowledge and power in the hands of social groups and institutions identified with the “original” immigrants from Europe to the lands now known as the United States. Legal education is a site for the production of knowledge and power in the hands of social groups and institutions identified with the “original” immigrants from Europe to the lands now known as the United States. Legal education is a site for the production of knowledge and power in the hands of social groups and institutions identified with the “original” immigrants from Europe to the lands now known
US-India relations burgeoning – CISMOA, Logistic Exchange Memorandum of Agreement (LEMA), Communication and Information Security Memorandum of Agreement (CISMOA), and Basic Exchange and Cooperation Agreement (BECA)
There is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference between being wrong and being stupid – there is a difference
Venture capitalists are key to indigenous innovation – they focus on entrepreneurs, who are the driving force behind indigenous innovation. 
Liberalism presupposes the idea of a sustainable life for otherwise the only freedom that the liberal social world would have would be to perish in a polluted environment. Our position differs from Wolff and other anarchists also insofar as we reject the principle of autonomy, the foundation belief of liberalism. It is true that freedom and liberty are important values, but such values are by no means fundamental or ultimate values based upon an ecological philosophy of humanity: Survival and the integrity of ecological systems. Without such values, the liberal social world would have to perish in a polluted environment. Our position differs from Wolff and other anarchists also insofar as we reject the principle of autonomy, the foundation belief of liberalism. It is true that freedom and liberty are important values, but such values are by no means fundamental or ultimate values based upon an ecological philosophy of humanity: Survival and the
The “lead panic” echoes the Yellow Peril fears articulated earlier in the 20th century that lead travels more than it used to, which would require us to accept, somehow, that lead came only from China. Ghoul health refers to the global organization of the biomedical establishment, and its imaginary, around the idea that the big scary bug, the new plague, is the real threat that haunts the contemporary global division, distribution, and circulation of health, that it will decisively render the distribution of jus vitae ac necris, and that this big scary bug will track empire back to its source in an end game of geophysical bad faith. Ghoul health plays on the real fear that the material distribution of life and death arising from the structural impoverishment of postcolonial and settler colonial worlds may have accidentally or purposefully brewed an unstoppable biovir
Obama will not wait for the 60-day consideration period it agreed to give Congress to vote up or down and instead would go first to the United Nations Security Council.
U.S. hegemony in the Western Hemisphere is a civilizing mission in support of democracy, human rights, continental security, and continental free trade
Environmentalists are losing the battle to create a sustainable society – 1300 plant and animal species remain on the endangered species list and water shortages in the west and southeast are being used to justify new river-killing dams and reservoirs; and water shortages in the west and southeast are being used to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new river-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam-killing dams and reservoirs to justify new dam
China is pushing back against the international order – reviving the political will to maintain US leadership in space and abroad will ensure that destabilization of the international order doesn’t fly over our heads
Schools or school districts are the smallest recognized form of “education system” and countries are the largest. Public funding, resource allocations, and procedures for determining funding levels State and district administrative offices, school facilities, and transportation vehicles Human resources, staffing, contracts, compensation, and employee benefits Books, computers, teaching resources, and other learning materials And, of course, countless other contributing elements While the term education system is widely used in news media and public discourse, it is difficult to determine precisely what the term is referring to when it is used without qualification, specific examples, or additional explanation. Like the teaching profession, education systems are, by nature, extremely complex and multifaceted, and the challenges entailed in reforming or improving them can be similarly complex and multifaceted. Even reforms that appear to be straightforward, simple, or easily achieved may, in practice, require complicated state policies and requirements, union-contract negotiations, school schedule modification, or countless other
Our increased reliance on this tech makes the threat of hacking especially worrisome. A hacker could try to access a satellite by targeting a company’s ground systems, and once inside, the attacker could manipulate the communications or controls, download unwanted software, or even tell the satellite to change its course, according to Iain Boyd, the director of the University of Colorado Boulder’s Center for National Security Initiatives. Our increased reliance on this tech makes the threat of hacking especially worrisome. A hacker could try to access a satellite by targeting a company’s ground systems, and once inside, the attacker could manipulate the communications or controls, download unwanted software, or even tell the satellite to change its course, according to Iain Boyd, the director of the University of Colorado Boulder’s Center for National Security Initiatives.
Charter schools cause more students to attend school in unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, unattractive, un
BEN NORTON: Trump didn’t beat around the bush; he instantly made it clear that Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman was there to finalize arms sales he had made during his trip to Riyadh in May. Just 40 seconds into their meeting, Trump pulled out a cardboard chart listing the billions of dollars in arms sales the United States is doing with the Saudi regime. Just 40 seconds into their meeting, Trump pulled out a cardboard chart listing the billions of dollars in arms sales the United States is doing with the Saudi regime. BEN NORTON: Trump didn’t beat around the bush; he instantly made it clear that Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman was there to finalize arms sales he had made during his trip to Riyadh in May. Just 40 seconds into their meeting, Trump pulled out a cardboard chart listing the billions of dollars in arms sales the United States is doing with the Saudi regime
We cannot escape the logic of differentiation we are often tempted by the logic of defilement. To say as much, however, it is not to argue that we are imprisoned within a particular and permanent system of representations. To say as much, however, it is not to argue that we are imprisoned within a particular and permanent system of representations. To say as much, however, it is not to argue that we are imprisoned within a particular and permanent system of representations. To say as much, however, it is not to argue that we are imprisoned within a particular and permanent system of representations. To say as much, however, it is not to argue that we are imprisoned within a particular and permanent system of representations. To say as much, however, it is not to argue that we are imprisoned within a particular and permanent system of representations.
Even “experts” are susceptible to erroneous decisions due to lapses in critical thinking ability. Even “experts” are susceptible to lapses in critical thinking ability because they are conditioned to make certain responses, rather than think freely and reflexively, and are often motivated by fear or other emotions. Even “experts” are susceptible to erroneous decisions due to lapses in critical thinking ability because they are conditioned to make certain responses, rather than think freely and reflexively, and are often motivated by fear or other emotions. Even “experts” are susceptible to erroneous decisions due to lapses in critical thinking ability because they are conditioned to make certain responses, rather than think freely and reflexively, and are often motivated by fear or other emotions. Even “experts” are susceptible to erroneous decisions due to lapses in critical thinking ability because they are conditioned to make certain
We will never defeat the system on the plane of the real – this is their imaginary, imposed on them by the system itself, living or surviving only by always leading those who attack the system to fight amongst each other on the terrain of reality, which is always the reality of the system, living or surviving only by always leading those who attack the system to fight amongst each other on the terrain of reality, which is always the reality of the system, living or surviving only by always leading those who attack the system to fight amongst each other on the terrain of reality, which is always the reality of the system, living or surviving only by always leading those who attack the system to fight amongst each other on the terrain of reality, which is always the reality of the system, living or surviving only by always leading those who attack the system to fight amongst each other on the terrain of reality, which is always the reality of
Even if China wants to undermine and replace the existing liberal international order, the constraints on doing so are overwhelming. Presumably, an alternative order would be less open and less rule-based. Historically, such orders have been organized into various illiberal political formations: regional groupings, imperial zones, spheres of influence, and closed autarkic blocs. This might be a so-called “Beijing Consensus,” an international order that accommodated (and even promoted) illiberal and authoritarian polities and statist economic relations. China would need to be able to come forward with some alternative set of rules and institutions, presumably reflecting an alternative model of political and economic organization. This might be a so-called “Beijing Consensus,” an international order that accommodated (and even promoted) illiberal and authoritarian polities and
Hardt and Negri turned left defeat into an opportunity to reimagine communist politics. This reimagining needs to go further. It can go further by highlighting division, antagonism, and political organization. Nearly forty years after the collapse of the Soviet Union, the wide array of politicized issues and identities enables a communism that, more fully than ever before, can take the side of the oppressed, indeed, that can make the multiple struggles of the oppressed into a side. It’s imperative that multiplicity not replace class but be understood as a class characteristic.
Not all allies have the defense funding, technological capacity, skills, and military infrastructure to facilitate rapid defense innovation, including the adoption and scaling of emerging technologies, and not all that have such resources and knowledge are willing to share them in collaborative innovation processes. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Economic growth isn’t sustainable – neoliberal policies aren’t sustainable 
ISIS would not even have to come into the U.S. ISIS would hire gangs in Mexico, such as the Knights Templar who have already knocked out power in 11 Mexican cities using conventional weapons, such as the Knights Templar who have already knocked out power in 11 Mexican cities using conventional weapons, such as the Knights Templar who have already knocked out power in 11 Mexican cities using conventional weapons, such as the Knights Templar who have already knocked out power in 11 Mexican cities using conventional weapons, such as the Knights Templar who have already knocked out power in 11 Mexican cities using conventional weapons, such as the Knights Templar who have already knocked out power in 11 Mexican cities using conventional weapons, such as the Knights Templar who have already knocked out power in 11 Mexican cities using conventional weapons, such
Immigration law is based on the etymology of “alien” which means “strange, foreign, not of one’s own... n 1a. A person belonging to another family, race, or nation; a stranger, a foreigner.. n 1a. A person belonging to another family, race, or nation; a stranger, a foreigner.. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1a. n 1
School choice is shaped by the neoliberal social imaginary of a market-driven society in which “citizens are differentially rewarded competitive consumers whose success depends on their entrepreneurship and individual effort.” The neoliberal social imaginary of a market-driven society in which “citizens are differentially rewarded competitive consumers whose success depends on their entrepreneurship and individual effort.” The neoliberal social imaginary of a market-driven society in which “citizens are differentially rewarded competitive consumers whose success depends on their entrepreneurship and individual effort.” The neoliberal social imaginary of a market-driven society in which “citizens are differentially rewarded competitive consumers whose success depends on their entrepreneurship and individual effort.” The neoliberal social imaginary of a market-driven society in which “citi
